Renal scintigraphy in children with vesicoureteral reflux.To determine the incidence and pattern of abnormal scintigraphy findings in children with UTI and VUR.Data of 118 children who underwent micturating cystourethrography (MCU) and late Tc-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan were evaluated. Findings were categorized under the image appearance and relative kidney uptake (RKU) and related to the grade of VUR, sex and child's age.MCU revealed VUR (78 unilateral and 40 bilateral) of grades I, II, III, IV and V in 2, 47, 35, 19 and 15 patients respectively. There were 52 children with normal and 66 with abnormal DMSA finding. Scarring rate was significantly associated with high grade VUR (p=0.0023) and male gender ( p=0.0412). Bilateral scarring was seen exclusively in children with bilateral VUR. No significant difference was found between renal scarring and child's age in the same gender group. Poor kidney function was shown in 5 patients.Renal scarring highly correlated with grade of VUR. A strategy to perform MCU only on patients with abnormal DMSA finding is proposed.Results of a five-year study of 99mTc DMSA renal scintigraphy in children and adolescents following acute pyelonephritis.Renal scintigraphy, generally using 99mTc-DMSA, is the accepted reference standard for detection of renal cortical changes. The timing of the test, i.e., whether an acute 99mTc-DMSA scan, a follow-up only or both scans should be performed, however, remains open to discussion. In our study, a six-month follow- up DMSA scan was performed in all the children diagnosed with a first attack of acute pyelonephritis (APN) in two large paediatric clinics of Charles University's 3rd School of Medicine in Prague during a five-year period. All diagnoses were confirmed by a paediatric nephrologist.382 children (267 girls, 115 boys) aged between 7 months and 19 years were included in the study. For analytical purposes, the patients were divided into 4 age groups: I--less than 1 year of age, II--1-5 years, III--5-10 years, and IV--10-19 years. In all children younger than five years, a micturition cystourethrogram (MCUG) for detection of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was performed between one and three months after the APN episode. Static renal scintigraphy, using an HR collimator with parallel holes was performed using a planar Gamma camera MB 9200 (Gamma Budapest) in all children six months after APN, with a complement of pinhole images, SPECT or PSPECT of the kidneys.1. In group I, all four children with positive VUR on MCUG had a pathological DMSA scan, while only two of the 32 patients with negative VUR had a pathological DMSA. 2. In group II, 17 children had VUR on MCUG, six of them with a pathological and 11 with a normal DMSA scan. Most of the 221 children without VUR had a normal DMSA scintigraphy; pathological findings were present in 17 children only. 3. In group III, all children with VUR, but only 5 out of 53 without VUR, had a pathological DMSA scan. 4. Five out of 50 children in group IV had a pathological DMSA.APN occurred most frequently in group II (62.3%, or 238 children) and ranged between 10-15% in the remaining groups. APN was found very frequently in boys less than one year old and showed a marked decrease with increasing age. Among girls, however, APN incidence was observed to increase with age. Pathological renal changes were present in children with, as well as without, VUR. The incidence of pathological DMSA findings six months after APN was relatively low (44/382 patients, or 11.5%). Regular monitoring of these children is very important for detection of renal scarring.Imaging of pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of pyelonephritis using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult, especially in children. The main aims of this prospective study were to compare the value of different imaging techniques [renal sonography, cortical scintigraphy with technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc DMSA) and computed tomography (CT)] in detecting renal involvement in acute urinary tract infections and to determine the sensitivity of DMSA scans for permanent renal scars 6 months later.Between February 1992 and January 1993, 55 children admitted to our pediatric unit with febrile symptomatic urinary tract infections were eligible for analysis. Ultrasonography (US), DMSA scanning and micturating cystourethrography were performed in every case. Only 18 children underwent CT. A second DMSA scan was performed in 48 children a mean of 7.5 months after the first.US abnormalities were found in 25 children (45 %). The first DMSA scan showed a parenchymal aspect suggestive of pyelonephritis in 51 patients (93 %). Among the 18 patients studied by CT, 14 had abnormalities. Normal US findings did not rule out renal parenchymal involvement. Scintigraphy appeared to be more sensitive than CT for renal involvement. The frequency and degree of initial renal parenchymal damage seemed to correlate with vesicoureteral reflux, but the most severe initial parenchymal defects were not associated with marked clinical or laboratory manifestations. Repeat DMSA scans, performed on 45 kidneys with abnormalities at the first examination, showed resolution in 19, improvement in 16, persistence in 8 and deterioration in 2. The prevalence of vesicoureteral reflux was not higher in patients with renal scarring on the second DMSA scan than in patients whose scans showed an improvement.DMSA scans should be considered as a reference in the detection and follow-up of renal scarring associated with acute urinary tract infection as this technique is more sensitive than US and CT, the latter being unsuitable because it entails radiation exposure and sedation of patients.[Evolution of scintigraphic renal lesions in children after an episode of acute pyelonephritis].Abnormal Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy performed six months after an acute pyelonephritis (AP) is generally interpreted as scarring.To perform a follow up of childhood patients showing scintigraphic renal lesions during the acute phase of pyelonephritis (within 7 days from the beginning of fever).A scintigraphic control was carried out at 5-7 months and, in case of persistent lesions, an additional late scintigraphy at 10-13 months. All patients were followed clinically for one year and those with a relapse of urinary tract infection were excluded from the study.Eighty five patients with a median age of 8 months were included. Among these, the first scintigraphic control was normal in 59 (69%) and abnormal in 26 patients (31%). In five of these 26 patients (5/26:19%-5/85: 6%), a considerable regression of the lesions was obvious on the early control, and normalized completely on the late control. When expressing the results in kidney units, 107 showed lesions during the acute phase of infection; 69% was normal at the early control. Thirty three showed lesions persisting at the early control (31%) and 7 out of these 33 (21%) became normal on the late control (7/107: 7%). In total, 25% of the children included in the study (24% of the kidney units) remained with renal sequelae one year after the initial episode of AP.The persistence of scintigraphic lesions six months after an episode of AP, does not necessarily correspond to permanent scars, since normalization can sometimes be observed on late controls.Is a routine voiding cystourethrogram necessary in children after the first febrile urinary tract infection?The aim of this study was to estimate the value of identifying vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on a voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) and the benefit of VUR management according to imaging strategies at the first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Children aged 1-144 months (n = 618) with the first febrile UTI admitted at our hospital from 2000 to 2009 were enrolled. In all patients, renal sonogram (US), (99m) Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scanning and VCUG were performed. Retrospective analyses per patient and per renal unit were performed.Abnormal US or DMSA scans had a sensitivity of 100% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 100% to detect high-grade reflux. In hydronephrotic kidneys, DMSA scanning had a sensitivity of 88.2% and a NPV of 97.1% to detect high-grade reflux.Routine VCUG is not required after the first febrile UTI in patients with normal US or normal DMSA scan. Even if the US reveals hydronephrosis, routine VCUG is not necessary if the DMSA findings are normal. It is recommended that children who did not receive both a DMSA scan and VCUG after the first febrile UTI should be followed up over the long term.Acute renal damage in infants after first urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is one of the most common causes of unexplained fever in neonates. The aim of this study was to determine the incidence of urinary tract anomalies and acute renal damage in neonates who presented with first urinary tract infection in the first 8 weeks of life. We reviewed the records of 95 infants, who were hospitalised with UTI during a 6-year period (1994-1999). Patients with antenatally diagnosed hydronephrosis and incomplete radiological investigations were excluded from the study. Of the remaining 57 patients, 42 were boys and 15 girls. The mean age at diagnosis was 32 days (range 5-60 days). All patients underwent renal ultrasonography (US), voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) and (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Urinary tract abnormalities were detected in 20 (35%) patients. Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was found in 19 (33%) neonates, 7 girls and 12 boys. Acute cortical defects on DMSA scan were present in 19 kidneys of patients with VUR and in 25 of those without reflux. Only one-third of neonates after first symptomatic UTI had VUR. We recommend that US, VCUG, and DMSA scan should be routinely performed after the first UTI in infants younger than 8 weeks.[The utility of gammagraphy with Tc 99-labelled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) in the protocol for studying urinary infection in a 2nd-level hospital].Not all hospitals in our country have their own nuclear medicine laboratory. Most small and medium size hospitals must arrange their radioisotope studies with private clinics. The objective of this study was to assess if a single DMSA scan performed after an acute infection in a group of patients chosen according to certain risk criteria would allow the selection of those who run the risk of progressive renal damage.A descriptive and retrospective study of the clinical records of 65 patients under 14 years of age with urinary tract infection (UTI) seen at our institution between 1994 and 1995 and on whom a DMSA scan had been performed was carried out. The study groups was formed by the fifteen children with scintigraphic findings compatible with renal scarring. The fifty children with normal DMSA scans were used as controls.Renal scarring was found more often in patients over one year of age (p < 0.05), in those with reinfections (p < 0.001) and in those kidneys with grade III vesicoureteral reflux (VUR, p < 0.05). The most severe lesions, with reduction of renal size, shape abnormalities and diminished uptake of the tracer were found together with VUR. The renal sonogram performed during the acute stage of the UTI was able to detect only four of the six children most severely affected.Delaying the practice of the DMSA scan until 6 months after the last episode of bacteriuria would allow selection of those patients at the highest risk of progressive renal damage. This guideline would reduce scintigraphic studies 30 to 90%, since it would avoid repeated studies in those children with abnormal findings in the acute stage. The practice of the radioisotope study only in a reduced subset of patients selected on the basis of risk criteria such as recurrent UTI, VUR or suspected pyelonephritis does not allow detection of all scars.The impact of therapeutic delay time on acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with first febrile UTI.We assessed the role of therapeutic delay time (TDT) in acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion (ASL) and ultimate scar formation (USF) in children with first febrile UTI and whether it is affected by the presence of vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR). 230 children, 90 girls and 140 boys with first febrile UTI were included. Radiologic (USG, DMSA, and VCUG), clinical (age, gender, peak fever, therapeutic delay time) and laboratory (CBC with differential count, ANC (absolute neutrophil count), BUN, Creatinine, urine analysis, gram stain, culture, CRP and ESR) variables were analysed. DMSA was performed within 5 days and after six months. VCUG was performed after acute phase of UTI. The differences in TDT according to the presence of ASL, USF and VUR were assessed. And the correlation between ASL or USF with the duration of TDT was assessed. Of 230 patients enrolled, 142 patients had refluxing UTI and 88 patients had non-refluxing UTI. TDT was the risk factor associated with ASL and USF along with presence of VUR. TDT was longer in ASL positive group compared with the ASL negative group. Also USF group showed longer TDT compared with those without USF in both refluxing UTI and non refluxing UTI. The TDT was significantly shorter in USF group with the presence of VUR. Positive linear association was noted between prevalence of ASL and USF and duration of TDT. In conclusion, the impact of UTI on formation of USF may be enhanced by the presence of VUR with shorter duration of TDT.Predictors of abnormal renal cortical scintigraphy in children with first urinary tract infection: the importance of time factor.We evaluated different factors predicting the development of acute pyelonephritis in Iranian children, with special attention to time factor.One hundred nineteen patients (93 females and 26 males; age = 32.6 ± 30.8 months) with first urinary tract infection (UTI) were evaluated. None had previous urological problems. Prior to antibiotic therapy blood samples were gathered for laboratory evaluation. Vital signs on admission were measured. Clinical and laboratory indices, including therapeutic delay time (TDT) and therapeutic response time (TRT), were measured. Most patients were evaluated with renal ultrasound in the first three days following admission. All patients underwent dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy and 71 were assessed for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).DMSA scans were abnormal in 77 cases, of which 11 cases had bilateral renal involvement. Mean values for TDT, TRT, leukocyte count (LC), absolute neutrophil count (ANC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and C-reactive protein (CRP) were 74.1 h, 39.6 h, 15725 ± 6682 mm(-3), 10772 ± 6458 mm(-3), 51.9 ± 32.5 mm, and 27.3 ± 25.1 mg l(-1), respectively. VUR was present in 29 of 142 evaluated renal units.TDT ≥ 48 h, TRT ≥ 24 h, axillary temperature ≥ 39°C, LC ≥ 13500 mm(-3), and age ≥ 18 months predicted abnormal DMSA scan in patients with first episode of UTI. Considerably higher TDT and TRT values of the current study compared to previous ones suggests the more important role of time factor in predicting abnormal DMSA findings in a developing country than in developed ones.Detecting reflux: does ureteric jet Doppler waveform have a role?Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) has a prevalence of 30-40 % post-febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). If not detected early and treated, renal scarring, hypertension, and renal failure may occur. Micturating cystourethrography (MCU) is an invasive procedure associated with radiation exposure. Hence, this study aimed at evaluating the utility of ureteric jet Doppler waveform (UJDW) as a screening tool in detecting VUR, and at assessing the feasibility of performing it in children aged 2-4 years.Any child 2-18 years old who needed an MCU was included. Exclusion criteria were active UTI, indwelling catheter, and inability to drink the required amount of fluid. The UJDW was performed prior to the MCU.One hundred eighty-two ureteric units were analyzed. Sensitivity and specificity of UJDW in detecting VUR was 80.3 and 87.9 %. Twenty-three children (45 ureteric units), aged 2-4 years were compared with 73 children (137 ureteric units), aged 5-18 years. Sensitivity and specificity of UJDW in detecting VUR in 2-4 years was 77.3 and 91.3 %, respectively; while in children ≥5 years, it was 81.8 and 87.1 %, respectively.UJDW has a uniformly high specificity regardless of age or etiological groups, making it a good tool for follow-up. UJDW is a feasible technique, even in children aged 2-4 years.Uroradiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection: are both ultrasonograpy and renal cortical scintigraphy necessary?To compare the findings of renal ultrasonography (RUS), 99mTc glucoheptonate renal scan (GHS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in children with urinary tract infection.Prospective, masked, clinical study.Single center, multidisciplinary, inpatients.Consecutive cases (N = 50) of children aged 2 months to 15 years (8 boys, 42 girls) with pyelonephritis in whom uroradiologic investigation was indicated.All patients underwent GHS, 48 had RUS, and 2 had intravenous pyelography. All but one of the patients had a VCUG. Fifteen children were found to have vesicoureteral reflux (6 unilaterally, 9 bilaterally). Of 96 kidneys evaluated by both GHS and RUS, 53 were abnormal by GHS versus 28 by RUS (p < 0.001). Findings of both GHS and US were normal in 36 kidneys and abnormal in 21 kidneys. In 32 kidneys only GHS showed abnormalities. In 7 kidneys only RUS showed abnormalities; 5 of them had mild to moderate pelvic dilation caused by reflux, which was confirmed in all 5 by VCUG. The VCUG demonstrated reflux in another four units with normal GHS and RUS findings. All combined, GHS and VCUG detected 62 of 64 abnormal renal units (96.9%). In the other two cases, RUS showed only focal hyperechogenicity of questionable importance.In the event that one elects to use GHS for the uroradiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection, it can be supplemented by VCUG alone, and RUS can be saved for special cases.[Ultrasound screening of vesico-uretero-renal reflux].A prospective study of detecting vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) by ultrasound is to be presented. In case of reflux, gas bubbles can be seen in the renal pelvis during the filling phase of a gas cystogram and during micturition, utilizing ultrasound as the imaging modality. In children under two years 52 sonographic reflux studies were performed and compared with radiographic voiding cystourethrograms (VCUG). All higher grade VUR (grades II-IV) have been detected by our method.Evaluation of acute urinary tract infection in children by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy: a prospective study.A prospective study examining the incidence of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) abnormalities in children at the time of acute urinary tract infection, the progression of these abnormalities following treatment and their correlation with the presence of vesicoureteral reflux is reported. DMSA scans performed within 72 hours of presentation in 65 previously healthy children with acute urinary tract infection were abnormal in 34 (52%). The scan appearances of 30 of 36 (83%) initially abnormal kidneys improved or became normal on the repeat DMSA study performed at 3 to 6 months after the acute urinary tract infection. A cystogram demonstrated significant vesicoureteral reflux in 11 of 45 cases (24%). Of these 11 cases 10 had abnormal DMSA studies and 1 had dilated upper tracts on ultrasound. Several conclusions may be drawn from our study. The incidence of DMSA abnormalities at the time of acute urinary tract infection is high but these abnormalities tend to resolve with time. An abnormal DMSA study at the time of urinary tract infection identifies most children with significant vesicoureteral reflux, and in our series a combination of ultrasound and DMSA identified all cases. This study may have major implications for the clinical investigation of children with urinary tract infection.Renal sonography is not a reliable screening examination for vesicoureteral reflux.A retrospective analysis of 493 infants and children was performed to determine the reliability of renal sonography for identifying vesicoureteral reflux. Sonography was done in all cases within 8 hours of a voiding cystourethrogram. Vesicoureteral reflux was documented in 272 of 986 kidneys on voiding cystourethrography and there were 201 refluxing kidneys with normal ultrasound (25 with grade I reflux, 119 with grade II, 50 with grade III, 6 with grade IV and 1 with grade V). In 71 of the refluxing kidneys the ultrasound was abnormal due to pelvicaliceal dilatation in 45, a duplication anomaly in 6 and renal fossae abnormality in 20. Of the kidneys with vesicoureteral reflux 74% were sonographically normal. Sonography was not sufficiently sensitive or specific for detecting vesicoureteral reflux, since 28% of the missed refluxing kidneys had grade III or higher reflux.Normal dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy makes voiding cystourethrography unnecessary after urinary tract infection.To test the hypothesis that infants with dilating vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) have abnormal acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy results, as was suggested by an earlier retrospective study.We conducted a prospective study of infants <1 year old with first diagnosed symptomatic urinary tract infection at the Children's Hospital of Göteborg, Sweden. Two hundred ninety consecutive children (161 boys and 129 girls) with complete records were examined. Renal ultrasound scanning and DMSA scintigraphy were performed within a few days from diagnosis, and VCU was performed within 2 months.VUR was found in 52 children, of which 27 had dilating VUR (grade III-V). DMSA scintigraphy results were abnormal in 149 infants (51%), 105 of 238 (44%) without VUR, 18 of 25 (72%) with VUR grade I to II, and 26 of 27 (96%) with VUR grade III to V (P <.001).DMSA scintigraphy results were abnormal in all 27 infants with dilating VUR except 1. This single false-negative finding should be compared with 140 unnecessary VCU investigations. This supports our hypothesis that DMSA scintigraphy results are abnormal when there is dilating VUR. Thus, a normal DMSA scan makes VCU unnecessary in the primary examination of infants with UTI.Nephromegaly is a significant risk factor for renal scarring in children with first febrile urinary tract infections.We determined whether nephromegaly on ultrasound can be used to identify patients with urinary tract infection at increased risk for renal scarring, and we investigated the effect of vesicoureteral reflux on renal scarring.We enrolled hospitalized patients with a first febrile urinary tract infection. All patients underwent renal ultrasound and most patients underwent voiding cystourethrography. Renal scarring was assessed using (99m)technetium dimercapto-succinic acid renal scintigraphy at least 6 months after treatment. Children with recurrent urinary tract infections before scintigraphy were excluded from the study.A total of 545 children (80 with and 465 without nephromegaly) were enrolled. Infection was more severe in patients with than without nephromegaly. The incidence of renal scarring was significantly higher in patients with nephromegaly (90% vs 32%, p <0.001), in kidneys with nephromegaly (80.5% vs 18.7%, p <0.001) and in kidneys with vesicoureteral reflux (41.5% vs 22.2%, p <0.001). Kidneys with nephromegaly had a greater incidence of reflux. The finding of nephromegaly is associated with a greatly increased likelihood of renal scarring in patients with vesicoureteral reflux.Our results indicate that ultrasound diagnosis of nephromegaly at onset is associated with a high incidence of renal scarring, and identification of nephromegaly at onset and vesicoureteral reflux are significant risk factors for renal scarring in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection. Nephromegaly is associated with an increased frequency of vesicoureteral reflux and increased likelihood of renal scarring in patients with reflux.Acute phase 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in infants with first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan is the golden standard for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and renal scaring. We investigated the use of acute phase DMSA scan in infants presented promptly to the hospital because of the first episode of their febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Ninety-eight infants with microbiologically confirmed first episode of febrile UTI were studied. DMSA scans were carried out within 7 days in these infants after admission. Infants with an abnormal acute DMSA scan underwent a second DMSA scan 6-12 months later.Overall, acute DMSA scan was abnormal in 16 (16.3%) of the 98 patients. There were no differences in sex, age, fever over 38.5°C, blood inflammation indices, or evidence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) between patients with normal and abnormal acute DMSA scan (P>0.05). However, infants with grade III to V VUR as well as those with delayed treatment presented significantly increased renal involvement by acute DMSA scan (P<0.05). The sensitivity and specificity of abnormal acute DMSA scan to predict grade III to V VUR were 50% and 88% respectively. Its positive and negative likelihood ratios were 4.16 and 0.57, respectively. Of 16 children with abnormal initial DMSA scan results, 14 underwent a second DMSA scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were normal in 12 of the 14 children.Parenchymal damage found in a minority of infants with febrile UTI presented promptly to the hospital. Acute phase DMSA scan should be carried out only in selected patients. An abnormal acute DMSA scan is a moderate predictor for dilated VUR and its ability to exclude VUR is restricted.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections in infants and young children.The purpose of the study was to compare bacterial species, clinical, laboratory and imaging findings ((99m )Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan and voiding cystogram) in infants and children with high (>/=10(5) colony forming units (CFU)/ml, group A patients) and low (</=5 x 10(4) CFU/ml, group C patients) bacterial count in urine cultures during first episode of urinary tract infection. Group B included patients with intermediate CFU/ml. Included were 419 symptomatic patients with: (a) no previous antibiotic treatment, (b) urine samples for quantitative cultures taken by bladder catheterisation or suprapubic bladder aspiration, (c) growth of only one microorganism, and (d) age </=54 months (age of the oldest patient of group C). Out of 419 cultures, Escherichia coli grew in 315 (75.2%), gram-negative bacteria except E. coli in 91 (21.7%) and gram-positive in 13 (3.1%). Group C patients were significantly ( P <0.0001) more often affected with gram-negative pathogens except E. coli than group A patients (21/44 versus 67/360). Most of group C patients were younger than 24 months of age; none was older than 54 months. Comparison of the prevalence of clinical and laboratory (leucocyte count, CRP, ESR) findings between groups A and C showed no significant differences. There was no statistically significant difference in the prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations (except reflux) between groups A and C.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections mainly affect infants and young children and are often due to gram-negative bacteria other than E. coli. Clinical and laboratory findings, prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations are similar in high and low bacterial count urinary tract infections.Experience with the NICE guidelines for imaging studies in children with first pyelonephritis.This retrospective study evaluates the applicability of a selective approach for imaging in children aged 0-15 years with a first episode of pyelonephritis, based on the UTI guidelines of the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE).A total of 96 consecutive patients were included (age range: 0.1-14.9 years, median age: 0.7 years), treated for a first episode of confirmed culture-positive pyelonephritis. At initial hospitalization all patients underwent ultrasound examination of the kidneys and urinary tract (US) and technetium-99m mercaptoacetyltriglycine scinti- and renography ( (99m)Tc MAG3). If vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was suspected, then prophylactic antimicrobial therapy was prescribed and the patients were referred to a surgeon for further evaluation including voiding cystoureterography (VCU). Patients with known urological anomalies including antenatally diagnosed anomalies were excluded. All patients were followed up for a median of 5.2 years (3.5-8.6 years).Initially, US findings were abnormal in 29 (30%) patients and (99m)Tc MAG3 findings were abnormal in 20 (21%) cases. At follow-up, prophylactic antimicrobial therapy was prescribed for 19 (20%), and VUR was diagnosed by VCU in 9 patients. Surgery was carried out in 7 (7%) patients, primarily for VUR. If the NICE guidelines had been initially followed, 5 of our 9 patients with VUR would not have been identified. VUR surgery was performed in 4 of these cases. Moreover, 9 cases with urological anomalies subsequently prescribed prophylactic antimicrobial therapy would have been missed.We do not recommend following the imaging strategies of the NICE guidelines for children with a first episode of pyelonephritis. Our most important argument is that at follow-up, after a minimum of 3.5 years, the initial diagnosis of VUR would have been missed in 4 out of the 5 patients who underwent VUR surgery.Nuclear cystography and renal sonography: findings in girls with urinary tract infection.This retrospective study documents the findings on nuclear cystography and renal sonography of 455 girls who had urologic imaging for a proved urinary tract infection (UTI). Nuclear cystograms were normal in 313 (69%) of 455 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was seen in 142 patients (31%): six with grade I, 90 with grade II, 43 with grade III, and three with grade IV. Twelve percent of patients with vesicoureteral reflux had renal parenchymal scars. Increasing grades of reflux were associated with an increase in the severity and number of parenchymal scars. Normal renal sonograms were seen in 83% of patients. Abnormalities noted on sonograms included parenchymal scarring in 31 (7%) of the 455 patients, anomalies in 19 patients (4%), mild to moderate dilatation of the renal pelvis and or ureters in 45 patients (10%), and bladder wall thickening in 45 patients (10%).Vesicoureteral reflux in hospitalized children with urinary tract infection: the clinical value of pelvic ectasia on renal ultrasound, inflammatory responses and demographic data.The aims of this study were to determine whether renal pelvis dilation on ultrasound was reliable in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and to assess the relationship of other clinical information of VUR in children with urinary tract infection (UTI).We retrospectively reviewed clinical data, renal echo, and voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) results in hospitalized children with their first episode of UTI, aged from 1 month to 5 years, during a 1-year period.There were 114 children with 228 kidneys eligible for the study. Unilateral pelvis size greater than 8 mm had 2.4 (p = 0.049, 95% CI: 1.0-5.9) and 3.7 (p = 0.025, 95% CI: 1.2-11.3) times greater risk for VUR and severe reflux, respectively. The sensitivity in detecting severe reflux was 27.8%, and the specificity was 90.5%. The positive and negative predictive values in suggesting severe VUR were 20.0% and 93.6%, respectively. The sum of bilateral pelvis sizes greater than 16 mm had higher risk for VUR and severe reflux (4.1 and 4.6 times) and similar specificity and negative predictive value for severe reflux. Age, gender, C-reactive protein, leukocytosis, pyuria and acute pyelonephritis did not show significant relationships to the reflux.Unilateral pelvis size greater than 8 mm or the sum of the bilateral pelvis sizes greater than 16 mm was associated with VUR, especially severe VUR. The possibility of severe reflux was lower than 10% when the reverse criteria were applied. However, the dilation of the renal pelvis did not predict all VUR precisely. We concluded that VCUG should still be performed in hospitalized children with UTI.Ultrasonography as a screening procedure in children with urinary tract infection.Renal ultrasonography, excretory urography and radionuclide-voiding cystography or conventional voiding cystourethrography were performed in 76 children with urinary tract infection. Forty children had functional or anatomical abnormalities. Twenty-eight children had vesicoureteral reflux and 12 children had an obstructive lesion. All 12 children with obstructive lesions as well as 4 children with reflux and hydronephrosis required corrective surgery. Ultrasonography as the initial procedure detected 14 of these cases and the other 2 were discovered in voiding cystourethrography. Our data and those in the literature suggest that renal ultrasonography may be the method of choice in children with urinary tract infection. This is followed by voiding cystourethrography or radionuclide-voiding cystography. Excretory urography is not necessary in the initial evaluation of these patients, but it should be utilized when the other imaging methods show an abnormality and more detailed anatomical visualization of the upper urinary tract is required. Using this protocol in children with urinary tract infection, unnecessary radiation, discomfort and expense will be avoided.NICE guidelines for imaging studies in children with UTI adequate only in boys under the age of 6 months.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the applicability of the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE) guidelines for imaging studies in children under the age of three with first urinary tract infection (UTI).In our cohort of 112 patients, we gathered data regarding the occurrence of indications for ultrasonography (US) and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) according to the NICE guidelines, dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy examinations, UTI recurrence, antimicrobial prophylaxis (AMP), anti-reflux procedures, and other urological procedures.If the NICE guidelines had been applied, 13 of the 25 patients (52 %) with vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), including 6 of the 12 patients (50 %) with dilating VUR and 3 of the 4 patients who underwent endoscopic anti-reflux treatment, would have been missed, and a negative VCUG would have been avoided in 25 of the 42 patients (60 %) with no VUR. None of the missed diagnoses occurred in the younger boys' group.Based on these preliminary analyses, we feel that the NICE guidelines for imaging studies in children under 3 years old with UTI may be applicable to clinical use only in boys under 6 months of age. For other patients the guidelines were unsuccessful.Renal ultrasound evaluation of urinary tract infections in children.Ultrasonography of the kidney may replace the intravenous pyelogram as the study of choice in identifying treatable abnormalities in children with urinary tract infection. In a series of 64 consecutive children with urinary tract infection in whom an intravenous pyelogram, renal ultrasound, and voiding cystogram were performed, only one treatable abnormality (calyceal dilation) was identified by intravenous pyelogram, and it was not detected by ultrasound. Eleven children showed vesicoureteral reflux on the cystogram. In an additional 43 children in whom intravenous pyelogram was done only if the ultrasound or cystogram were abnormal, there were five abnormal cystograms. Four treatable abnormalities were identified by ultrasound, and there were confirmed by the intravenous pyelogram. Ultrasound should replace the intravenous pyelogram in children with a normal cystogram because of its accuracy, safety, and high patient acceptance. We have also documented a significant volume increase with acute infection in one or both kidney(s) of those children having upper urinary tract infection. Fifteen of 18 children with upper urinary tract infection had volume increases of 30% or more in at least one kidney; whereas only four of 21 children with lower urinary tract infection had increases of greater than 30% (P less than .005). Ultrasound volume measurements provide a new, noninvasive method for identifying the probable site of urinary tract infection.Urography and sonography in the diagnosis of reflux nephropathy.Diagnostic workup of urinary tract infections within the first 24 months of life, in the era of prenatal diagnosis. The contribution of different imaging techniques to clinical management.The aim of this study was to evaluate the role of different techniques in the diagnostic workup of children with negative prenatal ultrasonogram, referred for urinary tract infection (UTI) within the first 24 months.One-hundred and forty-seven patients, 71 males/76 females were studied. All patients were submitted to renal ultrasonogram (RUS) and to micturating cystourethrogram (MCU) independently from the results of RUS. In a small group (48 children) DMSA scan was performed independently from the results of RUS and MCU. Sensitivity and predictive value of RUS for vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) were estimated. Multiple regression analysis was performed on a selected number of signs to evaluate their predictive value. The group investigated by DMSA scan was analysed to evaluate how the presence of VUR on MCU anticipated renal damage.Nineteen (21%) patients with normal RUS, had VUR. Predictive value of RUS (0.21) was influenced by the grade of the VUR but more than 30% of high grade refluxing renal units appeared normal at initial ultrasonography. DMSA scan was abnormal in 27% of 48 patients; its result was independent from the presence of VUR of whatever grade.The increasing number of renal abnormalities detected before birth reduces the possibility of late abnormal RUS findings. It makes RUS screening for abnormalities, after a first episode of UTI, scarcely useful. VUR may be easily missed when RUS resulted normal and MCU is omitted. Negative MCU cannot exclude renal damage in presence of UTI. Renal defects at DMSA scan may be unrelated to a demonstrable VUR and could have a different pathogenesis.[Quantitative renal scintigraphy with technetium-labelled dimercaptosuccinic acid in children].Separate measurement of renal function is essential in children with urinary tract disease. This can be done satisfactorily by means of kidney scintigraphy with technetium 99m-labelled dimercaptosuccinic acid. A retrospective study of the records of 415 children, which comprised renal function tests, radiology and scintigraphy, confirmed the value of the radioisotope technique. Graphs of height, kidney uptake and kidney uptake density in relation to age were established, showing highly significant correlations with renal function tests and intravenous urography results, but many dissociations were encountered. Separate renal function evaluation by radioisotope scintigraphy seems to be more reliable than evaluation extrapolated from measurement of the cortical areas at intravenous urography. In vesico-ureteral reflux scintigraphy makes it possible to detect reflux nephropathy at an earlier stage than with other methods.Utility of screening ultrasound after first febrile UTI among patients with clinically significant vesicoureteral reflux.To assess the sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) of screening renal and bladder ultrasound (RBUS) after initial febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) among patients with clinically significant vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).A retrospective review was performed of all children <2 years of age who presented with a febrile UTI between 2004 and 2011. The sensitivity and NPV of initial RBUS was calculated among patients who were found to have high-grade (IV-V) VUR. Additionally, initial RBUS among patients with evidence of photopenia on dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan or who underwent surgical intervention were reviewed.One hundred forty-four patients with febrile UTI were identified; available RBUS, voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG), and DMSA results for each kidney were reviewed. One hundred fifty-eight kidneys had evidence of VUR on VCUG, and initial RBUS demonstrated abnormality in 25 (sensitivity 0.17). Forty-five kidneys had high-grade VUR and RBUS revealed abnormality in 16 (sensitivity 0.36). One hundred seventy-eight kidneys had no evidence of abnormality on initial RBUS, and 136 (76%) were found to have VUR (NPV 0.24), of which 31 had high-grade VUR (NPV 0.83). Seven kidneys had scarring on DMSA and initial RBUS was normal in 4 (57%). Twelve of 19 patients (63%) who eventually underwent surgical intervention had a normal initial RBUS.RBUS has poor sensitivity and NPV for detecting high-grade VUR in patients <2 years who present with a febrile UTI. A significant number of patients who were diagnosed with high-grade VUR, renal scarring, or underwent surgical correction of VUR had a negative screening RBUS.[Imaging and the first urinary infection in children. Respective role of each test during the initial evaluation apropos of 122 cases].122 pediatric patients with a first urinary tract infection underwent renal ultrasonography (US) and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) to evaluate the usefulness of this association. The US was always the first examination undertaken, its sensitivity seems to be very good in detecting renal abnormalities. The major finding on the VCUG was the vesico-ureteral reflux: 25% of cases. When the sonogram and the VCUG are normal, 60% of cases, excretory urography is not considered necessary.The value of ultrasound in diagnosing vesicoureteral reflux in young children with urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection is a common pediatric problem and vesicoureteral reflux is its most common complication. Detection of this reflux has classically been achieved by voiding cystouretrography (VCUG). Ultrasonography for evaluation of vesicoureteral reflux is shown to be feasible but is not widely accepted. Our aim was to assess the value of routine sonography in detecting vesicoureteral reflux is young children with urinary tract infection. This study was carried out in 105 patients suffering from urinary tract infection admitted to Shahid Sadughi Hospital in Yazd, Iran. These patients were evaluated by two methods (sonography and VCUG). Overall sensitivity and specificity value of sonography in suggesting vesicoureteral reflux were 63% and 95% respectively. The most accurate results were obtained with high grades reflux (75% and 955). The results reconfirmed that sonography is reliable in the exclusion or verification of high grade reflux and it has a low sensitivity in low grade vesicoureteral reflux.[Imaging studies in the first urinary infection with fever in infants: is voiding cystourethrography necessary?].The presence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in an infant with urinary tract infection (UTI), does not necessarily lead to an acquired renal injury. Only serious reflux can be a factor in fostering its appearance.To assess whether in infants diagnosed for the first time with a UTI with a fever, a routine initial DMSA can be used as a screening method for detecting severe reflux and replace voiding cystourethrography (VCUG).We retrospectively studied 162 infants under 2 years old admitted to our hospital due to having a ITU with fever for the first time (92 males and 70 females). In all cases, a renal ultrasound, DMSA and VCUG had been performed a few days after the diagnosis.Of the 162 patients, 62 (38 %) had VUR, of which 56 (90 %) were mild and 6 (10 %) were severe. The DMSA was abnormal in 26/100 patients without VUR (26 %), 12/56 with mild VUR (21 %) and 6/6 of those with severe VUR (100 %). DMSA sensitivity for detecting severe reflux was 100 % and specificity was 76 %. The positive predictive value and negative predictive value was 14 % and 100 % respectively. The positive likelihood ratio was 4.17 and the negative likelihood ratio was 0.It is unnecessary to carry out VCUG in an infant with an initial UTI, and a negative DMSA.99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children: relation to clinical and radiological findings.Seventy-two children, 59 girls and 13 boys, 0.1-15.9 (median 1.1) years of age, with acute pyelonephritis (APN) were investigated with the aid of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasonography (US) and a desmopressin test within 5 days of admission. Sixty-two children were reinvestigated approximately 2 months later when intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cysto-urethrography were also performed. During infection, 92% of the children showed changes in the DMSA scan with 69% by US, and the two investigations agreed in 58% of the kidneys. At follow-up, 68% showed changes in the DMSA scan, 47% by US and 48% by IVU. The DMSA scan and IVU agreed in 60% of the kidneys. Twenty-nine percent of the children had vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). The presence of grade greater than or equal to 3 VUR was associated with greater defects on the DMSA scan during infection, and at follow-up with a higher frequency of persistent changes compared with no VUR (P less than 0.02 and 0.01, respectively). During infection the size of the defect on the DMSA scan correlated with renal volume and C-reactive protein and inversely with the glomerular filtration rate, and at follow-up it correlated inversely with the renal concentration capacity. The DMSA scan is a sensitive method for diagnosing and localizing APN in children, and findings on DMSA scan show a weak but significant correlation with routine clinical and radiological parameters. It is suggested that persistent renal damage after APN in children without VUR may be more common than previously assumed.Kidney imaging in management of delayed febrile urinary tract infection.We report a cross-sectional study performed to evaluate the imaging findings of 40 children, aged one month to five years (16.65 ± 14.97 months), who presented with protracted fever of more than 48 hours due to urinary tract infection (UTI). About 85% of the patients had positive Tc99-Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and 58% had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR). Kidney sonography aided in the diagnosis and treatment in 10% of the patients. Age, sex, presence or laterality of VUR did not contribute to defective DMSA scan (pyelonephritis) (P > 0.05). Delayed diagnosis and treatment of febrile UTI is associated with a high incidence of positive findings of DMSA scan irrespective of age, sex or presence/absence of VUR. In mild VUR, the DMSA scan may be normal while in patients with moderate and severe VUR the DMSA scan is almost always abnormal. Thus, our study shows that a normal DMSA scan can help in ruling out moderate to severe forms of VUR and that cystography remains an excellent and standard tool for the diagnosis of VUR.Involvement of the renal parenchyma in acute urinary tract infection: the contribution of 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid scan.We performed 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasonography in 146 children during the acute phase of a proven urinary tract infection (UTI). In 99 a micturating cysto-urethrography and in 83 an intravenous urography was also done. The occurrence of fever and increased WBC count, CRP and ESR were also studied. It appeared from this retrospective study that 47% of the kidneys had a cortical or patchy pattern of decreased uptake of 99mTc DMSA, as compared to 23% with abnormal findings on US. Vesico-ureteral reflux was present in 38% of the kidneys with parenchymal involvement on 99mTc DMSA scan. Although fever, leucocytosis and elevated CRP and ESR were significantly correlated with abnormal 99mTc DMSA scan, they were also observed in children without renal parenchymal involvement. Our results suggest that 99mTc DMSA scan is a sensitive method for the detection of parenchymal involvement during acute UTI. The exact nature of these lesions and their relation with scars need, however, to be defined.Prevalence of vesicoureteral reflux in neonatal urinary tract infection.Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) after a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) is apparently diagnosed much more frequently (25%-40%) in children than in neonates. The aims of the study were to determine the actual rate of VUR in neonates with UTI and to define the clinical clues to its diagnosis. The study sample included term infants with a diagnosis of UTI during their first month of life who were seen in this hospital between January 1997 and May 1999. All infants underwent complete diagnostic work-up (renal ultrasound and voiding cystourethrography [VCUG]). The medical files were reviewed for patient sex, age at UTI diagnosis, laboratory findings (including causative pathogen), and ultrasonographic findings. These parameters were correlated with the finding of VUR on VCUG. Sixty-four neonates (55 males, 9 females) with UTI were included in this study. UTI was 6 times more common in males than females, although the incidence of VUR was equal between the sexes (about 20%). The presence of VUR was associated with a significantly younger age at presentation of UTI (11.4+/-4 vs 16.9+/-6.6 days, p<0.01). VUR was diagnosed at a fourfold higher rate in neonates with Klebsiella-induced UTI compared to those with E. Coli-UTI. In 80% of those with significantly abnormal ultrasonographic findings VUR was found on VCUG. Jaundice was noted at UTI diagnosis 3 times more often in infants with VUR, and elevated creatinine level, 2.5 times more often.Predisposing factors for renal scarring in children with urinary tract infection.This study was undertaken to determine the predisposing factors for renal scarring in children with urinary tract infection. In this prospective cohort study, 176 children with documented urinary tract infection were categorized into four groups: ≤1 year old, 1-2 years old, 2-7 years and 7-14 years old. Ultrasonography and Technetium-99 m-DMSA scan were used to detect the possible abnormalities. Infants under 12 months old presented as the most common group for renal scarring (27 cases, 52.9%), and vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was diagnosed in 29 cases (56.8%). Fifteen (41.67%) children between the ages of one and two years had renal scar, and VUR was detected in half of the patients. In the third group, 36.3%, and in fourth group, 41.6% of the patients had renal scar. Also, 38.6% in group three and 50% in the final group had VUR. A co-incidental finding that was observed in this study was the high incidence of pseudohypoaldesteronism (PHA) in our patients: in 39.2% of the children in group one, 22.2% in group two and 4% in group three. In group four however, none of the patients had PHA. Risk of scar formation with urinary tract infection (UTI) was higher in the younger age group and in those with recurrent UTIs.The value of ultrasonography as a screening procedure in a first-documented urinary tract infection in children.To evaluate the role of ultrasonography in the investigation of childhood urinary tract infections (UTI), 240 patients aged 2 days to 15 years with a first-documented UTI were examined first by sonography, then by intravenous urography (IVU), and when indicated by voiding cysto-urethrogram (VCU). According to the results of these examinations, the patients were divided into three groups. In Group 1 (71 patients), abnormal sonographic findings were confirmed by the radiographic studies. Patients in Group 2 (51 patients) had discrepancies between sonographic and radiographic findings, the most important of which concerned the assessment of vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). In Group 3 (118 patients), sonographic and subsequent radiographic investigations were normal. Although ultrasonography can sometimes detect VUR, major reflux can be missed by sonography alone. In young children at risk for reflux nephropathy, ultrasound examination of the urinary tract must be accompanied by a VCU or isotope cysto-urethrogram.Technetium-99m-DMSA studies in pediatric urinary infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common condition in children and may lead to renal scarring with a risk of later hypertension and renal insufficiency. We made a cross-sectional study of the 99mTc-DMSA findings in 496 children referred for following symptomatic UTI to a Department of Nuclear Medicine and we categorized the results, to provide a framework for further study.A standard 99mTc-DMSA protocol was used to study 496 children (157 males, 339 females) aged from birth to 14 yr. Findings were classified according to the image appearance and relative function of each kidney. These were related to age, sex, history and timing of UTI and the results on micturating cysto-urethrography (MCU).Images were normal, with function within limits (45%-50% in one kidney), in approximately half the boys and girls studied. The other images were classified as equivocal in 68 children, abnormal unilaterally in 105 and bilaterally in 76, and they were subdivided according to the image appearance. No image changes could be identified that were specifically associated with acute UTI. Diffuse change alone was uncommon. A high proportion of abnormal images was found in infant boys, older girls with recurrent UTI and those children with vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). Of the bilateral abnormal images, 98% were seen in children with VUR.Our findings suggest that infective renal change may be superimposed on underlying congenital lesions (perhaps detectable antenatally) or may be acquired following UTI in the presence of reflux and are thus potentially preventable. This study also suggests that VUR is almost certain to have occurred in a child who has bilateral abnormal 99mTc-DMSA images following UTI and is also commonly present in those with definite unilateral defects.Vesicoureteral reflux in older children: concordance of US and voiding cystourethrographic findings.To determine if a negative renal sonogram is reliably predictive of the absence of vesicoureteral reflux at voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in children aged 5 years or older.Imaging studies in 70 children aged 5 years or older who underwent renal ultrasound (US) and VCUG on the same day were reviewed. These children had initially undergone evaluation because of a urinary tract infection.Five of 70 children had abnormal sonograms; two (40%) of the five had reflux at VCUG. One had mild pelvicalyceal dilatation, and one had a small kidney. The other three (without reflux) had a pelvic kidney, a calyceal diverticulum, or a renal stone. Of 65 children with a negative sonogram, 19 (29%) had reflux at VCUG; 46 (71%) did not. Altogether, of the 70 children, 21 had reflux, 19 (90%) of whom had no sonographic abnormality.Children with abnormal screening renal sonograms often have vesicoureteral reflux, but a normal sonogram does not reliably exclude the condition even in children aged 5 years or older. Therefore, VCUG must be performed even in older children, regardless of US findings, if clinical decisions are influenced by documentation of the presence of VUR.The efficacy of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in predicting vesicoureteral reflux in children below the age of 2 years with their first febrile urinary tract infection.We evaluated the efficacy of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) in comparison with voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children below the age of 2 years. Medical records and radiologic studies of children (<2 years) suffering their first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) between January 2001 and May 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of US and DMSA scans in diagnosing VUR. Among 220 children with their first febrile UTI, VUR was detected in 67 (30.4%). The detection rate of VUR by US was 41.7% and 86% in the low (I, II) and high grade (III~IV) groups, respectively. Detection rate of VUR by DMSA scan was 37.5% and 88.4% in the low and high grade groups, respectively. Combining US and DMSA scan, we found that the detection rate of high grade VUR was 95.3% and that of low grade was 62.5%. During follow up, most of the low grade VURs with normal DMSA and US scans resolved or were downgraded. Most high grade VURs could be detected by US and DMSA scan, but the prediction rate was not as high in low grade VURs. However, we can anticipate spontaneous improvement without complications in patients with either low or high grade reflux and negative findings on US and DMSA scan.Imaging studies after a first febrile urinary tract infection in young children.Guidelines from the American Academy of Pediatrics recommend obtaining a voiding cystourethrogram and a renal ultrasonogram for young children after a first urinary tract infection; renal scanning with technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid has also been endorsed by other authorities. We investigated whether imaging studies altered management or improved outcomes in young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.In a prospective trial involving 309 children (1 to 24 months old), an ultrasonogram and an initial renal scan were obtained within 72 hours after diagnosis, contrast voiding cystourethrography was performed one month later, and renal scanning was repeated six months later.The ultrasonographic results were normal in 88 percent of the children (272 of 309); the identified abnormalities did not modify management. Acute pyelonephritis was diagnosed in 61 percent of the children (190 of 309). Thirty-nine percent of the children who underwent cystourethrography (117 of 302) had vesicoureteral reflux; 96 percent of these children (112 of 117) had grade I, II, or III vesicoureteral reflux. Repeated scans were obtained for 89 percent of the children (275 of 309); renal scarring was noted in 9.5 percent of these children (26 of 275).An ultrasonogram performed at the time of acute illness is of limited value. A voiding cystourethrogram for the identification of reflux is useful only if antimicrobial prophylaxis is effective in reducing reinfections and renal scarring. Renal scans obtained at presentation identify children with acute pyelonephritis, and scans obtained six months later identify those with renal scarring. The routine performance of urinalysis, urine culture, or both during subsequent febrile illnesses in all children with a previous febrile urinary tract infection will probably obviate the need to obtain either early or late scans.Comparison of screening of vesicoureteral reflux with renal ultrasound and voiding cystourethrography.To suggest a different method for diagnosing vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in lieu of voiding cystourethrography (VCU), in order to prevent radiation exposure.Fifty-two ureterorenal units of 26 patients were evaluated ultrasonographically for visualizing the renal collecting systems, both before and after filling up the bladder with saline infusion. Every patient also underwent evaluation with VCU.All patients with Grade 2 or higher degrees of VUR on VCU can be identified by ultrasound (USG). Overall sensitivity and specificity of this technique were 66.7% and 93.48%, respectively, in our patient group.After being diagnosed with VCU initially a VUR patient can be effectively followed up by USG in order to prevent radiation exposure. Considering the clinical management of a patient with Grade 1 VUR which could not be detected with USG, it is concluded that failure to detect Grade 1 VUR will not be a handicap.Comprehensive ultrasound versus voiding cysturethrography in the diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux.This study evaluates the accuracy of noninvasive renal ultrasound (US) in the detection of dilative vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) compared to voiding cysturethrography (VCUG), taking both sonographic morphology and kidney length into account. The data and images of 205 paediatric patients who had renal ultrasound and VCUG performed were reviewed. Abnormalities of renal length and kidney morphology were compared with degree of reflux on VCUG for each renal unit. A total of 407 renal units were evaluated. When the sonographic diagnosis of reflux was based solely on morphological criteria and degree of dilatation, correlation with VCUG results was poor. However, the fraction of kidneys of anomalous size increased markedly with grade of reflux, from 10% of non-refluxing renal units to 50% of renal units subjected to grade 4 and 5 VUR. Taking abnormal kidney length into account as well, dilative VUR was diagnosed by ultrasound with a sensitivity of 92% (95% CI 82%-100%) and a sensitivity of 67% (95% CI 63%-72%), P<0.001.the results of this study show that ultrasound cannot accurately diagnose vesicoureteric reflux by morphological changes alone, but requires the consideration of age-adjusted abnormalities in kidney length.Imaging after urinary tract infection in male neonates.To assess the frequency of urinary tract anomalies in male neonates <8 weeks old who presented with urinary tract infection (UTI), and to evaluate a suitable imaging approach after the initial infection.During a period of 4.5 years, from July 1994 through December 1998, 45 male neonates <8 weeks old (range: 5-56 days; mean: 23.77 days) with UTI were hospitalized. All patients had an ultrasound (US) and a voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG), except 1 neonate in whom VCUG was unsuccessful because of technical problems. A dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan was recommended to all patients but was performed only in 30 of 45, most of them with an abnormal VCUG. The renal scan was performed at least 4 months after the UTI.Urinary tract abnormalities were observed in 22 of 45 male neonates. Nineteen had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), 1 had VUR and a double collecting system, 1 had VUR and a posterior urethral valve, and 1 had an ureteropelvic junction stricture. Renal atrophy or scars, as demonstrated by DMSA scan, were detected almost exclusively in neonates with VUR grade 3 and above. Only 1 neonate with VUR grade 1 had a pathologic DMSA, and the US of this male also demonstrated renal atrophy. Escherichia coli was the pathogen in 62% (28 of 45), and 9 boys had bacteremia.We suggest that US and VCUG should be performed routinely after the initial UTI in male neonates. Renal scan should be reserved for those cases in which the US suggests renal parenchymal damage or when VCUG detects VUR grade 3 and above.Combined use of late phase dimercapto-succinic acid renal scintigraphy and ultrasound as first line screening after urinary tract infection in children.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of dimercapto-succinic acid renal scintigraphy and renal ultrasound in identifying high grade vesicoureteral reflux in children after a first episode of urinary tract infection.A total of 533 children following a first urinary tract infection were included in the analysis. Patients were assessed by 3 diagnostic imaging studies, renal ultrasound, dimercapto-succinic acid scan and voiding cystourethrography. The main event of interest was the presence of high grade (III to V) vesicoureteral reflux. The combined and separate diagnostic accuracy of screening methods was assessed by calculation of diagnostic OR, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and likelihood ratio.A total of 246 patients had reflux, of whom 144 (27%) had high grade (III to V) disease. Sensitivity, negative predictive value and diagnostic OR of ultrasound for high grade reflux were 83.3%, 90.8% and 7.9, respectively. Dimercapto-succinic acid scan had the same sensitivity as ultrasound but a higher negative predictive value (91.7%) and diagnostic OR (10.9). If both tests were analyzed in parallel by using the OR rule, ie a negative diagnosis was established only when both test results were normal, sensitivity increased to 97%, negative predictive value to 97% and diagnostic OR to 25.3. Only 9 children (6.3%) with dilating reflux had an absence of alterations in both tests.Our findings support the idea that ultrasound and dimercapto-succinic acid scan used in combination are reliable predictors of dilating vesicoureteral reflux.DMSA study performed during febrile urinary tract infection: a predictor of patient outcome?Technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) study has been advocated as a method for the assessment of renal sequelae after acute febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). However, it is not known whether DMSA scintigraphy performed during acute UTI has any prognostic value for outcome assessment. The objective of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of DMSA scintigraphy performed during UTI as a predictor of patient outcome, to identify children at risk of events [vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR) or recurrent UTI] that may lead to the development of progressive renal damage. One hundred and fifty-two children (including 78 girls) with a mean age of 20 months (range 1 month to 12 years) with first febrile UTI were evaluated by DMSA scintigraphy during acute UTI. After acute UTI, children were explored by voiding cysto-urethrography. Children who presented an abnormal DMSA study, or a normal DMSA study but VUR or recurrent UTI, underwent a DMSA control study 6 months after UTI. Children with VUR were followed up by direct radionuclide cystography. DMSA scintigraphy performed during acute UTI was normal in 112 children (74%). In 95 of these children, follow-up DMSA scintigraphy was not performed owing to a good clinical outcome. In the remaining 17 children, follow-up scintigraphy was normal. Forty children (26%) presented abnormal DMSA study during acute UTI. Twenty-five of them presented a normal follow-up DMSA, and 15 presented cortical lesions. Children with abnormal DMSA had a higher frequency of VUR than children with normal DMSA (48% vs 12%). It is concluded that children with normal DMSA during acute UTI have a low risk of renal damage. Children with normal follow-up DMSA and low-grade VUR have more frequent spontaneous resolution of VUR.[Retrograde cystography after a first episode of acute pyelonephritis in the child and adolescent].In spite of its invasiveness, voiding cystourethrography remains the gold-standard examination for detecting vesico-ureteric reflux. The aim of this study was to determine if voiding cysto-urethrography is useful at any pediatric age in girls after a first acute pyelonephritis. 152 patients have been retrospectively studied. Both reflux frequency and grade progressively decreased according to age. Sonography was unable to predict reflux. In more than 3-year-old girls, 8/30 children with reflux had voiding dysfunction. We suggest clinical and/or a flow-metric evaluation for voiding dysfunction prior to voiding cystourethrography. After 9 years, reflux was so rare that voiding cystourethrography should be discussed on an individual basis.Detection of significant vesico-ureteric reflux by ultrasound in infants and children.We evaluated real-time ultrasonography in the diagnosis of vesico-ureteric reflux by comparing its findings to those of dynamic micturition cystourethrography. The study material comprised 124 consecutive infants and children referred to uroradiological workup, usually because of a relapsing febrile urinary tract infection. Both examinations were done during the same session. Consistent findings were obtained on 232 ureters, of which 37 displayed II. and 19 III. + reflux. II. reflux was found in 12 ureters by cystography only; thus one-fourth of low-grade refluxes escaped the diagnosis by ultrasound. The false negative findings of ultrasound examination included also two ureters showing III. reflux in cystography. As calculated for therapy-requiring (grade III or higher) reflux, the sensitivity of ultrasound was 90 per cent and its specificity 100 per cent. We conclude that ultrasound can be used as a primary diagnostic technique for girls, and in the follow-up of both boys and girls.Use of ultrasonography in the detection of ureteric reflux in children suspected of having urinary infection.The present study investigated whether ultrasonography was effective in detecting ureteric reflux in children suspected of having urinary infection. Seventeen children with febrile episodes and pyuria were enrolled. The ultrasound examination revealed ballooning of the renal pelvis during bladder contraction in 4 children, dilatation of the distal ureters in 6, and small kidney in 2. Cystography was performed on the 6 children with these ultrasound abnormalities and 1 child with two episodes of suspected urinary infection. Four children showed reflux. All of the 4 children had been found to have renal pelvic ballooning on ultrasound. None of the 10 children who did not undergo cystography had recurrence of urinary infection or significant bacteriuria during a median follow-up period of 12 months. Thus, scanning during bladder contraction was effective in detecting significant ureteric reflux.Prophylaxis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children? A multicenter, randomized, controlled, noninferiority trial.Febrile urinary tract infections are common in children and associated with the risk for renal scarring and long-term complications. Antimicrobial prophylaxis has been used to reduce the risk for recurrence. We performed a study to determine whether no prophylaxis is similar to antimicrobial prophylaxis for 12 months in reducing the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections in children after a first febrile urinary tract infection.The study was a controlled, randomized, open-label, 2-armed, noninferiority trial comparing no prophylaxis with prophylaxis (co-trimoxazole 15 mg/kg per day or co-amoxiclav 15 mg/kg per day) for 12 months. A total of 338 children who were aged 2 months to <7 years and had a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled: 309 with a confirmed pyelonephritis on a technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan with or without reflux and 27 with a clinical pyelonephritis and reflux. The primary end point was recurrence rate of febrile urinary tract infections during 12 months. Secondary end point was the rate of renal scarring produced by recurrent urinary tract infections on technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan after 12 months.Intention-to-treat analysis showed no significant differences in the primary outcome between no prophylaxis and prophylaxis: 12 (9.45%) of 127 vs 15 (7.11%) of 211. In the subgroup of children with reflux, the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections was 9 (19.6%) of 46 on no prophylaxis and 10 (12.1%) of 82 on prophylaxis. No significant difference was found in the secondary outcome: 2 (1.9%) of 108 on no prophylaxis versus 2 (1.1%) of 187 on prophylaxis. Bivariate analysis and Cox proportional hazard model showed that grade III reflux was a risk factor for recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. Whereas increasing age was protective, use of no prophylaxis was not a risk factor.For children with or without primary nonsevere reflux, prophylaxis does not reduce the rate of recurrent febrile urinary tract infections after the first episode.Is VCUG still indicated following the first episode of urinary tract infection in boys?To determine if voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) following first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) offers any incremental diagnostic advantage in boys if a comprehensive renal and bladder ultrasonogram (RBUS) revealed no abnormalities.All boys less than 10 years of age whose first evaluation for UTI included RBUS and VCUG were retrospectively studied over a 10-year period. Those with a disorder of the urinary tract known before imaging were excluded. RBUS and VCUG results were analyzed.Of the 77 who met the inclusion criteria, 58 (77%) were <1 year old. 45 (58%) boys had normal RBUS and VCUG. In 16 (21%) both studies were abnormal: 15 had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and one had posterior urethral valves. The remaining 16 (21%) had one abnormal study: 10 had pelvicaliectasis on RBUS without VUR; 6 had normal RBUS with VUR. No urethral abnormality was diagnosed on VCUG when RBUS was normal. Of the six who had VUR and normal RBUS, the one who required surgical intervention had recurrent febrile UTI.If a well-performed RBUS is normal in a boy with first UTI, the likelihood of a significant finding in VCUG is low. A VCUG is likewise of no apparent screening benefit for obstructive uropathy. With the uncertainties surrounding the benefit of chemoprophylaxis, omitting a VCUG when a RBUS is normal in boys with a first UTI avoids the morbidity without missing important pathologies or altering evolving management protocols.Age-related renal parenchymal lesions in children with first febrile urinary tract infections.The aim of this study was to define the association between age and the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis and renal scars.Between 1999 and 2002, all children 0 to 14 years of age consecutively seen with a first febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study. (99m)Tc-Dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy was performed within 5 days after admission for the detection of renal parenchymal involvement. The presence of vesicoureteral reflux was assessed by using cystography performed 1 month after the infection. If the acute scan results were abnormal, then follow-up (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning was performed after 6 months, to assess the frequency of scars.A total of 316 children were enrolled in the study (190 children <1 year, 99 children 1-4 years, and 27 children 5-14 years of age). (99m)Tc-Dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy revealed that 59% of the children had renal involvement in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of kidney involvement in infants <1 year of age (49%) was significantly lower than that in children 1 to 4 years of age (73%) and >5 years of age (81%). Of the 187 children with positive acute (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan results, 123 underwent repeat scintigraphy after 6 months. Renal scars were found for 28% of children <1 year, 37% of children 1 to 4 years, and 53% of children 5 to 14 years of age. No significant differences in the frequency of scars and the presence or absence of vesicoureteral reflux were noted.Our findings confirm that acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring occur only in some children with first febrile urinary tract infections. Children <1 year of age with febrile urinary tract infections have a lower risk of parenchymal localization of infection and renal scarring.Comparison of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy changes in acute pyelonephritis.The strategy for morphological investigations in children with acute pyelonephritis (APN) remains debatable. We studied 70 children (median age 2.0 years) admitted with a first episode of pyelonephritis using a high-resolution ultrasound technique (RUS) and compared the results with 99m technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy. The DMSA scan was abnormal in 62 children (89%). However, using a high-frequency transducer we found abnormal sonogram changes in 61 children (87%), consisting of an increased kidney volume in 42, and/or a thickening of the wall of the renal pelvis in 42, and/or a focal hyper- or hypoechogenicity in 36, and/or a diffuse hyperechogenicity in 31 children. Micturating cystourethrography was performed in all children, revealing vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in 22 (31%). Among those children with VUR, 4 had a normal DMSA scan, 2 an abnormal RUS, and 2 a normal DMSA scan and RUS. Our data suggest that B-mode RUS performed with a high-frequency transducer by a trained radiologist is nearly as sensitive as the DMSA scan in diagnosing renal involvement in children with unobstructed APN and in predicting VUR.Prognostic value of the acute DMSA scan in children with first urinary tract infection.We attempted to verify in a group of 101 children with first urinary tract infection whether it was possible to identify groups of patients with different risks of developing renal scarring by taking into account both the extent of kidney involvement documented in the acute phase of infection using a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, and the presence or absence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR). The frequency of persistent lesions in kidneys with mild-moderate lesions (less than 50% of kidney involvement) in the presence of VUR or in non-refluxing kidneys was similar (P=0.1447), while the frequency of persistent lesions in kidneys with severe lesions in the presence of VUR was significantly higher than the frequency of persistent lesions in non-refluxing kidneys (P=0.0089). The extent of kidney involvement and the presence of VUR make possible the identification of different categories of risk of scarring: in the "low risk group" (normal kidney with/without VUR) the risk of scarring is 0%; in the "intermediate risk group" (mild lesions with/without VUR; extensive lesions without VUR) the risk of scarring is between 14% and 38%, while in the "high risk group" (extensive lesions with VUR) the risk of scarring is 88%. Quantifying the risk of scarring could help in planning the treatment or in modifying the later strategy.The role of DMSA renal scintigraphy in the first episode of urinary tract infection in childhood.The role of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy in the first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) has been the subject of debate for many years. The aim of this study was to evaluate the relationship of voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), renal ultrasonography and DMSA renal scintigraphy and to detect renal parenchymal changes by performing DMSA renal scintigraphy at 6 months after the first episode of UTI.A prospective study was conducted in 67 hospitalized children (46 boys, 21 girls). Mean age of the patients was 0.97 ± 1.57 years (0.02-7.26 years). All children received VCUG, renal ultrasonography and DMSA renal scintigraphy. DMSA renal scintigraphy was performed at 1 and 6 months after UTI.Of 67 children, 17 (25.4%), 23 (34.3%) and 20 (29.9%) had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), abnormal renal ultrasonography and abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy, respectively. Unilateral hydronephrosis had a significant correlation with VUR at p value 0.024. In renal units, abnormal renal ultrasonography and hydronephrosis had significant correlations with VUR at p values 0.039 and 0.021, respectively. In patients and renal units, hydronephrosis had no significant correlation with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at 1 month after UTI. However, abnormal renal ultrasonography and VUR had significant correlations with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at p values 0.022 and < 0.001 in patients and at p values 0.024 and < 0.001 in renal units, respectively. Both in patients and renal units, VUR (Grade I-III) had no significant correlation with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy. However, severe VUR (Grade IV-V) had significant correlations with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at p values < 0.001 and < 0.001, respectively. Seventeen patients underwent DMSA renal scintigraphy at 6 months after UTI. In addition, 15 (88.2%) developed persistent renal scarring.Abnormal renal ultrasonography and severe VUR identify renal parenchymal changes. DMSA renal scintigraphy in the first episode of UTI should be carried out in those patients. Abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at 1 month after UTI has a tendency to persist.Renal ultrasound findings and vesicoureteral reflux in children hospitalised with urinary tract infection.To determine the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of renal ultrasound findings for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).Retrospective review of the ultrasound and voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) results of 162 children under 5 years of age admitted with their first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) over a two year period. Ultrasound findings were considered suggestive of VUR if "dilatation of the pelvi-calyces", "dilatation of the ureters", or "dilatation of the collecting system" of one or both kidneys was reported.A total of 162 patients were eligible for inclusion (median age 85 days; 71 (44%) were female). The prevalence of VUR was 22%. Ultrasound findings were positive for VUR in 14 of 35 patients with confirmed VUR on VCUG, and positive in 30 of 127 patients without VUR on VCUG. Of 21 patients who had a normal ultrasound but showed VUR on VCUG, 14 had grade II reflux, five grade III reflux, and two grade IV reflux. The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasound in suggesting VUR were 40% and 76%, respectively. The positive predictive value of ultrasound in suggesting VUR was 32%; the negative predictive value was 82%.Renal ultrasound findings are neither sensitive nor specific for VUR in children with a first UTI.Practice guidelines for imaging studies in children after the first urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection is common in children and may be associated with significant urinary tract pathology. Many children are investigated for vesicoureteral reflux after the first urinary tract infection but less than a quarter have reflux. Imaging with voiding cystourethrogram is not without risk. An approach was proposed to predict reflux in children with a urinary tract infection. We sought to validate a preestablished clinical decision rule to target voiding cystourethrogram more efficiently in children after the first urinary tract infection.We tested the usefulness of a clinical decision rule to predict vesicoureteral reflux in 406 consecutive children younger than 5 years who were treated or referred for consultation due to an acute urinary tract infection. Symptoms and signs of urinary tract infection and imaging findings were analyzed.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 120 children (35%), including 69 (20%) with grade III-V reflux. An abnormal ultrasound finding was seen in 71 cases (18%) but was not associated with reflux. The clinical decision rule appeared to have poor sensitivity of only 24% to identify grade III-V reflux. We found it impractical to predict vesicoureteral reflux in children with a urinary tract infection.Results show that it is not possible to predict grade III-V vesicoureteral reflux reliably using the clinical decision rule. The recent guidelines recommending a search for reflux after a urinary tract infection in children cannot be revised using this decision rule.Childhood urinary tract infection: a clinical analysis of 597 cases.To gain new insights into the epidemiology, genitourinary (GU) tract anomalies, etiologies, susceptibility of urinary pathogens to antibiotics in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) during the past decade in Taiwan.By reviewing medical charts for patients admitted to Kaohsiung Veterans General Hospital between January 1995 and December 2003, we identified and enrolled patients 14 years of age or less admitted due to UTI that was confirmed by positive urine culture.A total of 597 patients made up our sample. Sixty-eight percent of patients were 1 year old or younger. Boys predominated infant cohort (68.1%). Twenty-seven point one percent of the patients were found in urinalysis to have 5 white blood cells or fewer per high power field and 17.6% had positive nitrite reaction. The pathogens were Escherichia coli, the most common (74.7%), followed by Proteus spp. (6.7%), and Klebsiella spp. (6.4%). E. coli was resistant to ampicillin in 82.0% of the cases, followed by sulfamethoxazole/trimethoprim (55.2%), gentamicin (24.9%), and cefazolin (24%). Resistance to ampicillin and sulfamethoxazole/trimethoprim tended to increase year by year. Forty point seven percent (164/408) of patients had GU tract anomalies, the most common being vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) (87/164, 53.0%). Thirty-three point two percent of the patients with acute pyelonephritis, confirmed by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan, had VUR.Our cohort was predominated by boys, especially in those less than a year old. E. coli, the most common pathogen, had a higher rate of resistance to ampicillin and sulfamethoxazole/ trimethoprim. The pathogens that cause UTI were found to be becoming increasingly resistant to the common antimicrobial agents used in this study. The most common GU tract anomaly was VUR, yet the incidence was lower than that of other reports. A positive DMSA renal scan finding was a good indicator for prediction the possibility of VUR in UTI patients.Investigating febrile UTI in infants: is a cystogram necessary?Current imaging recommendations for investigating any infantile febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) are ultrasound scan (US), micturating cystourethrogram (MCUG) and dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. The aim of this retrospective cohort study was to determine the need and indications for MCUG in the investigation of a first febrile infantile UTI, as doubts have been raised over its benefit.Information on 427 infants who had undergone US, MCUG and DMSA following a first febrile UTI was prospectively recorded. The infants were divided into two groups: A (354) with normal renal US and B (73) with abnormal US. DMSA findings were correlated with findings on MCUG. Main outcome measures were incidence of recurrent UTIs, change in management or intervention as a result of MCUG, and outcome at discharge.Only 21/354 (6%) infants in Group A had both scarring on DMSA and vesicoureteric reflux (VUR), predominantly low-grade on MCUG. In Group B (abnormal US), 23/73 (32%) had scarring on DMSA and vesicoureteric reflux, predominantly high grade on MCUG. Of the infants with non-scarred kidneys, 73% had dilating reflux. Successful conservative treatment was performed in 423 infants, and 4 infants in Group B required surgery.We recommend US and DMSA in all infantile febrile UTI cases. Where US is normal, MCUG should be reserved for those cases with abnormal DMSA. Where US is abnormal, MCUG should be performed irrespective of findings on DMSA scan. A randomized prospective study is necessary to evaluate this further.Incidence of abnormal imaging and recurrent pyelonephritis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children 2 to 24 months old.The AAP (American Academy of Pediatrics) no longer recommends voiding cystourethrogram in children 2 to 24 months old who present with a first urinary tract infection if renal-bladder ultrasound is normal. We identified factors associated with abnormal imaging and recurrent pyelonephritis in this population.We retrospectively evaluated children diagnosed with a first episode of pyelonephritis at age 2 to 24 months using de-identified electronic medical record data from an institutional database. Data included age at first urinary tract infection, gender, race/ethnicity, need for hospitalization, intravenous antibiotic use, history of abnormal prenatal ultrasound, renal-bladder ultrasound and voiding cystourethrogram results, urinary tract infection recurrence and surgical intervention. Risk factors for abnormal imaging and urinary tract infection recurrence were analyzed by univariate logistic regression, the chi-square test and survival analysis.We identified 174 patients. Of the 154 renal-bladder ultrasounds performed 59 (38%) were abnormal. Abnormal prenatal ultrasound (p = 0.01) and the need for hospitalization (p = 0.02) predicted abnormal renal-bladder ultrasound. Of the 95 patients with normal renal-bladder ultrasound 84 underwent voiding cystourethrogram. Vesicoureteral reflux was more likely in patients who were white (p = 0.003), female (p = 0.02) and older (p = 0.04). Despite normal renal-bladder ultrasound, 23 of 84 patients (24%) had dilating vesicoureteral reflux. Of the 95 patients with normal renal-bladder ultrasound 14 (15%) had recurrent pyelonephritis and 7 (7%) went on to surgical intervention.Despite normal renal-bladder ultrasound after a first pyelonephritis episode, a child may still have vesicoureteral reflux, recurrent pyelonephritis and the need for surgical intervention. If voiding cystourethrogram is deferred, parents should be counseled on these risks.A prospective study of children with first acute symptomatic E. coli urinary tract infection. Early 99mtechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid scan appearances.Between 1985 and 1987 102 children, age 0-14 years, presented with a first acute symptomatic E. coli urinary tract infection. Investigations included early 99mtechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan (which was performed at a median of 27 days), ultrasonography, micturating cysto-urethrography and indirect voiding radionuclide cystography using 99mTc DTPA. Follow-up DMSA scan was carried out after 6 months. Twenty-one of 102 of initial DMSA studies showed diminished uptake of radionuclide and 12 showed cortical scarring. Twenty-nine patients had significant vesicoureteral reflux (VUR). The finding of diminished uptake on the initial scan was significantly associated with fever, systemic upset, length of symptoms and a peripheral blood leucocytosis, (p less than 0.05). In addition the finding was associated with fever and loin pain in the older child. Both diminished uptake and scarring were more common in refluxing kidney units. We propose that, in children with UTI, diminished uptake on early DMSA scan localises infection in the renal parenchyma.Should renal ultrasonography be done routinely in children with first urinary tract infection?To reassess the impact of renal ultrasonography on the care of children with first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) we conducted a computer search and review of medical records of (1) all children who were admitted to our hospital with first febrile urinary tract infection and underwent renal ultrasonography during a 25-month period beginning February 1, 1995, (2) all children diagnosed by ultrasound to have hydronephrosis during the same time period. Of a total of 124 patients with UTI, renal ultrasound appeared normal or showed evidence of acute pyelonephritis in 105 (84.7%), and in another nine (7.2%) it showed only minor findings. In 10 children (8.1%) ultrasound showed hydronephrosis and/or hydroureter. In eight of the latter 10, voiding cystourethrography showed vesicoureteral reflux; in one, posterior urethral valves; and in one, who had a unilateral nonobstructed dilatated system, cystography appeared normal. Except for the last patient, who was given prophylactic antibiotics and continued to have urinary tract infections, in no other case did ultrasound alone have any impact on the patient's management. Four children with both abnormal-appearing renal ultrasound and voiding cystourethrography required surgical intervention. One hundred of the 124 children had a voiding cystourethrogram. In 38 children it detected vesicoureteral reflux and, in another two, bladder abnormalities. Thirty-five of those with abnormal-appearing cystogram but without an indication for surgery were given prophylactic antibiotics. During the same 25-month period, 63 children without urinary tract infection were diagnosed by ultrasound with hydronephrosis. In 45 of them (71.4%) the urologic abnormality had already been detected by prenatal ultrasound. Fourteen of these 45 children (31.1%) required surgery, all for congenital anomalies related to obstructive uropathy. We conclude that routine renal ultrasonography in children with first urinary tract infection has negligible influence on their clinical management. This seems to be due to the recent widespread use, in industrialized countries, of maternal-fetal ultrasonography, which already detects a significant number of children with congenital obstructive uropathy prenatally. On the other hand imaging of the lower urinary tract is of high yield and contributes significantly to patient care. Therefore, whereas imaging of the lower urinary tract should continue to be done routinely in children with first urinary tract infection, renal ultrasound may be reserved for more select cases.Paediatric urinary tract infection and the necessity of complete urological imaging.To evaluate voiding cysto-urethrography (VCUG) in assessing children with urinary tract infection (UTI) when renal/bladder ultrasonography and renal scintigraphy show no abnormality.A total of 468 renal scintigrams taken in children for an indication of UTI between January 1996 and December 1998 were reviewed. The renal and bladder ultrasonograms of those children with a normal renal scan were then reviewed. Children with both normal renal scans and normal ultrasonography were then evaluated for the frequency and grade of vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR) on VCUG.Of the 468 patients, 453 (97%) had complete imaging studies; 152 of the children evaluated had normal renal scans, of whom 101 had a normal renal ultrasonogram. Twenty-three (23%) children with both a normal renal scan and renal/bladder ultrasonogram showed VUR on VCUG, of whom 14 had bilateral VUR and 13 grade III or higher VUR.This study indicates that about 23% of patients may have significant VUR despite both a normal renal scan and ultrasonogram. Therefore, VCUG remains important in evaluating and managing children with UTI.Vesicoureteric reflux in Kuwaiti children with first febrile urinary tract infection.The prevalence of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) varies among different racial groups. The purpose of this study was to determine the frequency of VUR and associated renal changes in a group of Arab Kuwaiti children with their first documented febrile UTI and to compare our findings with those reported from other racial groups. One hundred and seventy-four children (38 males and 136 females) fulfilled the study criteria and were divided into three age groups (<1 year, 1-5 years, and >5 years). Patients in each group had both micturating cystourethrography (MCUG) and 99m-Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan after diagnosis. VUR was detected in 39 children (22%). Two-thirds of cases had mild reflux (grade I and II). Females ( n=32) had more reflux than males ( n=7) (24% vs. 18%). Sixty-three patients (36%) had abnormal (DMSA) renal scans (acute pyelonephritis [AP] or renal scars). Of these, 79% were children below 5 years. Abnormal DMSA scans were found in 4 of 38 males (11%) versus 59 of 136 females (43%). Abnormal scans in children with VUR were seen in 1 of 7 males (14%) versus 19 of 32 females (59%). In total, the combination of abnormal scan with VUR occurred in 1 of 38 males (3%) and in 19 of 136 females (14%), whereas abnormal scan without demonstrable VUR was seen in 3 of 38 males (8%) versus 40 of 136 females (29%). Our data showed that the frequency of VUR in Arab Kuwaiti children with febrile UTI is midway between Caucasian and other racial groups. In this study, males had a lower-risk profile than females, the latter having a higher rate of reflux as well as a higher rate of abnormal DMSA scans, irrespective of demonstrable VUR.Does urinary tract ultrasonography at hospitalization for acute pyelonephritis predict vesicoureteral reflux?We evaluate the correlation between urinary tract ultrasound during hospitalization for acute pyelonephritis with subsequent voiding cystourethrography in children.Medical records were reviewed of 184 children up to 18 years old who were evaluated with ultrasound during hospitalization for acute pyelonephritis between January 1988 and January 1996. Followup voiding cystourethrography results were compared to the initial ultrasound findings.Ultrasound was performed at mean hospital day 2.1 and voiding cystourethrography was done 39 days later. Of the ultrasound studies 77 (42%) were abnormal, and two-thirds of these abnormalities were upper tract dilatation. Subsequent voiding cystourethrography was performed in 76% of the study population, including 67% of those with normal and 87% of those with abnormal ultrasound. Voiding cystourethrography revealed reflux in 39% of children with upper tract dilatation compared to 35% of those with normal and 36% with abnormal ultrasound for any reason. In addition, the severity of reflux on voiding cystourethrography could not be predicted by ultrasound findings.Ultrasound findings during acute pyelonephritis do not correlate with and are not predictive of the presence or grade of vesicoureteral reflux on subsequent voiding cystourethrography.Alternative approaches to the prognostic stratification of mild to moderate primary vesicoureteral reflux in children.We compared the prognostic stratification of primary vesicoureteral reflux by performing staging voiding cystourethrography in all children with a urinary tract infection or only in those with renal scarring on 99mtechnetium-dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Staging voiding cystourethrography and DMSA scintigraphy were performed in 105 children with a urinary tract infection and reflux persistence was assessed by radionuclide cystography after a 2-year followup.Staging voiding cystourethrography revealed no reflux in 51 children (DMSA positive in 3), grades I to II reflux in 21 (DMSA positive in 6) and grade III reflux in 33 (DMSA positive in 19). On followup radionuclide cystography no new reflux was detected, and it was no longer demonstrated in 23 children (8 with grade III and 15 with grades I to II reflux). The finding of grade III reflux on staging voiding cystourethrography had a 76% positive and a 92% negative value for predicting persistent reflux with an 87% predictive accuracy. Limiting the evaluation of voiding cystourethrography data to the 28 children with a positive DMSA scan the combination of renal scarring and grade III reflux had an 84% positive and an 83% negative predictive value with 83% accuracy. This approach would have prevented 77 children from having to undergo voiding cystourethrography.Performance of staging voiding cystourethrography exclusively in children with renal scarring on a DMSA scan resulted in predictive accuracy that was close to what was achieved by performing voiding cystourethrography in all children with a urinary tract infection. To be able to limit cystourethrography to a select population could prove to be cost-effective.Accuracy of early DMSA scan for VUR in young children with febrile UTI.To evaluate the accuracy of an acute (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan in predicting dilating vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) among young children with a febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).The medical records of children (≤ 2 years of age), presenting with febrile UTI between January 2000 and December 2011, were retrospectively reviewed.A total of 523 children were included in this study, of whom 397 children (75.9%) had abnormal DMSA results and 178 children (34.0%) were identified as VUR on micturating cystourethrography (MCU). Among all the patients, the number of children with dilating VUR was 151 (28.9%). The rate of abnormal results on DMSA for the dilating VUR group was significantly higher than the rates for the non-VUR and low-grade VUR groups (P < .01). In the <6 months age group and ≥ 6 months age group, the sensitivities of DMSA in predicting dilating VUR were 96.15% and 100.0%, respectively, the negative predictive values were 97.26% and 100.0%, respectively, and the negative likelihood ratios were 0.0911 and 0.0000, respectively.For children ≤ 2 years of age with a febrile UTI, an acute DMSA scan is valuable in the exclusion of dilating VUR. The likelihood of the presence of dilating VUR on MCU is rather low when the result of DMSA is negative. DMSA should be conducted to assess the need for an MCU.Abnormal dimercapto-succinic acid scans predict an increased risk of breakthrough infection in children with vesicoureteral reflux.The management of high grade vesicoureteral reflux remains controversial, with breakthrough infections being an indication for surgical repair. We sought to determine if technetium dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scan could help predict which children are at risk for breakthrough urinary tract infection.A retrospective review was performed on children presenting with a febrile urinary tract infection and prenatal hydronephrosis who were found to have vesicoureteral reflux and underwent a DMSA scan. Reflux was tabulated according to the highest grade. DMSA results were graded as 0-normal, no parenchymal or size defects, grade 1-focal parenchymal defects or less than a quarter of a renal unit involved, or grade 2-severe defects to include at least half of a renal unit, bilateral defects or unilateral atrophy.A total of 120 consecutive patients were evaluated. An abnormal DMSA scan was documented in 57 (33 females and 24 males), and 35 with grade 1 and 22 with grade 2 defects. Of the patients 53 females and 10 males had a normal scan. Of the 57 children with an abnormal DMSA scan 6% presented with grades 1 and 2 vesicoureteral reflux, 24% with grade 3, 38% with grade 4 and 26% with grade 5. Of the children with grades 3 to 5 reflux 60% had a subsequent breakthrough infection. Of the 63 children with a normal DMSA scan 11% presented with grade 1 reflux, 28% with grade 2, 48% with grade 3, 11% with grade 4 and 2% with grade 5. Of these children 5 had a subsequent breakthrough infection.An abnormality on DMSA scan in the presence of grade 3 to 5 reflux correlates with a greater chance of having a breakthrough infection (60%). We conclude that children with grade 3 to 5 vesicoureteral reflux and an abnormal DMSA scan are at increased risk for breakthrough urinary tract infection.Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy instead of voiding cystourethrography for infants with urinary tract infection.We study the ability of dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy to predict the presence of dilating vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in infants with urinary tract infection (UTI) to simplify the evaluation protocol.A retrospective analysis of the records of 303 children younger than 2 years with initial UTI investigated with DMSA scintigraphy and voiding cystourethrography (VCU) within 3 months after UTI was performed.In 156 of the 303 children (51%) DMSA scintigraphy showed renal lesions. VUR was found in 80 patients (26%) and VUR grade significantly correlated with the presence of renal lesions. A normal DMSA scintigraphy and dilating VUR (grade III) occurred in 7 infants. At followup after 1 to 2 years, 6 of these 7 patients had normal DMSA scans and 1 had a scarred duplex kidney. VUR resolved spontaneously in 5 and improved spontaneously to grade 1 in 2 patients. None of the 7 children had recurrent UTI.DMSA scintigraphy in infants with UTI may replace VCU as a first line investigation. A strategy to perform VCU in only patients with renal lesions is proposed. In this study 147 of 303 VCUs would have been unnecessary as only 1 child with a damaged kidney was missed.[Usefulness of renal scintigraphy in the assessment of the first febrile urinary infection in children].The objective of this study was to compare the findings of renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection to determine which method is better in detecting patients at risk of renal injury or reflux.Thirty-three children between 0.2 and 12.3 years of age with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy. In 24 patients (72.7%) a voiding cystourethrography was made. The patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years of age (n = 14) and those over 2 years old (n = 19).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 23 patients (69.7%) and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 2 (6.1%; p < 0.05). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (84.2% vs 50%; p < 0.05). There were no differences between girls and boys. Reflux was demonstrated in 13 patients (54.2%). Among those kidneys which presented abnormal cortical scintigraphy, vesicoureteral reflux was present in 76.5% of the studies. Furthermore, of those with abnormal ultrasonography vesicoureteral reflux was present in 17.6%.We found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection. The cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes. The incidence of vesicoureteral reflux in febrile urinary tract infection is high. When there is a renal cortical defect the risk of reflux is higher. This suggests that cortical scintigraphy should be added to the initial examination of children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection and this could be supplemented by voiding cystourethrography alone, with ultrasonography having a secondary role.The initial renal ultrasound examination in children with urinary tract infection: the prevalence of dilated uropathy has decreased.Pelvocalyceal dilatation (PCD) is often detected by sonography during the prenatal period. Prenatal detection of PCD should affect the prevalence of PCD in children with urinary tract infection (UTI).To determine the prevalence of abnormal sonographic findings in a population of children undergoing first imaging evaluations after UTI and to determine if the prevalence has changed from an earlier study at the same institution.The findings on consecutive first renal and bladder sonographic examinations in 844 children (745 girls, 99 boys) with UTI were retrospectively reviewed. Cystograms were performed in 743/844 (494 nuclear, 249 fluoroscopic). Only children with known congenital malformations or other significant disease were excluded.Sonography was abnormal in 141/844 (16.7%). PCD was noted in 27/844 (3.2%), with mild PCD in 18/844 (2.1%) and moderate or severe PCD in 9/844 (1.1%). Hydroureter without PCD was noted in 6/844 (0.7%). Parenchymal abnormalities were present in 42/844 (5.0%) and bladder wall thickening in 43/844 (5.1%). Vesicoureteral reflux was present in 186/743 (25.0%). When compared to historical controls, PCD and hydroureter were significantly less prevalent than 1 decade earlier (P < 0.0001).The prevalence of PCD in children under first imaging evaluation for UTI declined significantly during the last decade. These data may be useful in the design of imaging strategies for children with UTI.Imaging methods in the study of urinary tract infections in children.When studying a child with urinary tract infection it is important to detect and localize any renal (scar) or urologic anomaly. Here we study the information obtained using: renal and vesical ultrasound (US), DMSA scan and radiologic or isotopic cystogram.We studied 148 children with more than one urinary infection and/or pyelonephritis; their mean age was 35.9 months (1-148 months); 55% were girls. The three diagnostic examinations--US, DMSA scan and cystogram were made in this order; the DMSA scan or cystogram was never made sooner than one month after the UTI.In 42% of the children the three exams were normal; 4 of these children had another UTI and the urodynamic study revealed vesical disfunction. 11% had renal scars (DMSA scan) with normal US and cystogram; 30% had VUR, 50% of which had an altered US and 57% had renal scars on the DMSA scan. 12% of the children had an altered US with a cystogram showing no VUR; 66% of these had renal scars. 4% had vesical anomalies in the US and cystogram.The three exams chosen were able to direct the diagnostic approach of UTI, being sufficient in most of the cases. We would like to emphasize the importance of the DMSA scan in diagnosing unsuspected renal scars.Ureteric jet Doppler waveform: is it a reliable predictor of vesicoureteric reflux in children?The purpose of our prospective study was to find out whether ureteric jet Doppler waveform (UJDW) could be a reliable predictor of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children, compared with echo-enhanced voiding ultrasonography (VUS). Echo-enhanced VUS was performed in 75 children, 57 girls and 18 boys, aged 3 years to 12 years, following the accepted indications for this procedure. During the same procedure the measurement of UJDW was also performed and was considered to be successful (in 70 children) when at least ten UJDWs were recorded per ureteric unit. Depending on the shape of the UJDWs, the sequences were classified into three groups: monophasic, suggestive of VUR; complex, not suggestive of VUR; and mixed sequence, suggestive of VUR when a certain ratio between monophasic and complex UJDWs was achieved. When all three sequences were taken into account, the overall sensitivity and specificity of this method in detecting VUR were 88.5% and 82.3%, respectively. These values seem high enough for this method to be considered as a good alternative to invasive micturating cystographies in screening children for VUR.Evaluation of imaging studies for vesicoureteral reflux in infants with first urinary tract infection.Routine imaging studies following first urinary tract infection(UTI) in infancy are clinically used to identify who has vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and acute pyelonephritis or renal scars. The potential value of these images in avoiding children acquiring renal complication and whether the children benefited from these examinations were not well justified.Analysis was undertaken of 114 infants (228 renal units) at the time of first documented UTI. All underwent renal ultrasound, voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) and dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan on admission and repeated follow-up VCUG, DMSA or both after 4-6 months if initial examinations showed abnormal at first time. The VUR on VCUG when UTI and its statistical correlations with both acute and follow-up DMSA renal scan revealing renal scar were calculated.Seventeen children (14.9%) had VUR detected by VCUG. Forty-six patients (40.4%) had abnormal findings on acute DMSA renal scans (acute pyelonephritis or renal scars). The sensitivity, specificity, positive prediction rate and negative prediction rates of DMSA for VUR were 63%, 82.6%, 32.7% and 94.3%, respectively. The initial identified VUR versus renal scarring on follow-up DMSA showed little correlation.There is limited effectiveness of routine investigation by VCUG in infants with first confirmed UTI. VCUG may be withheld in a child who presents with first UTI before the age of one year if there has been no demonstrable abnormal DMSA scan.Ultrasonography in the radiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection.A prospective blind study comparing the findings of ultrasonography, intravenous pyelography, and voiding cystourethrography was conducted on 81 patients to examine the place of ultrasonography in the initial radiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection. The patients' mean age was 4.8 years; 15 were male. Forty-eight were inpatients (mean age, 3.2 years) and 33 were outpatients (mean age 7.2 years). In 29 patients (35.8%) abnormality of the urinary system was detected by one or more of the three imaging procedures; 21 were inpatients and eight were outpatients. The most frequent finding was vesicoureteral reflux, occurring in 62.1% of the pathologic cases. The findings at ultrasonography correlated well with those of intravenous pyelography in 73 of the 81 studies (90.1%), but they failed to demonstrate double collecting systems and several of the minor changes. However, ultrasonography in combination with cystourethrography identified all patients who had abnormal urinary systems, except for two children with negligible findings. Moreover, ultrasonography and cystourethrography together identified all 11 patients, nine of them inpatients, in whom surgical treatment was indicated. It is concluded that ultrasonography can successfully replace intravenous pyelography as a screening imaging procedure for the urinary system, but because of the superiority of intravenous pyelography in the detection of some types of lesions, intravenous pyelography will be required whenever ultrasonography or cystourethrography results are abnormal.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Transient pyelonephritic changes on 99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan for at least five months after infection.A prospective study was performed on 185 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI), 130F and 55M, having a median age of 0.9 y (range 0.1-9.8) at the time of UTI. The aim of the study was to find out how the 99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan should be used to investigate UTI, and to follow the development of renal changes during pyelonephritis into subsequent permanent renal damage. All children were investigated with a DMSA scan within 5 days after admission and after 3.9-53.3 (median 9.2) weeks, and 159 were studied again after approximately 2 y (range 1.5-3.9 y). They all underwent micturition cystourethrography at the time of the second study. At the time of infection, the DMSA scan was abnormal in 85% of the children, in 58% at the first follow-up and in 36% at the second follow-up. An abnormal DMSA scan performed within 20 weeks from infection became normal in 38% of cases on the third study, while only 1/10 abnormal DMSA scans performed more than 20 weeks after infection became normal after 1.5-3.9 y. Persistent renal changes were more common in children > 4 y of age than in children < or = 1 y of age. Two months after the presenting infection, it was unusual to see a normal DMSA scan in a child with a VUR gr. > or = 3. The study suggests that DMSA changes after an index UTI may be transient for a longer period of time than has been previously considered. Therefore, in order to detect persistent changes, a DMSA scan should be performed more than 5 months after UTI.Urinary tract infection in the newborn: clinical and radio imaging studies.The objective of this study was to assess clinical characteristics and results of radio imaging studies and compare community-acquired urinary tract infection (UTI) with nosocomial UTI in 301 neonates with UTI consecutively admitted to 28 neonatal units in Spain over 3 years (community-acquired UTI, n = 250; nosocomial UTI, n = 51). UTI was diagnosed in the presence of symptoms of infection together with any colony growth for a single pathogen from urine obtained by suprapubic aspiration, or >or=10(4) CFU/ml for a single pathogen from urine obtained by urethral catheterization. Abnormal renal ultrasound was present in 37.1% of cases (34% in community-acquired UTI and 54.5% in nosocomial UTI, P < 0.01). The voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) showed vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in 27% of cases (23.8% in community-acquired UTI and 48.6% in nosocomial UTI, P < 0.01). In patients with abnormal renal ultrasound and VUR, renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) performed early after UTI revealed cortical defects in 69.5% of cases. However, in patients with abnormal renal ultrasound and normal VCUG, DMSA also revealed cortical defects in 39% of cases. The absence of VUR in neonates with UTI and abnormal renal ultrasound does not exclude the presence of cortical defects suggestive of pyelonephritis.[Urinary tract infections and vesicoureteral reflux as a cause of renal parenchymal damage].Infection of the urinary tract is a risk for the damage of parenchyma and kidney function. Dimercaptosuccinil acid (DMSA) scan was used based on the relation between vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), infection of the urinary tract (UTI) and parenchymal kidney damage.The number of observed children was 79, 58 (73.41%) girls and 21 (26.58%) boys: following the first UTIs, recidiv infect and with positive VUR contrast voiding cistourethrography (VCUG) and ultrasound tests were compelted following the treatment of infect within 6 weeks and DMSA within 4 months. The classification of VUR was done of I to V degrees. The damage to the renal parenchyma after DMSA was defined as inhomogen distribution, reduced bonding with radio-farmake as well as portion of the kidney in the overall renal function smaller than 45%.Among 45.56% (36/79) patients VUR was registered. Reflux over III/V was registered among 27.84 (22/79) among whom 24.05% (19/79) were younger than 5 years of age. DMSA scan showed reduced kidney function bellow 45%, in one direction 33.33% (12/36) and 25.00% (9/36) in both directions. The correlation between clinically proved acute pielonephrities and damage to the parenchyma was not proven. It was proven in 30.37% (24/79) reoccurring urinal infection.DMSA is a sensitive method that should not be routinely used on every child with urinary infection. It should be left to assess the renal damage in cases of high degree reflux and reoccurring urinary infection.Vesicoureteral reflux in children with suspected and proven urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to estimate the prevalence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and clinically significant ultrasonography (US) abnormalities in a large group of children with proven and suspected urinary tract infection (UTI). The medical reports on renal US and voiding cystouretrographies (VCUG) of 2,036 children were reviewed. Renal US was performed on all children and VCUG on 1,185 children (58%). Based on the urine culture data, the UTI diagnoses were classified into five reliability classes (proven, likely, unlikely, false and no microbial data). The UTI diagnose was considered proven in 583/2036 (28.6%) and false in 145 (7.1%) cases. The prevalence of VUR was similar among those with proven and false UTI [37.4 vs. 34.8%; relative risk (RR) 1.08, 95% confidence intervals (95% CI) 0.7-1.7, P = 0.75] and decreased with increasing age (P = 0.001). Clinically significant US abnormalities occurred in 87/583 (14.9%) cases with proven UTI and significantly less often (11/145, 7.6%) in the false UTI class (RR 1.96, 95% CI 1.1-3.6, P = 0.02). Our finding supports the claim that VUR is not significantly associated to UTI and that its occurrence among children even without UTI is significantly higher than traditional estimates. This challenges the recommendations of routine VCUG after UTI.Acute 99mTc DMSA scan predicts dilating vesicoureteral reflux in young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection: a population-based cohort study.This study aimed to examine the ability of acute (99m)Tc DMSA scan for predicting dilating (grades III-V) vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) after a first febrile urinary tract infection in children aged 2 years or younger.All children underwent ultrasonography (US), (99m)Tc DMSA scan, and voiding cystourethrography. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic curves were performed to assess the diagnostic accuracy for predicting dilating VUR. Follow-up scan was performed at least 6 months after the acute infection to evaluate the presence of renal scarring (RS) or new scars.Of the 473 children analyzed (289 boys and 184 girls; median age, 5 months), 282 (59.6%) had abnormal acute (99m)Tc DMSA scan findings. There was VUR in 153 children (32.3%), whereas 95 (20.1%) had dilating VUR. The sensitivity and negative predictive value in predicting dilating VUR were 95.8% and 97.9%, respectively, for (99m)Tc DMSA and 97.9% and 98.6%, respectively, for combined US and (99m)Tc DMSA, whereas the positive and negative likelihood ratios were 1.90 and 0.08, respectively, for (99m)Tc DMSA and 1.57 and 0.06, respectively, for combined studies. On multivariate analysis, dilating VUR was a predictor for developing RS and new scars.Our results reveal the usefulness of acute (99m)Tc DMSA scan for predicting dilating VUR in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection. A voiding cystourethrography is indicated in only children with abnormalities found on a (99m)Tc DMSA and/or a US. The presence of dilating VUR predisposes to developing RS and new scars.Procalcitonin is a marker of severity of renal lesions in pyelonephritis.In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin levels, a recently described marker of infection. We compared it with other commonly used inflammatory markers and evaluated its ability to predict renal involvement as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein, leukocyte counts, and procalcitonin levels were measured in 80 children, 1 month to 16 years of age, admitted for suspected pyelonephritis. Renal involvement was assessed by 99mTe-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 5 days after admission. The examination was repeated at least 3 months later if the first result was abnormal.In lower UTI, the mean procalcitonin (PCT) was 0.38 micrograms/L +/- 0.19 compared with 5.37 micrograms/L +/- 1.9 in pyelonephritis. In these two groups, respectively, leukocyte counts were 10939/mm3 +/- 834 and 17429/mm3 +/- 994, and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels were 30.3 mg/L +/- 7.6 and 120.8 mg/L +/- 8.9. When inflammatory markers were correlated to the severity of the renal lesion as ranked by DMSA scintigraphy, we found a highly significant correlation with plasma levels of PCT, but borderline significance with CRP and none with leukocyte counts. Patients without vesicoureteral reflux had a mean PCT of 5.16 micrograms/L +/- 2.33, which was not significantly different from that in patients with reflux who had a mean PCT of 5.76 micrograms/L +/- 3.49. For the prediction of renal lesions at admission, CRP had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 26.1%. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 70.3% and 82.6%, respectively.We conclude that serum PCT levels were increased significantly in children with febrile UTI when renal parenchymal involvement (assessed by DMSA scintigraphy) was present and allowed for prediction of patients at risk of severe renal lesions.Renal cortical involvement in children with first UTI: does it differ in the presence of primary VUR?The aim of this study was to investigate the influence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphic patterns in children with first symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI).A total of 45 children with the diagnosis of first symptomatic UTI (28 girls, 17 boys, mean age 18 months, range 1 month-11 years) were reviewed. All DMSA scans were obtained within 2 months of bacteriologically proven UTI (median 21 days, mean 26 +/- 21, 14). After the exclusion of the patients with bilateral cortical lesions, 82 renal units were analyzed. The scintigraphic patterns included regional and global description of renal cortical abnormality (normal or decreased differential renal function, regional renal function (RRF), and the number and severity of cortical lesions).Vesicoureteral reflux was detected in 26 (32%) renal units (15 with grade 1-2, 11 with grade 3-4). Renal cortical abnormality was observed in 10 renal units without VUR (10/56, 17%) and 13 renal units with VUR (13/26: 50%). Of the 15 renal units, 5 with grade 1-2 VUR (5/15) and 8 of the 11 renal units with grade 3-4 VUR (8/11) had renal cortical involvement. The most common scintigraphic pattern in the patients without VUR was the preserved RRF (>or=45%) and two or fewer photon-deficient areas. On the other hand, a decreased RRF (<45) associated with cortical lesions was the most frequent finding in patients with refluxing kidneys (8/26, 30%), especially in those with grade 3-4 disease.This investigation showed that the presence of VUR affects DMSA patterns in children with first symptomatic UTI.DMSA scan for revealing vesicoureteral reflux in young children with urinary tract infection.The objective of this study was to assess the ability of acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy for revealing vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in young children after a first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Children aged<or=24 months and were admitted with a first febrile UTI during a 5-year period were evaluated. The ability of acute DMSA scintigraphy to reveal dilating (grades 3-5) or severe (grades 4-5) VUR was assessed by comparing DMSA scan findings with those of voiding cystourethrography.Of the 296 children included, 46 had dilating and 25 severe VUR. Abnormal DMSA scan results were associated with an odds ratio of 4.36 for dilating and 5.50 for severe VUR. For detecting dilating VUR, the area under the curve (AUC) was 0.68, the positive likelihood ratio (LR) was 2.00, and the negative LR was 0.46; for severe VUR, those values were 0.69, 2.10, and 0.38, respectively. Children with abnormal DMSA scan results combined with abnormal ultrasonography had an odds ratio of 3.60 for dilating and 6.32 for severe VUR. Despite normal findings on both investigations, 12 children had dilating and 4 severe VUR. For dilating VUR, the area under the (AUC) was 0.65, the positive LR was 1.70, and the negative LR was 0.47; for severe VUR, the values were 0.69, 1.90, and 0.29, respectively.Our data suggest that acute DMSA scintigraphy has limited overall ability in identifying VUR and should not be endorsed as replacement for voiding cystourethrography in the evaluation of young children with a first febrile UTI.Different guidelines for imaging after first UTI in febrile infants: yield, cost, and radiation.To evaluate the yield, economic, and radiation costs of 5 diagnostic algorithms compared with a protocol where all tests are performed (ultrasonography scan, cystography, and late technetium(99)dimercaptosuccinic acid scan) in children after the first febrile urinary tract infections.A total of 304 children, 2 to 36 months of age, who completed the diagnostic follow-up (ultrasonography, cystourethrography, and acute and late technetium(99)dimercaptosuccinic acid scans) of a randomized controlled trial (Italian Renal Infection Study 1) were eligible. The guidelines applied to this cohort in a retrospective simulation were: Melbourne Royal Children's Hospital, National Institute of Clinical Excellence (NICE), top down approach, American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), and Italian Society of Pediatric Nephrology. Primary outcomes were the yield of abnormal tests for each diagnostic protocol; secondary outcomes were the economic and radiation costs.Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was identified in 66 (22%) children and a parenchymal scarring was identified in 45 (15%). For detection of VUR (47/66) and scarring (45/45), the top down approach showed the highest sensitivity (76% and 100%, respectively) but also the highest economic and radiation costs (€52 268. 624 mSv). NICE (19/66) and AAP (18/66) had the highest specificities for VUR (90%) and the Italian Society of Pediatric Nephrology had the highest specificity (20/45) for scars (86%). NICE would have been the least costly (€26 838) and AAP would have resulted in the least radiation exposure (42 mSv).There is no ideal diagnostic protocol following a first febrile urinary tract infection. An aggressive protocol has a high sensitivity for detecting VUR and scarring but carries high financial and radiation costs with questionable benefit.Urinary tract infection: a comparison of four methods of investigation.The optimal regimen for investigating children with urinary tract infection (UTI) remains uncertain. Ultrasonography, contrast micturating cystourethrography (MCU), intravenous urography (IVU), and technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) studies were performed in 58 children with UTI under 14 years of age attending two teaching hospitals and the results compared. All four investigations were normal in 12 children. In 36 with vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) on MCU, dilatation was reported on ultrasonography in eight children. Radiological renal scarring was seen in 20 children; it was suspected on ultrasonography in nine, with dilatation alone in four, and a normal report in seven. Duplex kidneys identified on IVU were unrecognised on ultrasonography or DMSA studies; ultrasonography showed no change corresponding to presumed acute defects on DMSA studies that later resolved. Disparities were observed at all ages. This study suggests that ultrasonography is unreliable in detecting VUR, renal scarring, or inflammatory change and, alone, is inadequate for investigating UTI in children.Comparison of DMSA scintigraphy with intravenous urography for the detection of renal scarring and its correlation with vesicoureteric reflux.A series of 208 patients was prospectively assessed for reflux nephropathy by intravenous urography (IVU) and 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinate (DMSA) scintigraphy. All patients were studied at least 3 months after their most recent urinary tract infection and micturating cystourethrography (MCU) was performed prior to the scintigraphic studies. DMSA scintigraphy detected significantly more cortical abnormalities than did IVU. There was also a correlation between cortical abnormalities in the DMSA studies and the degree of reflux on MCU. The validity of DMSA as a cortical imaging agent is evaluated and the histological evidence for its efficacy derived from the animal model is reviewed, lending weight to its establishment as the "gold standard" for renal cortical scarring.Accuracy of cystosonography in the diagnosis of vesicourethral reflux in children.Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) is found in 1% of all children and in 30%-50% of those with urinary tract infection. Furthermore, VUR in childhood is the main reason for pyelonephritis, hypertension and chronic kidney disease. Recently, a variety of procedures with low radiation have been recommended for diagnosis of VUR. Therefore, in this study, voiding urosonography (VUS) or cystosonography was performed for evaluation of VUR and for comparing it with radio nucleotide cystography (RNC). We studied 25 children admitted with initial diagnosis of VUR in our center in the year 2007. Simultaneously, RNC and VUS were performed for all the patients. VUR was detected in eight patients with the VUS procedure and in nine children with RNC. Another patient was diagnosed only by RNC, and two other patients by only VUS. The two methods were concordant in detection and exclusion of urinary reflux in 87% (P: 0.000, r: 0.728). Furthermore, the diagnosis of various grades of reflux by these two schemes were comparable (P: 0.0000, r: 0.724). Sensitivity and specifity of VUS was determined as 87% and 88%, respectively, with a 94% positive predictive value and a 77% negative predictive value. We conclude that VUS is a highly accurate, safe and inexpensive tool for the screening, diagnosis and follow-up of VUR.Identification of children requiring radiologic evaluation for urinary infection.Sixty-nine children younger than 13 years of age with urinary tract infection were evaluated to identify risk factors for treatable urologic problems; i.e. those requiring surgery or prolonged antibiotic prophylaxis. All children had a renal ultrasound, intravenous pyelogram and voiding cystogram performed 4 to 6 weeks after the infection. Eleven children with treatable problems were identified, 10 with vesicoureteral reflux and 1 with a ureterocele. For identification of treatable problems the predictive value of a positive test was: (1) fever, 10 of 24 (41.7%); (2) abnormal D-deaminoarginine vasopressin renal concentrating ability, 8 of 24 (33.3%); (3) serum C-reactive protein greater than or equal to 1.0, 8 of 25 (32.0%); (4) Elevated urine N-acetylglucosaminidase, 5 of 16 (31.2%); (5) erythrocyte sedimentation rate greater than or equal to 25, 6 of 21 (28.6%); and (6) age less than 5 years, 10 of 43 (23.3%). Absence of fever denotes a low risk (less than 3%) of finding a treatable problem. Afebrile girls older than 5 years of age can have radiologic evaluation deferred until infection recurs. The presence of fever indicates a high risk of treatable urologic problems (41.7%) and warrants complete radiologic evaluation with the first urinary infection.Predictive value of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux in children.We aimed to determine the predictability of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI). Data of children with febrile UTI who underwent voiding cystoureterography between 2002 and 2005 were evaluated retrospectively for clinical (age, gender, fever > or = 38.5 degrees C, recurrent UTI), laboratory [leukocytosis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), pyuria, serum creatinine (S(Cr))] and imaging (renal ultrasonography) variables. Children with VUR (group 1) vs. no VUR (group 2) and children with high-grade (III-V) VUR (group 3) vs. no or low-grade (I-II) VUR (group 4) were compared. Among 88 patients (24 male), 38 had VUR and 21 high-grade VUR. Fever > or = 38.5 degrees C was associated with VUR [odds ratio (OR): 7.5]. CRP level of 50 mg/l was the best cut-off level for predicting high-grade VUR (OR 15.5; discriminative ability 0.89 +/- 0.05). Performing voiding cystourethrography based on this CRP level would result in failure to notice 9% of patients with high-grade VUR, whereas 69% of children with no/low-grade VUR would be spared from this invasive test. In conclusion, fever > or = 38 degrees C and CRP > 50 mg/l seem to be potentially useful clinical predictors of VUR and high-grade VUR, respectively, in pediatric patients with UTI. Further validation of these findings could limit unnecessary voiding cystourethrography.[Urethrocystography in children. Practical considerations of irradiation doses].Rational use of voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) is imperative, as it is an invasive procedure exposing the child to ionizing radiation and other well documented risks. The objective of this study was to contribute to the achievement of a reduction in the irradiation dose in VCUG.We reviewed the medical records of a consecutive sample of 125 children that underwent VCUG in our hospital between January 1995 and June 1996.Of the 125 VCUGs, 100 were normal, 13 showed vesicoureteric reflux grade II or higher, and 12 of them presented with other anomalies. The indication for VCUG was febrile UTI in 54 children, hydronephrosis detected prenatally in 12 and other causes in 60 children. It is important to note that children with vesicoureteric reflux presented as febrile UTI or fetal hydronephrosis. The age was significantly lower in the reflux group (p < 0.01). Eleven of the 13 children with vesicoureteric reflux were less than one year of age. Ultrasound anomalies and renal scarring in Tc99 DMSA were seen in a larger proportion in the reflux group. Preliminary X-rays showed anomalies in only 3 of 125 cases.1) Vesicoureteric reflux is related to febrile UTI and fetal hydronephrosis. The other indications are questionable. 2) VCGU is not recommended following the first UTI in the evaluation of children 6 years of age or older who have a normal ultrasound and Tc99 DMSA. 3) VCUG could be substituted by a nuclear cystogram in girls who do not have a history of voiding dysfunction. 4) A preliminary X-ray is not justified.Ultrasonography for the detection of ureteric reflux in infants with urinary infection.Several less harmful methods than voiding cysto-urethrography for detecting significant ureteric reflux have been proposed. The present prospective study investigated whether ultrasonography was effective in identifying ureteric reflux in infants with their first febrile urinary infection. The subjects were 27 infants (24 boys and 3 girls) aged from 0 to 8 months. The urinary tract was scanned when the bladder was full, and before and during induced voiding. Infants with abnormal ultrasound findings underwent voiding cysto-urethrography. The other infants were followed and those who had a recurrence of urinary infection underwent voiding cystography. Ten children underwent cysto-urethrography, with eight refluxing ureters identified in six boys. Ultrasound revealed transient dilatation of the renal pelvis on voiding in five kidneys, transient dilatation of distal ureters in 12 and hydro-ureteronephrosis in two. Each of the five kidneys with pelvic dilatation on voiding was associated with ureteric reflux grades III or IV. Of the 17 children who did not undergo cysto-urethrography, only one had recurrence of urinary infection and was diagnosed with ureteric reflux. This girl was one of the three babies who were not scanned during voiding. More than half of the infants with febrile urinary infection were excluded from invasive examination without having recurrence of urinary infection. Thus, ultrasound scanning during voiding was effective for screening infants with their first urinary infection to detect significant ureteric reflux.Early 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.During a 2 year period, 175 children below 6 years of age (median 0.4 year) with non-obstructive symptomatic urinary tract infection were studied by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. DMSA scintigraphy was performed at a median of 10 days after the start of treatment and was abnormal in 73 children (42%), equivocal in 29 (16%) and normal in 73 (42%). Reflux was seen in 27% of all children and in 38% of the renal units that were abnormal at DMSA scintigraphy. A decreasing frequency of abnormalities at DMSA scintigraphy was seen within the first 14 days after the start of treatment. C-reactive protein and grade of reflux correlated significantly with abnormal DMSA studies. To demonstrate renal involvement in acute urinary tract infection, DMSA scintigraphy should be performed within days after the start of treatment. It is noteworthy that reflux was seen in less than half of renal units with abnormal DMSA scintigraphy.[Tc 99M DMSA scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis: correlation with laboratory tests, echography and the presence of vesico-ureteral reflux].Tc99m DMSA (dimercaptosuccinic acid) scintigraphy has a high sensitivity for the detection of cortical kidney damage.To evaluate the Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis and its association with laboratory parameters, kidney ultrasound and vesicoureteral reflux.We studied 143 children (age range 8 days, 12 years, 66% female) hospitalized with the clinical diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (first episode) with a positive urine culture and a renal scintigraphy performed within seven days of diagnosis. DMSA was considered the gold standard for the detection of cortical lesions. Its results were related to the presence of fever, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (VHS), white blood count (WBC), ultrasound examination and vesicoureteral reflux.Seventy nine percent of the population had an abnormal DMSA scan. There were no differences between sex, age and laboratory parameters in children with normal or abnormal DMSA scans, except for CRP (p <0.005). Ultrasound was coincident with the scan in 32% of patients. Eighteen percent had vesicoureteral reflux.There is a high proportion of abnormal DMSA scans in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Age-related radiological imaging in children with acute pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult in children. The aims of this retrospective study were twofold. Firstly, to correlate the clinical and laboratory manifestations of APN with the results of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan in different age groups. Secondly, to compare the DMSA renal scan, renal ultrasonography (RUS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in patients with clinical APN. The DMSA renal scan was utilized as the gold standard for renal involvement. We determined the sensitivity of these tests in febrile urinary tract infections (UTI) in three age groups: group I less than 2 years; group II 2-8 years; group III older than 8 years. During the period January 1992 through December 1998, 222 children presented with a febrile UTI. All patients had a DMSA renal scan, 208 had contrast VCUG, and 163 had RUS. The clinical and laboratory manifestation of pyelonephritis correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan in the older children than in the younger children; 85% of the DMSA renal scans were positive in group III; 69% in group II; 48% in group I (P<0.001). Vesicoureteral reflux detected by contrast VCUG was more prevalent in the younger age groups. Although high grades of reflux (grade IV-V) correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan, it did not reach a level of statistical significance (P>0.05). RUS did not correlate with a positive DMSA renal scan in any age group.Technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy in children with acute pyelonephritis: correlation with other imaging tests.INTRODUCTION. Urinary tract infection is the most common serious bacterial infection in children. The aim of this study was to compare the value of different laboratory and imaging techniques in detecting renal involvement in acute pyelonephritis. MATERIALS AND METHODS. In a cross-sectional study of patients 1 month to 14 years of age diagnosed with urinary tract infection were examined with systemic inflammatory markers, renal ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), and technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid ((99m)Tc-DMSA) renal scintigraphy. A total of 1467 pediatric patients were eligible for treatment of pyelonephritis. Evaluations included a complete blood count, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinalysis, urine culture, and measurement of serum blood urea nitrogen and creatinine levels. RESULTS. The results of (99m)Tc-DMSA scans were normal in 20.2%, mild decreased cortical uptake in 45.0%, moderate decreased cortical uptake in 12.3%, severe decreased cortical uptake in 12.0%, and decreased cortical function plus irregularity or scar formation in 10.5%. Voiding cystourethrography showed vesicoureteral reflux in 25.9%. The sensitivity of (99m)Tc-DMSA for prediction of vesicoureteral reflux was 84.1% with a negative predictive value of 80.6%. Significant differences were found in the level of blood leukocyte count (P = .03), urine leukocyte count (P = .003), ESR (P = .008), and age (P = .04) between patients with normal and abnormal (99m)Tc-DMSA scan results. CONCLUSIONS. We found that in patient with clinical signs of pyelonephritis, (99m)Tc-DMSA renal scintigraphy can detect pyelonephritis more accurately than the other inflammatory and imaging tests.Role of renal ultrasonography (RUS) and micturating cystourethrogram (MCU) in the assessment of vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR) in children and infants with urinary tract infection (UTI).Evaluating different imaging strategies in children after first febrile urinary tract infection.We conducted a retrospective multicenter review to estimate the prevalence of urological abnormalities in Chinese children with first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) and to evaluate the selective imaging strategy recommended by the NICE guideline for detecting underlying abnormalities. Atypical UTI was defined as in the NICE UTI guideline. Overall, 576 boys and 244 girls aged below 24 months were reviewed. All underwent ultrasound (US) and micturating cystourethrogram (MCUG) and 612 underwent DMSA scans. US was abnormal in 73 (8.9%) and vesicoureteral reflux was shown in 195 patients (23.8%). A total of 126 patients were considered to have remediable urological abnormalities requiring additional surgical or medical interventions. The NICE guideline yielded excellent negative predictive values (NPV) of 100-94.4% in girls but 91% in boys. If all boys underwent US and DMSA and only those with atypical UTI or abnormal US or DMSA proceeded to MCUG, then the NPV increased to 95.2% and 97.4% for boys aged below and above 6 months, respectively. These revised strategies would substantially save invasive studies-DMSA and MCUG in 27 and 74% of girls aged below and above 6 months, respectively, or MCUG in 23 and 59% of boys aged below and above 6 months, respectively.Ultrasonography as predictor of permanent renal damage in infants with urinary tract infection.To evaluate the ability of ultrasound (US) in infants (<1 year) with acute urinary tract infection (UTI), to identify those with permanent renal damage (PRD) at scintigraphy 1 year later.US, dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy and voiding cystourethrography were performed in 191 infants.US was abnormal in 46 infants (24%). PRD was found in 46 infants (24%); 19 of these had abnormal US (sensitivity 41%). In 145 infants without PRD, 27 had abnormal US (specificity 81%). Dilating reflux or verified obstruction occurred in 21 (11%) infants, of whom 18 (86%) had PRD while 28 of 170 (16%) without such diagnoses had PRD. Of 16 infants with dilating reflux, 9 (sensitivity 56%) had abnormal US and 14 (88%) PRD. Dilatation at US was seen in 27 children; 7 of these had dilating reflux and 5 verified obstruction.US performed in association with acute UTI had limited ability to identify children with PRD at (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) 1 year later, although abnormal renal size was a strong indicator of renal damage. The ability of US to identify children with dilating reflux was also limited. However, once detected at US, dilatation of the urinary tract was associated with dilating reflux or obstruction in half of the cases. Our study confirms that dilating reflux and obstruction are strong indicators of PRD but only half of those who developed PRD had such diagnoses.Acute pyelonephritis and sequelae of renal scar in pediatric first febrile urinary tract infection.To investigate the incidence of acute pyelonephritis (APN) and renal scarring in children with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI), 191 of 216 (88%) children with their first episode of UTI received (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal single-photon emission computed tomography. They were investigated within 7 days of admission and were followed for 6 months. One hundred and six patients (49.1%) underwent a voiding cystourethrogram. The incidence of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) in group I (</=1 year old) was 22%, group II (1-5 years old) 69%, and group III (5-17 years old) 44%. The overall incidence of APN in febrile UTI was 70% (male 66%, female 76%, P=0.110). Children had a higher incidence of APN than infants ( P<0.05 in group I vs. II and group I vs. III). Of patients with APN, 57% (35/61) showed renal scar formation. VUR was found in 31%(24/78) of children with APN and 58% (14/24) of children with renal scar. In addition, children with high-grade VUR were more susceptible to APN and scar formation than those with low-grade VUR ( P<0.05). Older children with a first febrile UTI had a higher incidence of APN than infants (</=1 year), and half of the children with APN developed a renal scar.Urinary tract infection in infants: a single-center clinical analysis in southern Taiwan.This study summarized the epidemiology, etiology, and susceptibility of pathogens to antibiotics, and specific characteristics in infants aged less than 4 months diagnosed with urinary tract infection in the past decade in Taiwan.The medical charts of patients aged less than 4 months admitted for urinary tract infection to Kaohsiung Veterans General Hospital between January 2001 and December 2009 were retrospectively reviewed.A total of 132 patients, with male predominance (68.9%), were enrolled. The top three pathogens were similar to those identified in previous studies in Taiwan. The most common pathogen, Escherichia coli (85.3%), was resistant to ampicillin (75.9%), followed by sulfamethoxazole/trimethoprim (31.7%), and cefazolin (28.5%). Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan revealed 34.5% positive findings, while the vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) rate was 37.8% by direct radionuclide voiding cystography and/or voiding cysto-urethrography. Positive DMSA findings significantly correlated with VUR (p<0.001) and higher C-reactive protein level (p<0.05).E coli was the most common pathogen in the present cohort, and the top three pathogens were similar to those found in general pediatric population in Taiwan. VUR was the most common genitourinary tract anomaly in this age group. Positive DMSA was well correlated with VUR and higher C-reactive protein level.The efficacy of Tc99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (Tc-DMSA) scintigraphy and ultrasonography in detecting renal scars in children with primary vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).Pyelonephritis-induced renal scarring in children is a major predisposing factor for proteinuria, hypertension, and ultimate renal failure. The aim of this study was to investigate and compare the efficacy of Tc99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (Tc-DMSA) renal scintigraphy and renal ultrasonography (USG) in detecting renal scars in children with primary vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).Tc-DMSA scan and USG studies were done in 62 children who were admitted to our clinic between 1997 and 2003 because of documented urinary tract infection (UTI) and diagnosed with primary VUR. Renal scarring detection rates of Tc-DMSA scan and USG were compared according to reflux grades.In the whole group, renal scars were detected by Tc-DMSA scan and USG in 55% and 38% of refluxing units, respectively. Detection rates of Tc-DMSA and USG according to reflux grades were as follows: 47% and 29 % in low-grade VUR (grades 1 and 2), 46 % and 25% in mid-grade VUR (grade 3), 76% and 65% in high-grade VUR (grades 4 and 5), respectively.USG was found to be an inappropriate study in the detection of renal parenchymal scars, irrespective of the reflux grade. In this study, Tc-DMSA scan detected scars in 35% of kidneys reported to be normal on USG.The role of DMSA scans in evaluation of the correlation between urinary tract infection, vesicoureteric reflux, and renal scarring.The correlation between urinary tract infection (UTI), vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) and renal scarring was studied in 89 patients (177 renal units; 1 solitary kidney) during the period 1997-2000. There were 63 males and 26 females; ages ranged from neonates to 14 years. UTI was diagnosed on the basis of a positive urine culture, VUR was diagnosed and graded by micturating cystourethrogram (MCU), and renal scarring was assessed by technetium 99 m Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Ultrasonography (US) was done to evaluate renal tract dilatation and other structural abnormalities. A follow up DMSA scan was performed approximately 6 months after the initial scan. VUR was present in 106 of the 171 renal units in which it was studied and absent in 65 units. The majority of the VUR was grade V. Renal scars were seen in 90 of 177 renal units at presentation and in 72 of the 163 renal units studied at follow-up. Some information was lacking in 31 patients; hence, the correlation between UTI, VUR, and renal scarring was done in 58 patients. The majority of the suspected scars at presentation were not seen at follow-up, but most of the established scars persisted. Only 2 renal units showed scars for the first time on follow-up. On US, approximately 50% of normal kidneys showed either suspicious or established scars on DMSA scan, and patients with bilateral abnormality on US showed renal scars. Renal scars were seen in 15 of 23 children without VUR, 17 of 18 with unilateral VUR, and 16 of 17 with bilateral VUR. Thus, there is a cause-and-effect relationship between UTI and renal scarring that is made worse by VUR. DMSA scans have been shown to be the most reliable method of assessing renal scarring, and an abnormal US scan showing upper-tract dilatation or a structural abnormality may have a predictive value in the detection of renal scarring.Contrast enhanced reflux sonography in children: a comparison to standard radiological imaging.The diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux is routinely performed by voiding cystourethrography. Especially in the course of conservative treatment, the radiation dose might increase during the years. With the development of ultrasound echo enhancing agents we assessed their diagnostic efficacy for evaluation of vesicoureteral reflux to replace voiding cystourethrography with radiation-free ultrasound.A total of 104 children with a mean age of 5.4 years were examined using echo enhancing ultrasound after informed consent was obtained. For control purposes, all children underwent standard voiding cystourethrography as well. The diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux was positive when microbubbles appeared in the ureter or renal pelvis. The sonographic findings were correlated with those obtained by standard voiding cystourethrography.Of the 208 ureter and renal units investigated vesicoureteral reflux was detected in 76 (37%) by both technologies. Diagnosis was made sonographically in 5 units and by voiding cystourethrography in 3. All reflux grades (I to V) could be identified. The specificity and sensitivity of the contrast reflux ultrasound were significantly high. The long contrast time of up to 30 minutes combined with the high contrast effect resulted in convincing images with high levels of diagnostic confidence.Our results clearly demonstrate that the diagnostic accuracy of vesicoureteral reflux by contrast enhanced ultrasound is statistically significant compared to standard radiological voiding cystourethrography. Therefore, this methodology represents an exceptional approach to reduce the number of children being exposed to ionizing radiation especially during conservative followup.Does a normal DMSA obviate the performance of voiding cystourethrography in evaluation of young children after their first urinary tract infection?To determine whether a normal technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan obviates the need for voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in evaluating young children after their first urinary tract infection (UTI).This was a 10-year retrospective review of 142 children (age < or = 2 years, 77 boys and 65 girls) who had their first UTI and were admitted to a tertiary care general hospital. The association between DMSA renal scan results and VCUG results performed 48 hours and 1 month after diagnosis was evaluated.DMSA renal scans and VCUG were performed in 142 patients. Of these, 99 patients (69.7%) had evidence of pyelonephritis, although only 2 (1.4%) had evidence of renal scarring; 42 (29.6%) had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on VCUG. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and likelihood ratio negative for abnormalities on DMSA renal scans for detecting the the presence of VUR on VCUG were 88% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 73% to 100%), 36% (95% CI = 26% to 46%), 37% (95% CI = 27% to 46%), 88 % (95% CI = 73% to 100%), and 0.33 (95% CI = 0 to 0.88), respectively.Children with a negative DMSA renal scan during their first UTI episode rarely have VUR and may never have high-grade VUR. Avoiding VCUGs in children with negative DMSA renal scans could significantly reduce the use of this potentially traumatic test.[The value of Tc99m-DMSA renal scintigraphy in evaluation of severity of parenchymal lesions in children with acute urinary tract infection].Most authors would agree that renal parenchymal defects (scars, hypoplasia, dysplasia) in children are a major risk factor for chronic renal failure, and for development of systemic hypertension in later years. The pathophysiologic changes in acute pyelonephritis include tubulointerstitial inflammation/pus with impairment of the renal microcirculation due to compression of the glomeruli, small peritubular capillaries and vasa recta by interstitial edema. The resulting ischemia has been postulated as one of the mechanisms for the decreased accumulation of DMSA in the areas of pyelonephritis. DMSA scanning has a sensitivity of up to 99%, and specificity of up to 91% for the detection of acute pyelonephritis.The aim of the study was to investigate the value of Tc99m-DMSA scan in children with acute urinary tract infection, to estimate the degree of parenchymal changes, and to assess the relationship with vesicoureteral reflux.We reviewed 116 infants aged 0-15 years, 100 (86.2%) female and 16 (13.8%) male, who were hospitalized for urinary tract infection during a 5-year period (1996-2000). The mean age at diagnosis was 3.7 years.Escherichia colli was isolated in 52 (44.8%) urine cultures. All patients underwent ultrasonography, which was normal in 57 (49.1%) infants. Tc99m-DMSA was performed after two weeks of therapy. The renal parenchymal pathology was defined as a focal or multifocal defect of low degree in 33 (28.4%), and of high degree in 35 (30%) children. Multifocal defects were mostly found in patients aged < 3 years, and focal lesions in those aged > 3 years. Renal scars were detected in 41 (35.3%) infants with first urinary tract infection.We recommend that ultrasound, DMSA and radionuclide cystouretherogram be routinely performed in case of first urinary tract infection in infants aged < 1 year, and voiding cystourethrogram with US and DMSA in those aged > 1 year.Vesicoureteral reflux: an accurate predictor of acute pyelonephritis in childhood urinary tract infection?To determine the association between vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and the presence of acute pyelonephritis in children with urinary tract infections.The authors studied 150 consecutive patients less than 5 years of age with their first proved urinary tract infection. All patients underwent renal cortical scintigraphy (with technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid or Tc-99m gluconate) and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) to identify the presence of cortical defects and VUR, respectively.Of 300 kidneys, 88 (29.3%) had a cortical defect at scintigraphy. Fifty-four of the 88 patients (61%) did not have VUR demonstrated at VCUG. Conversely, 72 of the 300 kidneys (24%) had VUR; of these, 38 (53%) had no cortical defect. The sensitivity of VCUG in helping predict a defect was 38.6%, and the specificity was 82.1%.VUR (as shown by VCUG) and renal cortical scintigraphic defects frequently occur independently of each other. Renal cortical scintigraphy may be a more accurate predictor of patients at risk for scarring.Febrile urinary tract infections in 0- to 3-month-old infants: a prospective follow-up study.To track the clinical evolution of febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) diagnosed in 0- to 3-month-old infants and characterize uropathogen frequencies, antimicrobial resistance rates, renal abnormalities, and differences in the sexes in this age group.We observed prospectively 46 infants identified in a cohort of 209 children with first UTI diagnosed between July 2006 and July 2008 at the age of 0 to 3 months. Renal ultrasound scanning and voiding cystourethrography examinations were performed in all infants.Infants < 3 months old represented 21% of all children with first UTI. Of these children, 26% were female and 74% were male. Escherichia coli was isolated in 88% of cases and had a high rate of resistance to ampicillin (71%) and to trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole (47%); 21% of children had vesicoureteral reflux, which was of low-grade in 67% of cases, with spontaneous resolution before 2 years in all cases. In infants with normal ultrasound scanning results, a low-grade vesicoureteral reflux was subsequently found in 10% of cases.Infants aged 0 to 3 months represent 21% of children treated for febrile UTI. Boys represent 74% of these cases. E coli is responsible for 88% of UTIs, with a high rate of resistance to antibiotics. When ultrasound scanning examination results are normal, the risk of missing a significant renal abnormality is expected to be extremely low.The value of renal ultrasound in children with a first episode of urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common pediatric problem. Guidelines recommend obtaining a renal ultrasonogram (RUS) for young children after a first UTI. Our aim was to assess the value of routine RUS in the management of children hospitalized with a first episode of UTI.We conducted a retrospective review of the medical records of 130 children 12 years of age or younger admitted with a first UTI. Children were excluded if they had a urinary tract abnormality before admission and/or had been treated with an antibacterial agent within 7 days before admission. The yield of RUS was measured by ability to detect renal abnormalities, by the sensitivity and specificity for detecting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) using voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) as a gold standard, and by its influence on UTI management.RUS was conducted in 130 children, but only 118 returned for a VCUG and were included in the study. The findings were positive for VUR in 20 of 40 patients (50%) with a confirmed VUR on VCUG and positive in 18 of 78 patients (23.1%) without VUR on VCUG. Of the 20 patients with a normal RUS who showed VUR, 2 had grade I reflux, 8 had grade II reflux, 7 had grade III reflux and 3 had grade IV reflux. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of ultrasound in suggesting VUR was 50% and 76.9%, 52.6% and 75%, respectively. Except for one, the result of an abnormal RUS did not alter the management of our patients.The results of our study show that the RUS has a little value in the management of children with a first UTI.[Role of ultrasound in studying the first urinary infection in children].A retrospective study comparing the findings of ultrasonography (5 MHz transducer) versus intravenous pyelography and voiding cystourethrography was conducted in 92 patients during the course of an initial urinary tract infection (greater than or equal to 10(5) bacteriae/ml, WBC greater than 25/mm3) gathered over a period of 5 years. The average interval of time between ultrasonography and intravenous pyelography was 8 days (range 1-70). False positive results for ultrasonography were noted in 11% (5 of 45 cases), while false negatives were observed in 36% (17 of 47). Of the 47 cases of obstructive uropathy diagnosed by conventional means, ultrasonography missed the diagnosis in 1 case of ureteral duplication as well as in 16 children with vesicoureteral reflux. In comparison, intravenous pyelography missed 8 of these 21 cases of vesicoureteral reflux. Overall sensitivity of ultrasonography was mediocre at 64% but excellent at 96% after excluding cases with vesicoureteral reflux. Specificity was poor for the group of patients with vesicoureteral reflux (33%) and did not improve when they were excluded (40%). Sensitivity and specificity were comparable whatever the age group. In conclusion, we would recommend that when both ultrasonography and voiding cystourethrography are normal in children with a urinary tract infection, intravenous pyelography could safely be deferred.Retrospective study of children with acute pyelonephritis. Evaluation of bacterial etiology, antimicrobial susceptibility, drug management and imaging studies.The purpose of the study was to investigate the management of pyelonephritis in a large Italian pediatric population. A total of 1,333 patients (36% male) were considered. Escherichia coli was the most frequently isolated agent (89.9%), followed by Proteus mirabilis (3.6%) and Klebsiella oxytoca (2.1%). 27% of microorganisms were resistant to amoxicillin, 4% to amoxicillin/clavulanic acid, 11% to trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole, 2.4% to gentamicin and less than 2% to ceftazidime. Despite this resistance pattern showing that oral antibiotics, such as amoxicillin/clavulanic acid, are effective in vitro as well as parenteral antimicrobials, a parenteral antibiotic was given initially to 756 (57.2%) children. A prophylactic regimen was started in 922 patients with a rate of reinfection during prophylaxis of 9.5%; a higher rate of reinfection was observed in patients with reflux (25%) compared to children without reflux (3%) (p < 0.0001). Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 30% of patients. The number of renal abnormalities detected by DMSA in patients with and without reflux was significantly different (p < 0.001). CRP was higher in patients with scars (p < 0.02). In conclusion, pyelonephritis represents a common disease with about 2,500 days of hospitalization per year in the Veneto Region where there is a pediatric population of about 800,000 under 15 years of age. The results of antimicrobial in vitro tests indicate that amoxillicin/clavulanic acid could represent the antibiotic of choice. The high frequency of malformations, observed even in children between 6 and 12 years of age, may suggest the need of an imaging study including DMSA scan and VCUG in all age groups.Imaging the urinary tract in children with urinary tract infection.To evaluate whether ultrasonography (US) alone is sufficient in imaging the urinary tract in 1185 children with urinary tract infection (UTI).The reports on US and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) were reviewed.Initial US was normal in 861/1185 patients (73%). VCUG revealed abnormal findings in 285/861 (33%), of which grade III-V vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) comprised 97 cases (11%). During follow-up, VUR had resolved in 88/97 (91%) patients: in 50/57 (88%) patients without active treatment for VUR, in 27/29 (93%) with endoscopic and in 11/11 (100%) with open surgery for VUR. During follow-up, 11/97 patients (11%) had developed new renal scarring detectable in US, but no renal impairment occurred. Except for VUR, VCUG showed nonobstructive urethral valves in two infant boys with normal initial US. Thus, in 861 children with normal initial US, 40 patients with grade III-V VUR and two patients with significant nonreflux pathology may have benefited from surgical treatment, giving the total number of possibly missed pathological finding in 42/861 (4.9%) cases if VCUG had not been performed.We suggest that children with UTI could be examined using US alone and to use VCUG only after additional indications.Evaluation of acute pyelonephritis with DMSA scans in children presenting after the age of 5 years.It is generally believed that infants are more susceptible to development of renal scarring after pyelonephritis than children over 5 years old. This view has led to differences in investigations and treatment according to age. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the occurrence of renal parenchymal lesion in children over 5 years admitted with a first-time symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI). Between October 2000 and April 2002, 52 children aged over 5 years who were admitted to our department with probable acute pyelonephritis (APN) and a positive urine culture were included in this study. All children received antibiotics for 14 days. During the acute phase of infection, scintigraphy with technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) and ultrasonography (US) were done. Voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) was performed in all children early in the course of the illness, generally within 5-7 days of hospitalization. When scintigraphy showed renal parenchymal changes, repeat scintigraphy was done after at least 3 months to assess the progression of renal abnormalities. Of the 52 children with a first-time documented pyelonephritis, cortical scintigraphy showed renal lesion in 41 children (78.8%). US was normal in all children with normal renal scintigraphy, while it detected renal abnormalities in 16 of the 41 (39 %) with abnormal scintigraphy (p <0.0001). Topographic analysis of the 165 focal lesions showed that 42.4% were localized to the upper poles, 17.5% to the middle third, and 40% to the lower poles of the kidneys. Repeat scintigraphy showed persistent lesions corresponding to those on the initial scan in nine (28.2%) of the 32 children. Renal lesions had partly regressed in 23 (71.8%) of the patients who underwent repeat scintigraphy. Vesicoureteral reflux was observed in 13.4% of kidneys and renal parenchymal abnormalities were identified in 71.4% and 72.2% of renal units, respectively, with and without reflux ( p >0.05). In conclusion, our data did not confirm the conventional opinion that the risk of renal scarring after pyelonephritis is low in children over the age of 5 years. Our findings suggest that renal scintigraphy may be a more appropriate method of investigation than VCUG for evaluation of the children over 5 years with acute pyelonephritis. Additionally, the frequency of scintigraphic changes is high, and a strategy based exclusively on ultrasound findings would miss about 61% of the abnormal renal units. We recommend that all children, irrespective of age, will benefit from further investigations that might prevent or limit the development of scarring process and renal complications.Managing children under 36 months of age with febrile urinary tract infection: a new approach.Recent guidelines on urinary tract infection (UTI) agree on reducing the number of invasive procedures. None of these has been validated by a long-term study. We describe our 11-years experience in the application of a diagnostic protocol that uses a reduced number of invasive procedures.We reviewed retrospectively the records of 406 children aged between 1 and 36 months at their first UTI. All patients underwent renal ultrasound (RUS). Children with abnormal RUS and those with UTI recurrences underwent voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) and dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scans.RUS after the first UTI was pathological in 7.4% children; 4.4 % had a second UTI. We performed 48 VCUG: 14 patients (29%) had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), 12 of which showed an abnormal RUS while 2 had recurrent UTI. After DMSA renal scan renal damage appeared in only 6 of them (12.5%); all these children showed grade IV VUR.The application of our guidelines leads to a decrease in invasive examinations without missing any useful diagnoses or compromising the child's health.The DMSA scan in paediatric urinary tract infection.The objective of the present paper was to review the use of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan in urinary tract infection at British Columbia's Children's Hospital to determine the frequency of cortical defects and the association between vesico-ureteric reflux and the presence of cortical defects in children with urinary tract infection. A total of 129 consecutive children with a urinary tract infection referred for a DMSA scan in a 2-year period (January 1992-January 1994) were retrospectively studied. The results were analysed in terms of kidneys, and the incidence of cortical defects was determined. Eighty-eight patients (68%) had a radiographic micturating cysto-urethrogram within 6 months of the DMSA scan, and in this group the relationship of defects with vesico-ureteric reflux was determined. Overall, 81/258 (31%) of kidneys had a cortical defect on a DMSA scan. Of those who had a micturating cysto-urethrogram, 53/176 (30%) kidneys had vesico-ureteric reflux, and of those that had reflux, 21/53 (40%) had a cortical defect on a DMSA scan. In the group of children without reflux, 38/123 (31%) had a cortical defect. Renal cortical scan defects are common findings in paediatric urinary infection, and frequently occur in the absence of vesico-ureteric reflux. These defects represent either established scars or acute pyelonephritis that can proceed to scarring. The micturating cysto-urethrogram alone is insufficient as a screening modality to identify those kidneys at risk of renal scarring.Ultrasound fails to delineate significant renal pathology in children with urinary tract infections: a case for dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy.Routine radiological evaluation in children with urinary tract infections includes ultrasound. Additional dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy in this setting is a common but not routine practice to determine whether there is parenchymal injury. Because dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy involves further time, expense and radiation, we determined whether ultrasound findings could substitute for dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy. Therefore, in children with urinary tract infections we researched the incidence of discordant findings between dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy and normal ultrasound.A retrospective review of children with a history of urinary tract infections who had normal ultrasound and dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy within 6 weeks of each other was performed through a chart review. Children with pyelonephritis within 4 months of the radiological tests were excluded. Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy was considered abnormal if there was less than 40% differential function, global atrophy or focal defects.From January 2005 to December 2006, 100 children met inclusion criteria. Median patient age was 4.5 years (range 4 months to 19 years) and 84% were female. Of the 100 children 74 (74%) demonstrated vesicoureteral reflux and 18 (18%) showed abnormal dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy despite normal ultrasound. Children with vesicoureteral reflux showed an increased incidence of abnormal dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy compared to those without vesicoureteral reflux (20.3% vs 11.5%), although this did not attain statistical significance (p = 0.04).Although dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy is not part of routine practice in all children with urinary tract infections and/or vesicoureteral reflux, it is frequently abnormal despite normal ultrasound. Therefore, dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy should be considered in these patients to evaluate cortical defects and possibly guide further management.Are younger children at highest risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis?The general belief about the relation between risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis and age is that infants are at highest risk and children older than 5 years at lower risk. This assumption has led to differences in treatment based on age. The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the occurrence of renal lesions in children aged 0-16 years.Between May, 1994, and January, 1996, all children aged 0-16 years who were admitted to our department with a diagnosis of probable pyelonephritis and a positive urine culture were included in this prospective study. All patients received antibiotics for 7-21 days. During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, scintigraphy with technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) and ultrasonography were done. Voiding cystourethrography was undertaken at least 6 weeks after the end of antibiotic treatment. When scintigraphy showed renal parenchymal lesions, repeat scintigraphy was done after at least 2 months to assess the progression of renal lesions. For the analysis, children were grouped by age according to presumed risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis: high risk (< 1 year), moderate risk (1-5 years), low risk (> 5 years).201 patients were enrolled in the study (119 < 1 year, 47 aged 1-5 years, 35 > 5 years). During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, renal lesions were found in 66 (55%) infants under 1 year, in 37 (79%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 24 (69%) children older than 5 years. Of these 127 children, 108 underwent repeat scintigraphy after an average of 3 months (50 < 1 year, 36 aged 1-5 years, 22 > 5 years). Overall, renal scars were found on repeat scintigraphy in 20 (40%) infants under 1 year, in 31 (86%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 14 (64%) children older than 5 years. 38 (36%) of these 65 patients had vesicoureteric reflux. Among 88 children who had a first documented urinary-tract infection and underwent repeat scintigraphy, renal scars were found in 20 (43%) under 1 year, in 26 (84%) aged 1-5 years, and in eight (80%) older than 5 years.This study did not confirm the conventional view that the risk of renal scars after pyelonephritis diminishes with age. We believe that all children, irrespective of age, will benefit from any measure that prevents the development of renal sequelae.99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan as first investigation of urinary tract infection.A total of 115 children under 5 years who presented with a first symptomatic urinary tract infection and who had a 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan were studied to assess its value and compare the findings with those of other imaging techniques. Renal cortical defects were detected in 65 kidneys by DMSA scan, intravenous urogram, and ultrasound scan combined; 62 (95%) being seen on DMSA scan. The finding of reflux on micturating cystourethrography showed a highly significant correlation with renal defects seen on DMSA scanning, a less close but still significant correlation with abnormalities on intravenous urography, but none with ultrasound scan findings. The sensitivity of the DMSA scan in screening for all grades of reflux is estimated as 0.66, which is higher than that previously reported for the intravenous urogram or ultrasound scan. DMSA scans were less likely to miss grade 3 reflux than the other two methods. DMSA scans are more useful than other upper renal tract imaging techniques in detecting renal defects. Consideration should be given to their use as a first investigation in place of routine intravenous urograms. Ultrasound scans alone will overlook potentially serious urinary tract abnormalities.Relationship between vesicoureteral reflux and renal cortical scar development in Thai children: the significance of renal cortical scintigraphy and direct radionuclide cystography.Relationship of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), urinary tract infection (UTI) and subsequent renal scarring nowadays is still in question. This study aimed to determine 1) the incidence of cortical scarring in Thai children presenting with upper urinary tract infection, 2) the association between VUR with acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring, 3) the use of DMSA and direct radionuclide cystography (DRNC) scintigraphy in children with UTI. Sixty newly diagnosed UTI children underwent DRNC and Tc-99m DMSA renal cortical scintigraphy at the time of first UTI diagnosis and 6 months later. There were no significant differences of age, sex, type of antiobiotics and pathogens (E. coli vs non-E. coli) between those who did and did not develop scars (p>0.05). 58/98 of 1st DMSA abnormal kidneys (59.18%) developed scars. 60.20 per cent of 98 positive 1st DMSA had VUR while 80.33 per cent of 61 with VUR had positive 1st DMSA. 59.02 per cent of these 61 kidneys developed scars. Scar occurrence were 18.7 times in high grade VUR compared to low grades. In conclusion, there was a high incidence of acute pyelonephritis in the presence of VUR but acute pyelonephritis does not necessarily need VUR for its development. High grade reflux with upper UTI, is a strong indicator for renal scarring. Children presenting with UTI, irrespective of age, sex, or pathogen, should have both DMSA and DRNC scintigraphy performed to identify upper UTI and high risk patients who will develop subsequent renal scarring.[Renal scintigraphy in children with urinary tract infections].To determine the incidence of abnormal Technetium Tc 99m Dimercaptosuccinic Acid (Tc99m DMSA) renal scintigraphy findings in the children with urinary tract infection (UTI), and to evaluate the difference between the children with UTI and vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR), and the children with UTI without VUR.Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy was performed in 170 children with UTI, mean age 7.07 years (1 month to 14 years, 137 were girls and 33 were boys). In 88 of the children, VUR was proved by micturating cystouretherography (MCU), while in 82 VUR could not be detected by MCU. VUR was graded in accordance with MCU recommended by the intemational study of VUR. In 13 of the children the grade of VUR was grade I, in 30 was grade II, in 23 grade III, in 17 grade IV, while the grade V was in 5 of the children. Findings of Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy were classified as: 1--normal, 2--probably normal, 3--equivocal, 4--probably abnormal, and 5--abnormal. The degree of the significance of the difference of the findings was estimated using chi2, taking p < 0.01 as the limit of statistical significance.Of the total number of 170 studied children, the abnormal findings were detected in 30% (51/170), normal findings in 62% (106/170), and equivocal in 8% (13/170). In the children with UTI and VUR, the incidence of abnormal findings was 49% (43/88), of normal 43% (38/88), and of equivocal findings 8% (7/88). All the children with VUR grade V had the abnormal findings (the incidence of the abnormal findings was 100%). In the children with VUR grade IV, the abnormal findings were 71%. In the children with VUR grade I, 77% of the findings were normal, in the children with VUR grade II 53% of the findings were normal and in the children with VUR grade III, 30% otfthe findings of renal scintigraphy were normal. In the children with UTI without VUR, the incidence of abnormal findings was 10% (8/82), of normal findings 83% (68/82), and of equivocal findings 7% (6/82). The incidence of abnormal findings was significantly higher in the children with UTI and VUR than in those with UTI without VUR (p < 0.01). Also, the incidence of the abnormal findings was higher in the children with VUR grades IV and V than in the children with VUR grade I (p < 0.01).DMSA renal scintigraphy in the children with ITU revealed the abnormal findings in 30% of the cases. The incidence of the abnormallfindings was signficantly higher when VUR was present, as well as if the grade of VUR was higher. Our results confirmed that Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy was a very important technique in the evaluation of the children with ITU.Dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan in children with urinary tract infection.The hospital records of 247 children less than 16 years old, who had had UTI and received dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scans during the period October 1991 to October 1993, were reviewed. Abnormal DMSA renal scans were found in 207 kidneys (207/494, 41.9%) and in 163 cases (163/247, 66%). The appearance of an abnormal DMSA renal scan is correlated with fever and vesicoureteral reflux, but not with age or sex. Because the prevalence of upper UTI in children is high, DMSA renal scan is undoubtedly a valuable tool for pediatricians as a guide in giving appropriate antibiotic therapy and to prevent further renal damage.Urinary tract infection in infants and children evaluated by ultrasound.Fifty-nine pediatric patients with urinary tract infection (UTI) underwent renal ultrasonography, excretory urography, and voiding cystourethrography. The imaging procedures were analyzed retrospectively to determine their relative effectiveness in detecting abnormalities that might predispose the patient to UTI. Voiding cystourethrography provided valuable information, particularly the presence or absence of vesicoureteral reflux, that could not be obtained from the other procedures. Excretory urography was less specific than ultrasonography in the majority of patients, with the exception of those who had renal scarring. The authors recommended ultrasonography as the initial imaging procedure in the evaluation of children with UTI. When the sonogram is normal, excretory urography is not considered necessary, but voiding cystourethrography is thought to be essential. If sonography is abnormal, excretory urography and/or other follow-up studies are indicated.Imaging studies for first urinary tract infection in infants less than 6 months old: can they be more selective?This retrospective study aimed to evaluate the applicability of the selective approach of imaging infants < 6 months old with urinary tract infection (UTI) according to the UTI guidelines of the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE) 2007. Infants < 6 months old with their first UTI from January 2001 to December 2006 having undergone an ultrasound examination of the urinary tract, a micturating cystourethrogram, and a late di-mercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, were included. Their condition was evaluated against a set of risk features according to the UTI guidelines. Those having any one of these were classified as atypical and those having none as typical. There were 134 infants reviewed, with a typical (98 infants) to atypical (36 infants) ratio of 2.7 to 1. Girls were found to be relatively more represented in the atypical group [male (M):female (F) = 1.3:1] than in the typical group (M:F = 4.4:1) (P < 0.004). There were significantly more infants with abnormal micturating voiding cystourethrograms (MCUGs) (P = 0.007), more refluxing ureters (P < 0.001) and more significant vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR) (>/= grade III) (P = 0.013) in the atypical group than in the typical group; while there was no significant difference in ultrasound (US) and DMSA scan findings between the two groups. In the atypical group there was no difference in imaging studies (and, thus, the results) between the conventional practice and the NICE UTI recommendation. In the typical group, if the recommendations of the guidelines had been followed (i.e. only those with abnormal US would have been further investigated), 25 refluxing ureters and 22 scarred kidneys would have been left undiagnosed. In conclusion, application of the suggested selective imaging approach would leave a significant number of VUR and renal scars undiagnosed, and it may not be an optimal practice for infants less than 6 months old with their first UTI. The best approach remains to be clarified.Acute pyelonephritis and renal scarring in Kuwaiti children: a follow-up study using 99mTc DMSA renal scintigraphy.The aim of this study was to determine the prevalence of renal scarring in a group of Kuwaiti Arab children with their first documented acute pyelonephritis (APN). Eighty-two Kuwaiti Arab children (10 males and 72 females) who had abnormal (99m)Tc DMSA renal scan findings of acute pyelonephritis were prospectively studied with the same imaging modality 6 months after treatment to identify those who developed renal scarring. A micturition cystourethrogram (MCUG) was performed for all of the children 1 month after diagnosis. Children were divided into 3 age groups (<2 years, 2-5 years and above 5 years). The follow-up DMSA renal scans 6 months after diagnosis revealed normalization of renal changes in 56% (46 patients), much improvement with residual renal abnormality in 6% (5 patients), and persistent parenchymal defects in 38% (31 patients). Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was found in 32% of children (26/82) and the majority were between grade I and III. Thirteen of those with VUR (50%) developed renal scars on follow-up. Fifty-three percent of the scarred kidneys (19/36) were drained by non-refluxing ureters. In this study, children older than 2 years had less VUR yet were more susceptible to APN and to the development of renal scars. Girls were more prone to developing APN and renal scarring than boys. This work shows that APN is a serious cause for renal scarring in our patients, particularly if associated with other risk factors such as recurrent infections and the female sex.Neonatal urinary tract infections: analysis of the patients and recurrences.Early diagnosis and proper treatment, including long-term follow up, are very important for neonatal urinary tract infections (UTI).The present study reports the analysis and long-term follow-up results of 71 newborns treated for UTI.Forty-one per cent of patients were preterm babies. Suspected sepsis and hyperbilirubinemia were the main presenting features. Community-acquired and nasocomial UTI accounted for 63% and 37% of cases, respectively. The leading causative agents were Escherichia coli for community-acquired UTI and Klebsiella pneumoniae for nasocomial UTI. The urosepsis rate was 5%. Abnormal ultrasonography findings were present in 23% and vesicoureteral reflux was present in 15% of babies. A total of 23% of patients showed renal photopenic areas on dimercaptosuccinic acid scan. The recurrence rate was 28% occurring between 1.5 and 12 months, in particular in the first 6 months. Most of the recurrences developed in patients with no predisposing abnormalities.Pediatric nephrologic follow-up of babies experiencing UTI in the neonatal period is very important to identify the predisposing congenital abnormalities and scarred kidneys, to diagnose and to treat the recurrences earlier.Utility of SPECT DMSA renal scanning in the evaluation of children with primary vesicoureteral reflux.DMSA renal scanning is more sensitive than ultrasound in detecting renal parenchymal scars. We proposed to determine the utility of single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scanning in children with primary vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).During a 24-month period, we evaluated the charts of 368 patients who had undergone SPECT DMSA renal scanning for primary VUR. Patients were divided into three age groups: (a) less than 1 year, (b) between 1 and 5 years, and (c) older than 6 years. Renal scars were deemed severe or focal. The data were analyzed to evaluate the utility of SPECT DMSA scanning in children with primary VUR and to determine the indications for performing SPECT DMSA. We also evaluated the sensitivity of recent renal ultrasound technology in detecting focal and diffuse scars.One hundred twenty-eight patients were younger than 1 year at presentation. These included 24 cases that were detected prenatally. One hundred eighty-five were between the ages of 1 and 5 years, and 55 were 6 years or older. Reflux nephropathy at presentation was found in 99 (26.9%) of 368 patients. DMSA scanning changed the treatment in only 13 patients (3.5%). When scarring was diffuse, ultrasound examination correlated 100% with DMSA scanning; when focal scarring was present, the correlation was poor.Our results suggest that DMSA scans should be tailored to children who have ultrasound abnormalities, high-grade reflux, or recurrent breakthrough urinary tract infections. These guidelines will result in a substantial cost savings and a significant decrease in radiation exposure.Imaging of children with urinary tract infection: a tailored approach.We reviewed the initial imaging studies of 283 children with urinary tract infection in order to decide on the most effective approach. A voiding cystogram was performed in all, complemented by either urography (147 patients), ultrasonography (65), or both (71 patients). In the latter group there was good correlation between sonographic and urographic findings, except for a more accurate delineation of renal scars and anomalies on urography, all in children with vesicoureteral reflux and/or abnormal sonograms. From these data we derived two imaging sequences tailored to the clinical circumstances: cystography as the initial study in ambulatory patients after infection has subsided, and sonography followed by cystography in children hospitalised with severe infection. The upper tracts are studied by ultrasonography and/or urography in patients with significant vesicoureteral reflex or an abnormal sonogram. Both these sequences reduce radiation by omitting the urogram in roughly half of the patients.The detection of reflux nephropathy in infants by 99mtechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid studies.Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) studies were performed in 113 infants less than 1 year old at risk of renal scarring. Of these patients 86 presented with urinary tract infection and 27 were asymptomatic. A voiding cystourethrogram was performed in all cases and excretory urography (IVP) was done in 99. More abnormalities were detected by DMSA study when compared to scars on IVP. When both studies were abnormal there was an excellent correlation on a site by site basis. Fever or systemic disorder was not a reliable sign to determine whether there was upper tract involvement with infection. The incidence of DMSA abnormalities in infants increased with high grade vesicoureteral reflux and decreased with low grade reflux. There was no significant difference in the incidence of abnormal kidneys between the infected and noninfected groups, suggesting that renal scarring may occur with sterile reflux.[Comparative sensitivity of intravenous urography, ultrasonography and DMSA scan in the diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux nephropathy].We compared the efficiency of the IVP, the ultrasound and the DMSA scan in the detection of pyelonephritic lesions during the evaluation of 165 kidneys in 83 children, aged up to 14 years, with vesicoureteric reflux. Our study showed an efficiency of 60.20% for the IVP, 29.60% for the ultrasound and 96.90% for the DMSA scan. These results clearly show that the best imaging method for detecting renal scars is the DMSA scan, followed by IVP and ultrasound.Does early treatment of urinary tract infection prevent renal damage?Therapeutic delay has been suggested as the most important factor that is likely to have an effect on the development of scarring after acute pyelonephritis. However, this opinion has not been supported by prospective studies, so we tested it.In a prospective clinical study, we evaluated whether the time interval between the onset of the renal infection and the start of therapy correlates with the development of acute inflammatory changes and the subsequent development of renal scars, documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy. A total of 278 infants (153 male and 125 female) aged 0.5 to 12.0 months with their first urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study.The median time between the onset of infection and the institution of therapy was 2 days (range: 1-8 days). Renal inflammatory changes were documented in 57% of the infants. Renal defects were recorded in 41% of the patients treated within the first 24 hours since the onset of fever versus 75% of those treated on day 4 and onward. Renal scarring was developed in 51% of the infants with an abnormal scan in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of scarring in infants treated early and in those whose treatment was delayed did not differ, suggesting that once acute pyelonephritis has occurred, ultimate renal scarring is independent of the timing of therapy. Acute inflammatory changes and subsequent scarring were more frequent in the presence of vesicoureteral reflux, especially that which is high grade. However, the difference was not significant, which suggests that renal damage may be independent of the presence of reflux.Early and appropriate treatment of urinary tract infection, especially during the first 24 hours after the onset of symptoms, diminishes the likelihood of renal involvement during the acute phase of the infection but does not prevent scar formation.Screening young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection for high-grade vesicoureteral reflux with renal ultrasound scanning and technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning.To evaluate the predictive value of renal ultrasound scanning and 99m-Technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy for high-grade vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in young children with a first urinary tract infection (UTI).The medical records of children who had been examined with renal ultrasound scanning, DMSA scanning, and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) were reviewed. The findings of renal ultrasound scanning, DMSA scanning, and their predictive values were evaluated.Of 699 children, high-grade VUR (grades III-V) was diagnosed in 119 (17.0%). Signs of renal hypodysplasia (OR, 16.15), cyclic dilatation of pelvicaliceal system (OR, 11.73), hydroureter (OR, 4.00) with renal ultrasound scanning, and renal hypodysplasia (OR, 8.78), acute pyelonephritis (OR, 2.76) with DMSA scanning were associated with high-grade VUR. The sensitivities for high-grade VUR of ultrasound scanning alone (67.2%) or DMSA scanning alone (65.5%) were not as good as that of a both-test strategy, which had a sensitivity rate of 83.2%. The negative predictive value of the both-test strategy was 91.5%.Renal ultrasound scanning and DMSA scanning both should be routinely performed in children with a first febrile UTI. VCUG is only indicated when abnormalities are apparent on either ultrasound scanning or DMSA scanning or both.Screening high-grade vesicoureteral reflux in young infants with a febrile urinary tract infection.The lack of good evidence for improved outcomes in children and young infants with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) after aggressive treatment for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) has raised doubts regarding the need for routine voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), and the appropriate imaging evaluation in these children remains controversial.This prospective study aimed to determine whether abnormalities found on acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) can help indicate the necessity of voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in young infants.For 3.5 years, all infants younger than 3 months presenting with first febrile UTI were prospectively studied. All infants were hospitalized and investigated using US (<3 days after admission), DMSA scan (<5 days after admission), and VCUG (7-10 days after antibiotic treatment) after diagnosis. The association among findings of US, DMSA scan, and VCUG were evaluated.From 220 infants, there were abnormal results in 136 (61.8%) US and in 111 (50.5%) DMSA scans. By US, ten infants (4.5%) with abscess or structural abnormalities other than VUR were diagnosed. High-grade (III-V) VUR was present in 39 patients (17.7%). The sensitivities for high-grade VUR of renal US alone (76.9%) or DMSA scan alone (82.1%) were not as good as that of the "OR rule" strategy, which had 92.3% sensitivity and 94.3% negative predictive value.To screen high-grade VUR in young infants with febrile UTI, US and acute DMSA scan could be performed first. VCUG is only indicated when abnormalities are apparent on either US or DMSA scan or both.Vesicoureteral reflux in children with urinary tract infection: comparison of diagnostic accuracy of renal US criteria.To directly compare various renal ultrasonography (US) criteria for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) with voiding cystography, the reference method, for diagnostic accuracy in helping to determine an intermediate strategy of screening children who require cystography.Institutional review board approval and parental consent were obtained for this prospective hospital-based cohort study involving children with urinary tract infections (UTIs). Renal length, ureteral dilatation, pelvic dilatation, and corticomedullary differentiation were analyzed and compared. One hundred seventeen patients (median age, 0.8 year; age range, 0.0-13.9 years) were included: 46 (39%) boys (median age, 0.3 year; age range, 0.5-13.9 years) and 71 girls (median age, 1.2 years; age range, 0.0-11.5 years). A two-level logistic regression model was used to analyze data, and diagnostic accuracy calculations were performed.Thirty-two (27%) children had all-grade VUR, and eight (7%) had VUR of grade 3 or higher. Only ureteral dilatation was significantly related to all-grade VUR (odds ratio [OR], 7.5; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 1.0, 58.2; P = .05), with 25% sensitivity (95% CI: 15%, 39%) and 88% specificity (95% CI: 83%, 92%). Ureteral, pelvic, and urinary tract dilatations were significantly associated with VUR of grade 3 or higher, with ORs of 20.2 (95% CI: 3.5, 118.2; P = .001), 13.7 (95% CI: 4.1, 46.0; P < .001), and 20.0 (95% CI: 4.4, 90.1; P < .001), respectively. The best compromise between sensitivity and specificity was achieved by using the ureteral dilatation criterion, which had 73% sensitivity (95% CI: 43%, 90%) and 88% specificity (95% CI: 84%, 92%) for high-grade VUR.Ureteral dilatation may yield the best accuracy for the US-based diagnosis of both all-grade and high-grade VUR. This US criterion, perhaps in combination with other predictors, might find a place in an evidence-based selective strategy for limiting cystography in children with UTIs.Risk factors in the development of early technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy lesions during first urinary tract infection in children.To establish the variables that correlate with uptake defects in dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI).A prospective observational study was conducted in a cohort of 158 consecutive children with a first episode of symptomatic UTI. The therapeutic delay time (TDT) was recorded. DMSA scintigraphy was performed in all children and voiding cystourethrography in 150 of them.85% of the patients were younger than 2 y. Mean TDT was 33.5 h. The aetiological agent was Escherichia coli in 140 children. DMSA scintigraphy was normal in 81. Vesicoureteric reflux was detected in 33. After a multivariate logistic regression analysis the following variables were retained in the final model: TDT > or = 48 h, growth of bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and C-reactive protein > or = 30 mg l(-1).TDT > or = 48 h, bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and CRP > or = 30 mg l(-1) influence the findings detected in the DMSA scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of UTI.[Importance of echography in the study of urinary tract infections in childhood].One hundred and twenty-one children with a clinical diagnosis of urinary tract infection (UTI) were examined with sonography (US), ivp and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG). In 84 patients neither US nor radiographic findings were found of pathological significance; in 16 out of 37 patients with pathological findings both US and ivp were negative, whereas VCUG was decisive for a correct diagnosis. VCUG demonstrated vesicoureteric reflux in 10 patients, posterior urethral valves in 1 patient, and small diverticula of the urinary bladder in 5 patients. In 17 of the remaining 21 cases, there was agreement between US and urographic findings, whereas in 4 cases US provided us with false positives, with images of apparent renal scarring. The mistake was caused by an incorrect US detection of unilateral duplication of the collecting systems. The authors conclude by stressing the importance of ivp in the evaluation of urinary tract infections in children, even in case of negative VCUG and US results, and suggest comparing US measurements of renal length to the distance between three contiguous lumbar vertebrae in order to obtain measurements comparable to body growth.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infection.Ninety-four children with febrile urinary tract infection were studied prospectively to determine the relationship between vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis, and to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of commonly used clinical and laboratory observations. By using renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid labeled with technetium 99m as the standard of reference, we documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with pyelonephritis. Of the 70 E. coli urinary isolates, 48 (69%) were P-fimbriated, including 30 (64%) of 47 isolates from patients with pyelonephritis and 18 (78%) of 23 isolates from patients with normal renal scans. The prevalence of P-fimbriated E. coli in patients with pyelonephritis and vesicoureteral reflux was 46%, compared with 71% in those with pyelonephritis who had no concurrent vesicoureteral reflux (p = 0.222). Multiple clinical and laboratory variables commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis did not adequately predict the presence or absence of parenchymal involvement. These data show the following: (1) Acute pyelonephritis in the absence of demonstrable vesicoureteral reflux is common. (2) Febrile urinary tract infections in children are commonly associated with P-fimbriated E. coli, both in the presence and absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (3) The presence of P fimbriae alone does not fully explain the pathophysiology of renal parenchymal invasion by bacteria in the absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (4) The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infections on the basis of clinical and laboratory observations is unreliable.Evaluation of the use of DMSA in culture positive UTI and culture negative acute pyelonephritis.This prospective study was done to assess the frequency of acute pyelonephritis (APN) in febrile children with positive urine culture as documented by Tc99m DMSA scintigraphy (DMSA) and the frequency of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) in these children. Secondly, to determine the frequency of APN, in febrile children with supportive evidence for UTI but with negative urine culture, as documented by DMSA and frequency of VUR in them. Thirdly to stress the utility of DMSA to diagnose APN in urine culture negative febrile children and to suggest DMSA as a clinical tool in evaluation of fever of unknown origin (FUO). This study included 42 children with positive urine culture and 26 children with negative urine culture who had supportive evidence of UTI as determined by the predetermined criteria and diagnosed to have APN by DMSA. All of them had ultrasonogram (USG), DMSA and voiding cystourethrogram (VCU). They were followed up for a minimum period of 6 months. Out of the 42 children with positive urine culture 92.9% had features of APN in the DMSA of whom 82.1% had vesicoureteric relux (VUR). The DMSA was abnormal in 26 children with negative urine culture, of whom 65.4% had VUR. Ultrasound suggestive of parenchymal change was observed in 47.6% in the culture positive group and 65.4% in the culture negative group. In conclusion, it is suggested, that DMSA is a useful investigation for the diagnosis of APN in febrile UTI. DMSA is indicated in febrile children with negative urine culture but with supportive evidence of UTI and in FUO. An abnormal DMSA is a strong indication for work up for VUR.[A retrospective study to evaluate a protocol aimed at reducing the number of unnecessary voiding cystourethrographies performed after a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection].Whether or not voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) should be performed after a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) remains a matter of debate. The role of VCUG is primarily to diagnose high-grade vesicoureteral reflux (≥grade III) (VUR) and hence prevent the development of renal scars and poor long-term outcome. We designed a protocol designed to reduce the indications for performing unnecessary VCUGs after a first episode of febrile UTI. In order to evaluate the efficacy of our protocol, we designed a retrospective study to verify whether high-grade VUR was subsequently being underdiagnosed.This study compared the number of cases of VUR diagnosed over 2 1-year periods in children aged 1 month to 18 years. Data were collected from records held in the pediatric emergency department of the University Hospital of Reims. All cases included had presented to the department with a first episode of febrile UTI. During the first 1-year collection period, all patients underwent a VCUG. During the second collection period, the protocol was in place and VCUG was only performed in children with a serum procalcitonin level greater than 1 ng/L and/or an abnormal renal ultrasound scan.During the first year, 100 patients underwent routine VCUG and 7 cases of high-grade VUR were diagnosed. During the following year, VCUG was limited according to the new protocol: 102 patients were enrolled, 52 VCUGs were performed and 8 cases of high-grade VUR were diagnosed. Cases of low-grade VUR (I and II) were less frequently detected, without significant consequences for the patients.The protocol led to a 40% decrease in the number of VCUGs performed. No cases of high-grade VUR were missed; however, the number of VCUGs performed with a normal outcome remained significant.Renal ultrasonography should be done routinely in children with first urinary tract infections.To assess the consequences of renal ultrasonography (RUS) in the treatment of children younger than 5 years of age with a first febrile urinary tract infection.We retrospectively reviewed the results of imaging studies, including RUS, computed tomography, and voiding cystourethrography in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection during a 2-year period. Children with known urologic anomalies, other underlying diseases, or simultaneous combined illnesses were excluded. Children with nephromegaly were diagnosed with acute lobar nephronia by computed tomography.A total of 390 children were included in this study. Of the 390 children, 112 (28.7%) had abnormal RUS findings. The children with abnormal RUS findings of nephromegaly, small kidney, intermittent hydronephrosis, or a double collecting system had a significantly greater incidence of vesicoureteral reflux than children with normal RUS findings. Additionally, the occurrence of high-grade vesicoureteral reflux in children with abnormal RUS findings was more frequent than in children with normal RUS findings.The results of our study indicate that it is worth performing RUS in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection because abnormal kidney size or other specific structural ultrasound findings should be investigated, in addition to isolated hydronephrosis.Impact of micturating cystourethrography and DMSA renal scintigraphy on the investigation scheme in children with urinary tract infection.The relationships among urinary tract infection (UTI), vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), and permanent renal damage in children are not fully understood. The aim of this study was to evaluate the incidence of renal scarring in children with a history of UTI and to determine the change in the probability of permanent renal damage owing to the presence of VUR documented on micturating cystourethrography (MCU).We analyzed 201 children (400 renal units, two children with solitary kidney). Seventy-four boys and 127 girls (aged 7 months to 7 years, median 2.5 years) with culture verified UTI were referred for technetium-labeled dimercaptosuccinic (DMSA) renal scintigraphy 4-6 months after acute UTI. MCU was also performed mostly 1 month prior to DMSA. Statistical analysis was performed using chi2 test or Fisher's exact test. Likelihood ratio (LR) positive and negative, diagnostic odds ratio (DOR), and post-test probability of (no) disease were calculated for VUR on MCU versus scarring on DMSA.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 158 (39.5%) kidneys, and evaluated as grades I, II, III, IV, and V in 3, 70, 43, 25, and 17 refluxing renal units (RRU), respectively. Permanent renal damage according to DMSA was seen in 15.2% (61/400) kidneys. Scarring was shown in 29.7% (47/158) of kidneys with VUR and in 5.8% (14/242) kidneys without VUR (P<0.0001). LR positive was 2.353 (95% CI 1.889, 2.865), LR negative 0.341 (95% CI 0.209, 0.523), and DOR 6.895 (95% CI 3.533, 14.093). Rate of scarring significantly increased with VUR of grades III, IV, and V. There was no significant difference in the incidence of scarring in kidneys without VUR and RRU with low-grade (I and II) VUR (P=0.306). The presence of VUR on MCU increased the chance of renal damage on DMSA by about 15%, whereas negative MCU increased the chance of no-renal involvement by 9%.Micturating cystourethrography should not be used as a first-line test to rule out the permanent renal damage owing to UTI. The priority of imaging strategy should be focused on early identification of renal lesions to prevent further deterioration.Renal scintigraphy in children with vesicoureteral reflux.To determine the incidence and pattern of abnormal scintigraphy findings in children with UTI and VUR.Data of 118 children who underwent micturating cystourethrography (MCU) and late Tc-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan were evaluated. Findings were categorized under the image appearance and relative kidney uptake (RKU) and related to the grade of VUR, sex and child's age.MCU revealed VUR (78 unilateral and 40 bilateral) of grades I, II, III, IV and V in 2, 47, 35, 19 and 15 patients respectively. There were 52 children with normal and 66 with abnormal DMSA finding. Scarring rate was significantly associated with high grade VUR (p=0.0023) and male gender ( p=0.0412). Bilateral scarring was seen exclusively in children with bilateral VUR. No significant difference was found between renal scarring and child's age in the same gender group. Poor kidney function was shown in 5 patients.Renal scarring highly correlated with grade of VUR. A strategy to perform MCU only on patients with abnormal DMSA finding is proposed.Results of a five-year study of 99mTc DMSA renal scintigraphy in children and adolescents following acute pyelonephritis.Renal scintigraphy, generally using 99mTc-DMSA, is the accepted reference standard for detection of renal cortical changes. The timing of the test, i.e., whether an acute 99mTc-DMSA scan, a follow-up only or both scans should be performed, however, remains open to discussion. In our study, a six-month follow- up DMSA scan was performed in all the children diagnosed with a first attack of acute pyelonephritis (APN) in two large paediatric clinics of Charles University's 3rd School of Medicine in Prague during a five-year period. All diagnoses were confirmed by a paediatric nephrologist.382 children (267 girls, 115 boys) aged between 7 months and 19 years were included in the study. For analytical purposes, the patients were divided into 4 age groups: I--less than 1 year of age, II--1-5 years, III--5-10 years, and IV--10-19 years. In all children younger than five years, a micturition cystourethrogram (MCUG) for detection of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was performed between one and three months after the APN episode. Static renal scintigraphy, using an HR collimator with parallel holes was performed using a planar Gamma camera MB 9200 (Gamma Budapest) in all children six months after APN, with a complement of pinhole images, SPECT or PSPECT of the kidneys.1. In group I, all four children with positive VUR on MCUG had a pathological DMSA scan, while only two of the 32 patients with negative VUR had a pathological DMSA. 2. In group II, 17 children had VUR on MCUG, six of them with a pathological and 11 with a normal DMSA scan. Most of the 221 children without VUR had a normal DMSA scintigraphy; pathological findings were present in 17 children only. 3. In group III, all children with VUR, but only 5 out of 53 without VUR, had a pathological DMSA scan. 4. Five out of 50 children in group IV had a pathological DMSA.APN occurred most frequently in group II (62.3%, or 238 children) and ranged between 10-15% in the remaining groups. APN was found very frequently in boys less than one year old and showed a marked decrease with increasing age. Among girls, however, APN incidence was observed to increase with age. Pathological renal changes were present in children with, as well as without, VUR. The incidence of pathological DMSA findings six months after APN was relatively low (44/382 patients, or 11.5%). Regular monitoring of these children is very important for detection of renal scarring.Imaging of pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of pyelonephritis using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult, especially in children. The main aims of this prospective study were to compare the value of different imaging techniques [renal sonography, cortical scintigraphy with technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (99mTc DMSA) and computed tomography (CT)] in detecting renal involvement in acute urinary tract infections and to determine the sensitivity of DMSA scans for permanent renal scars 6 months later.Between February 1992 and January 1993, 55 children admitted to our pediatric unit with febrile symptomatic urinary tract infections were eligible for analysis. Ultrasonography (US), DMSA scanning and micturating cystourethrography were performed in every case. Only 18 children underwent CT. A second DMSA scan was performed in 48 children a mean of 7.5 months after the first.US abnormalities were found in 25 children (45 %). The first DMSA scan showed a parenchymal aspect suggestive of pyelonephritis in 51 patients (93 %). Among the 18 patients studied by CT, 14 had abnormalities. Normal US findings did not rule out renal parenchymal involvement. Scintigraphy appeared to be more sensitive than CT for renal involvement. The frequency and degree of initial renal parenchymal damage seemed to correlate with vesicoureteral reflux, but the most severe initial parenchymal defects were not associated with marked clinical or laboratory manifestations. Repeat DMSA scans, performed on 45 kidneys with abnormalities at the first examination, showed resolution in 19, improvement in 16, persistence in 8 and deterioration in 2. The prevalence of vesicoureteral reflux was not higher in patients with renal scarring on the second DMSA scan than in patients whose scans showed an improvement.DMSA scans should be considered as a reference in the detection and follow-up of renal scarring associated with acute urinary tract infection as this technique is more sensitive than US and CT, the latter being unsuitable because it entails radiation exposure and sedation of patients.[Evolution of scintigraphic renal lesions in children after an episode of acute pyelonephritis].Abnormal Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy performed six months after an acute pyelonephritis (AP) is generally interpreted as scarring.To perform a follow up of childhood patients showing scintigraphic renal lesions during the acute phase of pyelonephritis (within 7 days from the beginning of fever).A scintigraphic control was carried out at 5-7 months and, in case of persistent lesions, an additional late scintigraphy at 10-13 months. All patients were followed clinically for one year and those with a relapse of urinary tract infection were excluded from the study.Eighty five patients with a median age of 8 months were included. Among these, the first scintigraphic control was normal in 59 (69%) and abnormal in 26 patients (31%). In five of these 26 patients (5/26:19%-5/85: 6%), a considerable regression of the lesions was obvious on the early control, and normalized completely on the late control. When expressing the results in kidney units, 107 showed lesions during the acute phase of infection; 69% was normal at the early control. Thirty three showed lesions persisting at the early control (31%) and 7 out of these 33 (21%) became normal on the late control (7/107: 7%). In total, 25% of the children included in the study (24% of the kidney units) remained with renal sequelae one year after the initial episode of AP.The persistence of scintigraphic lesions six months after an episode of AP, does not necessarily correspond to permanent scars, since normalization can sometimes be observed on late controls.Is a routine voiding cystourethrogram necessary in children after the first febrile urinary tract infection?The aim of this study was to estimate the value of identifying vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on a voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) and the benefit of VUR management according to imaging strategies at the first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Children aged 1-144 months (n = 618) with the first febrile UTI admitted at our hospital from 2000 to 2009 were enrolled. In all patients, renal sonogram (US), (99m) Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scanning and VCUG were performed. Retrospective analyses per patient and per renal unit were performed.Abnormal US or DMSA scans had a sensitivity of 100% and a negative predictive value (NPV) of 100% to detect high-grade reflux. In hydronephrotic kidneys, DMSA scanning had a sensitivity of 88.2% and a NPV of 97.1% to detect high-grade reflux.Routine VCUG is not required after the first febrile UTI in patients with normal US or normal DMSA scan. Even if the US reveals hydronephrosis, routine VCUG is not necessary if the DMSA findings are normal. It is recommended that children who did not receive both a DMSA scan and VCUG after the first febrile UTI should be followed up over the long term.Acute renal damage in infants after first urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is one of the most common causes of unexplained fever in neonates. The aim of this study was to determine the incidence of urinary tract anomalies and acute renal damage in neonates who presented with first urinary tract infection in the first 8 weeks of life. We reviewed the records of 95 infants, who were hospitalised with UTI during a 6-year period (1994-1999). Patients with antenatally diagnosed hydronephrosis and incomplete radiological investigations were excluded from the study. Of the remaining 57 patients, 42 were boys and 15 girls. The mean age at diagnosis was 32 days (range 5-60 days). All patients underwent renal ultrasonography (US), voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) and (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Urinary tract abnormalities were detected in 20 (35%) patients. Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was found in 19 (33%) neonates, 7 girls and 12 boys. Acute cortical defects on DMSA scan were present in 19 kidneys of patients with VUR and in 25 of those without reflux. Only one-third of neonates after first symptomatic UTI had VUR. We recommend that US, VCUG, and DMSA scan should be routinely performed after the first UTI in infants younger than 8 weeks.[The utility of gammagraphy with Tc 99-labelled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) in the protocol for studying urinary infection in a 2nd-level hospital].Not all hospitals in our country have their own nuclear medicine laboratory. Most small and medium size hospitals must arrange their radioisotope studies with private clinics. The objective of this study was to assess if a single DMSA scan performed after an acute infection in a group of patients chosen according to certain risk criteria would allow the selection of those who run the risk of progressive renal damage.A descriptive and retrospective study of the clinical records of 65 patients under 14 years of age with urinary tract infection (UTI) seen at our institution between 1994 and 1995 and on whom a DMSA scan had been performed was carried out. The study groups was formed by the fifteen children with scintigraphic findings compatible with renal scarring. The fifty children with normal DMSA scans were used as controls.Renal scarring was found more often in patients over one year of age (p < 0.05), in those with reinfections (p < 0.001) and in those kidneys with grade III vesicoureteral reflux (VUR, p < 0.05). The most severe lesions, with reduction of renal size, shape abnormalities and diminished uptake of the tracer were found together with VUR. The renal sonogram performed during the acute stage of the UTI was able to detect only four of the six children most severely affected.Delaying the practice of the DMSA scan until 6 months after the last episode of bacteriuria would allow selection of those patients at the highest risk of progressive renal damage. This guideline would reduce scintigraphic studies 30 to 90%, since it would avoid repeated studies in those children with abnormal findings in the acute stage. The practice of the radioisotope study only in a reduced subset of patients selected on the basis of risk criteria such as recurrent UTI, VUR or suspected pyelonephritis does not allow detection of all scars.The impact of therapeutic delay time on acute scintigraphic lesion and ultimate scar formation in children with first febrile UTI.We assessed the role of therapeutic delay time (TDT) in acute renal cortical scintigraphic lesion (ASL) and ultimate scar formation (USF) in children with first febrile UTI and whether it is affected by the presence of vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR). 230 children, 90 girls and 140 boys with first febrile UTI were included. Radiologic (USG, DMSA, and VCUG), clinical (age, gender, peak fever, therapeutic delay time) and laboratory (CBC with differential count, ANC (absolute neutrophil count), BUN, Creatinine, urine analysis, gram stain, culture, CRP and ESR) variables were analysed. DMSA was performed within 5 days and after six months. VCUG was performed after acute phase of UTI. The differences in TDT according to the presence of ASL, USF and VUR were assessed. And the correlation between ASL or USF with the duration of TDT was assessed. Of 230 patients enrolled, 142 patients had refluxing UTI and 88 patients had non-refluxing UTI. TDT was the risk factor associated with ASL and USF along with presence of VUR. TDT was longer in ASL positive group compared with the ASL negative group. Also USF group showed longer TDT compared with those without USF in both refluxing UTI and non refluxing UTI. The TDT was significantly shorter in USF group with the presence of VUR. Positive linear association was noted between prevalence of ASL and USF and duration of TDT. In conclusion, the impact of UTI on formation of USF may be enhanced by the presence of VUR with shorter duration of TDT.Predictors of abnormal renal cortical scintigraphy in children with first urinary tract infection: the importance of time factor.We evaluated different factors predicting the development of acute pyelonephritis in Iranian children, with special attention to time factor.One hundred nineteen patients (93 females and 26 males; age = 32.6 ± 30.8 months) with first urinary tract infection (UTI) were evaluated. None had previous urological problems. Prior to antibiotic therapy blood samples were gathered for laboratory evaluation. Vital signs on admission were measured. Clinical and laboratory indices, including therapeutic delay time (TDT) and therapeutic response time (TRT), were measured. Most patients were evaluated with renal ultrasound in the first three days following admission. All patients underwent dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy and 71 were assessed for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).DMSA scans were abnormal in 77 cases, of which 11 cases had bilateral renal involvement. Mean values for TDT, TRT, leukocyte count (LC), absolute neutrophil count (ANC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and C-reactive protein (CRP) were 74.1 h, 39.6 h, 15725 ± 6682 mm(-3), 10772 ± 6458 mm(-3), 51.9 ± 32.5 mm, and 27.3 ± 25.1 mg l(-1), respectively. VUR was present in 29 of 142 evaluated renal units.TDT ≥ 48 h, TRT ≥ 24 h, axillary temperature ≥ 39°C, LC ≥ 13500 mm(-3), and age ≥ 18 months predicted abnormal DMSA scan in patients with first episode of UTI. Considerably higher TDT and TRT values of the current study compared to previous ones suggests the more important role of time factor in predicting abnormal DMSA findings in a developing country than in developed ones.Detecting reflux: does ureteric jet Doppler waveform have a role?Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) has a prevalence of 30-40 % post-febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). If not detected early and treated, renal scarring, hypertension, and renal failure may occur. Micturating cystourethrography (MCU) is an invasive procedure associated with radiation exposure. Hence, this study aimed at evaluating the utility of ureteric jet Doppler waveform (UJDW) as a screening tool in detecting VUR, and at assessing the feasibility of performing it in children aged 2-4 years.Any child 2-18 years old who needed an MCU was included. Exclusion criteria were active UTI, indwelling catheter, and inability to drink the required amount of fluid. The UJDW was performed prior to the MCU.One hundred eighty-two ureteric units were analyzed. Sensitivity and specificity of UJDW in detecting VUR was 80.3 and 87.9 %. Twenty-three children (45 ureteric units), aged 2-4 years were compared with 73 children (137 ureteric units), aged 5-18 years. Sensitivity and specificity of UJDW in detecting VUR in 2-4 years was 77.3 and 91.3 %, respectively; while in children ≥5 years, it was 81.8 and 87.1 %, respectively.UJDW has a uniformly high specificity regardless of age or etiological groups, making it a good tool for follow-up. UJDW is a feasible technique, even in children aged 2-4 years.Uroradiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection: are both ultrasonograpy and renal cortical scintigraphy necessary?To compare the findings of renal ultrasonography (RUS), 99mTc glucoheptonate renal scan (GHS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in children with urinary tract infection.Prospective, masked, clinical study.Single center, multidisciplinary, inpatients.Consecutive cases (N = 50) of children aged 2 months to 15 years (8 boys, 42 girls) with pyelonephritis in whom uroradiologic investigation was indicated.All patients underwent GHS, 48 had RUS, and 2 had intravenous pyelography. All but one of the patients had a VCUG. Fifteen children were found to have vesicoureteral reflux (6 unilaterally, 9 bilaterally). Of 96 kidneys evaluated by both GHS and RUS, 53 were abnormal by GHS versus 28 by RUS (p < 0.001). Findings of both GHS and US were normal in 36 kidneys and abnormal in 21 kidneys. In 32 kidneys only GHS showed abnormalities. In 7 kidneys only RUS showed abnormalities; 5 of them had mild to moderate pelvic dilation caused by reflux, which was confirmed in all 5 by VCUG. The VCUG demonstrated reflux in another four units with normal GHS and RUS findings. All combined, GHS and VCUG detected 62 of 64 abnormal renal units (96.9%). In the other two cases, RUS showed only focal hyperechogenicity of questionable importance.In the event that one elects to use GHS for the uroradiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection, it can be supplemented by VCUG alone, and RUS can be saved for special cases.[Ultrasound screening of vesico-uretero-renal reflux].A prospective study of detecting vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) by ultrasound is to be presented. In case of reflux, gas bubbles can be seen in the renal pelvis during the filling phase of a gas cystogram and during micturition, utilizing ultrasound as the imaging modality. In children under two years 52 sonographic reflux studies were performed and compared with radiographic voiding cystourethrograms (VCUG). All higher grade VUR (grades II-IV) have been detected by our method.Evaluation of acute urinary tract infection in children by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy: a prospective study.A prospective study examining the incidence of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) abnormalities in children at the time of acute urinary tract infection, the progression of these abnormalities following treatment and their correlation with the presence of vesicoureteral reflux is reported. DMSA scans performed within 72 hours of presentation in 65 previously healthy children with acute urinary tract infection were abnormal in 34 (52%). The scan appearances of 30 of 36 (83%) initially abnormal kidneys improved or became normal on the repeat DMSA study performed at 3 to 6 months after the acute urinary tract infection. A cystogram demonstrated significant vesicoureteral reflux in 11 of 45 cases (24%). Of these 11 cases 10 had abnormal DMSA studies and 1 had dilated upper tracts on ultrasound. Several conclusions may be drawn from our study. The incidence of DMSA abnormalities at the time of acute urinary tract infection is high but these abnormalities tend to resolve with time. An abnormal DMSA study at the time of urinary tract infection identifies most children with significant vesicoureteral reflux, and in our series a combination of ultrasound and DMSA identified all cases. This study may have major implications for the clinical investigation of children with urinary tract infection.Renal sonography is not a reliable screening examination for vesicoureteral reflux.A retrospective analysis of 493 infants and children was performed to determine the reliability of renal sonography for identifying vesicoureteral reflux. Sonography was done in all cases within 8 hours of a voiding cystourethrogram. Vesicoureteral reflux was documented in 272 of 986 kidneys on voiding cystourethrography and there were 201 refluxing kidneys with normal ultrasound (25 with grade I reflux, 119 with grade II, 50 with grade III, 6 with grade IV and 1 with grade V). In 71 of the refluxing kidneys the ultrasound was abnormal due to pelvicaliceal dilatation in 45, a duplication anomaly in 6 and renal fossae abnormality in 20. Of the kidneys with vesicoureteral reflux 74% were sonographically normal. Sonography was not sufficiently sensitive or specific for detecting vesicoureteral reflux, since 28% of the missed refluxing kidneys had grade III or higher reflux.Normal dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy makes voiding cystourethrography unnecessary after urinary tract infection.To test the hypothesis that infants with dilating vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) have abnormal acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy results, as was suggested by an earlier retrospective study.We conducted a prospective study of infants <1 year old with first diagnosed symptomatic urinary tract infection at the Children's Hospital of Göteborg, Sweden. Two hundred ninety consecutive children (161 boys and 129 girls) with complete records were examined. Renal ultrasound scanning and DMSA scintigraphy were performed within a few days from diagnosis, and VCU was performed within 2 months.VUR was found in 52 children, of which 27 had dilating VUR (grade III-V). DMSA scintigraphy results were abnormal in 149 infants (51%), 105 of 238 (44%) without VUR, 18 of 25 (72%) with VUR grade I to II, and 26 of 27 (96%) with VUR grade III to V (P <.001).DMSA scintigraphy results were abnormal in all 27 infants with dilating VUR except 1. This single false-negative finding should be compared with 140 unnecessary VCU investigations. This supports our hypothesis that DMSA scintigraphy results are abnormal when there is dilating VUR. Thus, a normal DMSA scan makes VCU unnecessary in the primary examination of infants with UTI.Nephromegaly is a significant risk factor for renal scarring in children with first febrile urinary tract infections.We determined whether nephromegaly on ultrasound can be used to identify patients with urinary tract infection at increased risk for renal scarring, and we investigated the effect of vesicoureteral reflux on renal scarring.We enrolled hospitalized patients with a first febrile urinary tract infection. All patients underwent renal ultrasound and most patients underwent voiding cystourethrography. Renal scarring was assessed using (99m)technetium dimercapto-succinic acid renal scintigraphy at least 6 months after treatment. Children with recurrent urinary tract infections before scintigraphy were excluded from the study.A total of 545 children (80 with and 465 without nephromegaly) were enrolled. Infection was more severe in patients with than without nephromegaly. The incidence of renal scarring was significantly higher in patients with nephromegaly (90% vs 32%, p <0.001), in kidneys with nephromegaly (80.5% vs 18.7%, p <0.001) and in kidneys with vesicoureteral reflux (41.5% vs 22.2%, p <0.001). Kidneys with nephromegaly had a greater incidence of reflux. The finding of nephromegaly is associated with a greatly increased likelihood of renal scarring in patients with vesicoureteral reflux.Our results indicate that ultrasound diagnosis of nephromegaly at onset is associated with a high incidence of renal scarring, and identification of nephromegaly at onset and vesicoureteral reflux are significant risk factors for renal scarring in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection. Nephromegaly is associated with an increased frequency of vesicoureteral reflux and increased likelihood of renal scarring in patients with reflux.Acute phase 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in infants with first episode of febrile urinary tract infection.99mTc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan is the golden standard for the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis and renal scaring. We investigated the use of acute phase DMSA scan in infants presented promptly to the hospital because of the first episode of their febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Ninety-eight infants with microbiologically confirmed first episode of febrile UTI were studied. DMSA scans were carried out within 7 days in these infants after admission. Infants with an abnormal acute DMSA scan underwent a second DMSA scan 6-12 months later.Overall, acute DMSA scan was abnormal in 16 (16.3%) of the 98 patients. There were no differences in sex, age, fever over 38.5°C, blood inflammation indices, or evidence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) between patients with normal and abnormal acute DMSA scan (P>0.05). However, infants with grade III to V VUR as well as those with delayed treatment presented significantly increased renal involvement by acute DMSA scan (P<0.05). The sensitivity and specificity of abnormal acute DMSA scan to predict grade III to V VUR were 50% and 88% respectively. Its positive and negative likelihood ratios were 4.16 and 0.57, respectively. Of 16 children with abnormal initial DMSA scan results, 14 underwent a second DMSA scan. Follow-up DMSA scans were normal in 12 of the 14 children.Parenchymal damage found in a minority of infants with febrile UTI presented promptly to the hospital. Acute phase DMSA scan should be carried out only in selected patients. An abnormal acute DMSA scan is a moderate predictor for dilated VUR and its ability to exclude VUR is restricted.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections in infants and young children.The purpose of the study was to compare bacterial species, clinical, laboratory and imaging findings ((99m )Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan and voiding cystogram) in infants and children with high (>/=10(5) colony forming units (CFU)/ml, group A patients) and low (</=5 x 10(4) CFU/ml, group C patients) bacterial count in urine cultures during first episode of urinary tract infection. Group B included patients with intermediate CFU/ml. Included were 419 symptomatic patients with: (a) no previous antibiotic treatment, (b) urine samples for quantitative cultures taken by bladder catheterisation or suprapubic bladder aspiration, (c) growth of only one microorganism, and (d) age </=54 months (age of the oldest patient of group C). Out of 419 cultures, Escherichia coli grew in 315 (75.2%), gram-negative bacteria except E. coli in 91 (21.7%) and gram-positive in 13 (3.1%). Group C patients were significantly ( P <0.0001) more often affected with gram-negative pathogens except E. coli than group A patients (21/44 versus 67/360). Most of group C patients were younger than 24 months of age; none was older than 54 months. Comparison of the prevalence of clinical and laboratory (leucocyte count, CRP, ESR) findings between groups A and C showed no significant differences. There was no statistically significant difference in the prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations (except reflux) between groups A and C.Low bacterial count urinary tract infections mainly affect infants and young children and are often due to gram-negative bacteria other than E. coli. Clinical and laboratory findings, prevalence of pyelonephritis, reflux and urological malformations are similar in high and low bacterial count urinary tract infections.Experience with the NICE guidelines for imaging studies in children with first pyelonephritis.This retrospective study evaluates the applicability of a selective approach for imaging in children aged 0-15 years with a first episode of pyelonephritis, based on the UTI guidelines of the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE).A total of 96 consecutive patients were included (age range: 0.1-14.9 years, median age: 0.7 years), treated for a first episode of confirmed culture-positive pyelonephritis. At initial hospitalization all patients underwent ultrasound examination of the kidneys and urinary tract (US) and technetium-99m mercaptoacetyltriglycine scinti- and renography ( (99m)Tc MAG3). If vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was suspected, then prophylactic antimicrobial therapy was prescribed and the patients were referred to a surgeon for further evaluation including voiding cystoureterography (VCU). Patients with known urological anomalies including antenatally diagnosed anomalies were excluded. All patients were followed up for a median of 5.2 years (3.5-8.6 years).Initially, US findings were abnormal in 29 (30%) patients and (99m)Tc MAG3 findings were abnormal in 20 (21%) cases. At follow-up, prophylactic antimicrobial therapy was prescribed for 19 (20%), and VUR was diagnosed by VCU in 9 patients. Surgery was carried out in 7 (7%) patients, primarily for VUR. If the NICE guidelines had been initially followed, 5 of our 9 patients with VUR would not have been identified. VUR surgery was performed in 4 of these cases. Moreover, 9 cases with urological anomalies subsequently prescribed prophylactic antimicrobial therapy would have been missed.We do not recommend following the imaging strategies of the NICE guidelines for children with a first episode of pyelonephritis. Our most important argument is that at follow-up, after a minimum of 3.5 years, the initial diagnosis of VUR would have been missed in 4 out of the 5 patients who underwent VUR surgery.Nuclear cystography and renal sonography: findings in girls with urinary tract infection.This retrospective study documents the findings on nuclear cystography and renal sonography of 455 girls who had urologic imaging for a proved urinary tract infection (UTI). Nuclear cystograms were normal in 313 (69%) of 455 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was seen in 142 patients (31%): six with grade I, 90 with grade II, 43 with grade III, and three with grade IV. Twelve percent of patients with vesicoureteral reflux had renal parenchymal scars. Increasing grades of reflux were associated with an increase in the severity and number of parenchymal scars. Normal renal sonograms were seen in 83% of patients. Abnormalities noted on sonograms included parenchymal scarring in 31 (7%) of the 455 patients, anomalies in 19 patients (4%), mild to moderate dilatation of the renal pelvis and or ureters in 45 patients (10%), and bladder wall thickening in 45 patients (10%).Vesicoureteral reflux in hospitalized children with urinary tract infection: the clinical value of pelvic ectasia on renal ultrasound, inflammatory responses and demographic data.The aims of this study were to determine whether renal pelvis dilation on ultrasound was reliable in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and to assess the relationship of other clinical information of VUR in children with urinary tract infection (UTI).We retrospectively reviewed clinical data, renal echo, and voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) results in hospitalized children with their first episode of UTI, aged from 1 month to 5 years, during a 1-year period.There were 114 children with 228 kidneys eligible for the study. Unilateral pelvis size greater than 8 mm had 2.4 (p = 0.049, 95% CI: 1.0-5.9) and 3.7 (p = 0.025, 95% CI: 1.2-11.3) times greater risk for VUR and severe reflux, respectively. The sensitivity in detecting severe reflux was 27.8%, and the specificity was 90.5%. The positive and negative predictive values in suggesting severe VUR were 20.0% and 93.6%, respectively. The sum of bilateral pelvis sizes greater than 16 mm had higher risk for VUR and severe reflux (4.1 and 4.6 times) and similar specificity and negative predictive value for severe reflux. Age, gender, C-reactive protein, leukocytosis, pyuria and acute pyelonephritis did not show significant relationships to the reflux.Unilateral pelvis size greater than 8 mm or the sum of the bilateral pelvis sizes greater than 16 mm was associated with VUR, especially severe VUR. The possibility of severe reflux was lower than 10% when the reverse criteria were applied. However, the dilation of the renal pelvis did not predict all VUR precisely. We concluded that VCUG should still be performed in hospitalized children with UTI.Ultrasonography as a screening procedure in children with urinary tract infection.Renal ultrasonography, excretory urography and radionuclide-voiding cystography or conventional voiding cystourethrography were performed in 76 children with urinary tract infection. Forty children had functional or anatomical abnormalities. Twenty-eight children had vesicoureteral reflux and 12 children had an obstructive lesion. All 12 children with obstructive lesions as well as 4 children with reflux and hydronephrosis required corrective surgery. Ultrasonography as the initial procedure detected 14 of these cases and the other 2 were discovered in voiding cystourethrography. Our data and those in the literature suggest that renal ultrasonography may be the method of choice in children with urinary tract infection. This is followed by voiding cystourethrography or radionuclide-voiding cystography. Excretory urography is not necessary in the initial evaluation of these patients, but it should be utilized when the other imaging methods show an abnormality and more detailed anatomical visualization of the upper urinary tract is required. Using this protocol in children with urinary tract infection, unnecessary radiation, discomfort and expense will be avoided.NICE guidelines for imaging studies in children with UTI adequate only in boys under the age of 6 months.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the applicability of the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE) guidelines for imaging studies in children under the age of three with first urinary tract infection (UTI).In our cohort of 112 patients, we gathered data regarding the occurrence of indications for ultrasonography (US) and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) according to the NICE guidelines, dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy examinations, UTI recurrence, antimicrobial prophylaxis (AMP), anti-reflux procedures, and other urological procedures.If the NICE guidelines had been applied, 13 of the 25 patients (52 %) with vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), including 6 of the 12 patients (50 %) with dilating VUR and 3 of the 4 patients who underwent endoscopic anti-reflux treatment, would have been missed, and a negative VCUG would have been avoided in 25 of the 42 patients (60 %) with no VUR. None of the missed diagnoses occurred in the younger boys' group.Based on these preliminary analyses, we feel that the NICE guidelines for imaging studies in children under 3 years old with UTI may be applicable to clinical use only in boys under 6 months of age. For other patients the guidelines were unsuccessful.Renal ultrasound evaluation of urinary tract infections in children.Ultrasonography of the kidney may replace the intravenous pyelogram as the study of choice in identifying treatable abnormalities in children with urinary tract infection. In a series of 64 consecutive children with urinary tract infection in whom an intravenous pyelogram, renal ultrasound, and voiding cystogram were performed, only one treatable abnormality (calyceal dilation) was identified by intravenous pyelogram, and it was not detected by ultrasound. Eleven children showed vesicoureteral reflux on the cystogram. In an additional 43 children in whom intravenous pyelogram was done only if the ultrasound or cystogram were abnormal, there were five abnormal cystograms. Four treatable abnormalities were identified by ultrasound, and there were confirmed by the intravenous pyelogram. Ultrasound should replace the intravenous pyelogram in children with a normal cystogram because of its accuracy, safety, and high patient acceptance. We have also documented a significant volume increase with acute infection in one or both kidney(s) of those children having upper urinary tract infection. Fifteen of 18 children with upper urinary tract infection had volume increases of 30% or more in at least one kidney; whereas only four of 21 children with lower urinary tract infection had increases of greater than 30% (P less than .005). Ultrasound volume measurements provide a new, noninvasive method for identifying the probable site of urinary tract infection.Urography and sonography in the diagnosis of reflux nephropathy.Diagnostic workup of urinary tract infections within the first 24 months of life, in the era of prenatal diagnosis. The contribution of different imaging techniques to clinical management.The aim of this study was to evaluate the role of different techniques in the diagnostic workup of children with negative prenatal ultrasonogram, referred for urinary tract infection (UTI) within the first 24 months.One-hundred and forty-seven patients, 71 males/76 females were studied. All patients were submitted to renal ultrasonogram (RUS) and to micturating cystourethrogram (MCU) independently from the results of RUS. In a small group (48 children) DMSA scan was performed independently from the results of RUS and MCU. Sensitivity and predictive value of RUS for vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) were estimated. Multiple regression analysis was performed on a selected number of signs to evaluate their predictive value. The group investigated by DMSA scan was analysed to evaluate how the presence of VUR on MCU anticipated renal damage.Nineteen (21%) patients with normal RUS, had VUR. Predictive value of RUS (0.21) was influenced by the grade of the VUR but more than 30% of high grade refluxing renal units appeared normal at initial ultrasonography. DMSA scan was abnormal in 27% of 48 patients; its result was independent from the presence of VUR of whatever grade.The increasing number of renal abnormalities detected before birth reduces the possibility of late abnormal RUS findings. It makes RUS screening for abnormalities, after a first episode of UTI, scarcely useful. VUR may be easily missed when RUS resulted normal and MCU is omitted. Negative MCU cannot exclude renal damage in presence of UTI. Renal defects at DMSA scan may be unrelated to a demonstrable VUR and could have a different pathogenesis.[Quantitative renal scintigraphy with technetium-labelled dimercaptosuccinic acid in children].Separate measurement of renal function is essential in children with urinary tract disease. This can be done satisfactorily by means of kidney scintigraphy with technetium 99m-labelled dimercaptosuccinic acid. A retrospective study of the records of 415 children, which comprised renal function tests, radiology and scintigraphy, confirmed the value of the radioisotope technique. Graphs of height, kidney uptake and kidney uptake density in relation to age were established, showing highly significant correlations with renal function tests and intravenous urography results, but many dissociations were encountered. Separate renal function evaluation by radioisotope scintigraphy seems to be more reliable than evaluation extrapolated from measurement of the cortical areas at intravenous urography. In vesico-ureteral reflux scintigraphy makes it possible to detect reflux nephropathy at an earlier stage than with other methods.Utility of screening ultrasound after first febrile UTI among patients with clinically significant vesicoureteral reflux.To assess the sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) of screening renal and bladder ultrasound (RBUS) after initial febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) among patients with clinically significant vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).A retrospective review was performed of all children <2 years of age who presented with a febrile UTI between 2004 and 2011. The sensitivity and NPV of initial RBUS was calculated among patients who were found to have high-grade (IV-V) VUR. Additionally, initial RBUS among patients with evidence of photopenia on dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan or who underwent surgical intervention were reviewed.One hundred forty-four patients with febrile UTI were identified; available RBUS, voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG), and DMSA results for each kidney were reviewed. One hundred fifty-eight kidneys had evidence of VUR on VCUG, and initial RBUS demonstrated abnormality in 25 (sensitivity 0.17). Forty-five kidneys had high-grade VUR and RBUS revealed abnormality in 16 (sensitivity 0.36). One hundred seventy-eight kidneys had no evidence of abnormality on initial RBUS, and 136 (76%) were found to have VUR (NPV 0.24), of which 31 had high-grade VUR (NPV 0.83). Seven kidneys had scarring on DMSA and initial RBUS was normal in 4 (57%). Twelve of 19 patients (63%) who eventually underwent surgical intervention had a normal initial RBUS.RBUS has poor sensitivity and NPV for detecting high-grade VUR in patients <2 years who present with a febrile UTI. A significant number of patients who were diagnosed with high-grade VUR, renal scarring, or underwent surgical correction of VUR had a negative screening RBUS.[Imaging and the first urinary infection in children. Respective role of each test during the initial evaluation apropos of 122 cases].122 pediatric patients with a first urinary tract infection underwent renal ultrasonography (US) and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) to evaluate the usefulness of this association. The US was always the first examination undertaken, its sensitivity seems to be very good in detecting renal abnormalities. The major finding on the VCUG was the vesico-ureteral reflux: 25% of cases. When the sonogram and the VCUG are normal, 60% of cases, excretory urography is not considered necessary.The value of ultrasound in diagnosing vesicoureteral reflux in young children with urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection is a common pediatric problem and vesicoureteral reflux is its most common complication. Detection of this reflux has classically been achieved by voiding cystouretrography (VCUG). Ultrasonography for evaluation of vesicoureteral reflux is shown to be feasible but is not widely accepted. Our aim was to assess the value of routine sonography in detecting vesicoureteral reflux is young children with urinary tract infection. This study was carried out in 105 patients suffering from urinary tract infection admitted to Shahid Sadughi Hospital in Yazd, Iran. These patients were evaluated by two methods (sonography and VCUG). Overall sensitivity and specificity value of sonography in suggesting vesicoureteral reflux were 63% and 95% respectively. The most accurate results were obtained with high grades reflux (75% and 955). The results reconfirmed that sonography is reliable in the exclusion or verification of high grade reflux and it has a low sensitivity in low grade vesicoureteral reflux.[Imaging studies in the first urinary infection with fever in infants: is voiding cystourethrography necessary?].The presence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in an infant with urinary tract infection (UTI), does not necessarily lead to an acquired renal injury. Only serious reflux can be a factor in fostering its appearance.To assess whether in infants diagnosed for the first time with a UTI with a fever, a routine initial DMSA can be used as a screening method for detecting severe reflux and replace voiding cystourethrography (VCUG).We retrospectively studied 162 infants under 2 years old admitted to our hospital due to having a ITU with fever for the first time (92 males and 70 females). In all cases, a renal ultrasound, DMSA and VCUG had been performed a few days after the diagnosis.Of the 162 patients, 62 (38 %) had VUR, of which 56 (90 %) were mild and 6 (10 %) were severe. The DMSA was abnormal in 26/100 patients without VUR (26 %), 12/56 with mild VUR (21 %) and 6/6 of those with severe VUR (100 %). DMSA sensitivity for detecting severe reflux was 100 % and specificity was 76 %. The positive predictive value and negative predictive value was 14 % and 100 % respectively. The positive likelihood ratio was 4.17 and the negative likelihood ratio was 0.It is unnecessary to carry out VCUG in an infant with an initial UTI, and a negative DMSA.99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children: relation to clinical and radiological findings.Seventy-two children, 59 girls and 13 boys, 0.1-15.9 (median 1.1) years of age, with acute pyelonephritis (APN) were investigated with the aid of a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, renal ultrasonography (US) and a desmopressin test within 5 days of admission. Sixty-two children were reinvestigated approximately 2 months later when intravenous urography (IVU) and micturition cysto-urethrography were also performed. During infection, 92% of the children showed changes in the DMSA scan with 69% by US, and the two investigations agreed in 58% of the kidneys. At follow-up, 68% showed changes in the DMSA scan, 47% by US and 48% by IVU. The DMSA scan and IVU agreed in 60% of the kidneys. Twenty-nine percent of the children had vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). The presence of grade greater than or equal to 3 VUR was associated with greater defects on the DMSA scan during infection, and at follow-up with a higher frequency of persistent changes compared with no VUR (P less than 0.02 and 0.01, respectively). During infection the size of the defect on the DMSA scan correlated with renal volume and C-reactive protein and inversely with the glomerular filtration rate, and at follow-up it correlated inversely with the renal concentration capacity. The DMSA scan is a sensitive method for diagnosing and localizing APN in children, and findings on DMSA scan show a weak but significant correlation with routine clinical and radiological parameters. It is suggested that persistent renal damage after APN in children without VUR may be more common than previously assumed.Kidney imaging in management of delayed febrile urinary tract infection.We report a cross-sectional study performed to evaluate the imaging findings of 40 children, aged one month to five years (16.65 ± 14.97 months), who presented with protracted fever of more than 48 hours due to urinary tract infection (UTI). About 85% of the patients had positive Tc99-Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and 58% had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR). Kidney sonography aided in the diagnosis and treatment in 10% of the patients. Age, sex, presence or laterality of VUR did not contribute to defective DMSA scan (pyelonephritis) (P > 0.05). Delayed diagnosis and treatment of febrile UTI is associated with a high incidence of positive findings of DMSA scan irrespective of age, sex or presence/absence of VUR. In mild VUR, the DMSA scan may be normal while in patients with moderate and severe VUR the DMSA scan is almost always abnormal. Thus, our study shows that a normal DMSA scan can help in ruling out moderate to severe forms of VUR and that cystography remains an excellent and standard tool for the diagnosis of VUR.Involvement of the renal parenchyma in acute urinary tract infection: the contribution of 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid scan.We performed 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasonography in 146 children during the acute phase of a proven urinary tract infection (UTI). In 99 a micturating cysto-urethrography and in 83 an intravenous urography was also done. The occurrence of fever and increased WBC count, CRP and ESR were also studied. It appeared from this retrospective study that 47% of the kidneys had a cortical or patchy pattern of decreased uptake of 99mTc DMSA, as compared to 23% with abnormal findings on US. Vesico-ureteral reflux was present in 38% of the kidneys with parenchymal involvement on 99mTc DMSA scan. Although fever, leucocytosis and elevated CRP and ESR were significantly correlated with abnormal 99mTc DMSA scan, they were also observed in children without renal parenchymal involvement. Our results suggest that 99mTc DMSA scan is a sensitive method for the detection of parenchymal involvement during acute UTI. The exact nature of these lesions and their relation with scars need, however, to be defined.Prevalence of vesicoureteral reflux in neonatal urinary tract infection.Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) after a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) is apparently diagnosed much more frequently (25%-40%) in children than in neonates. The aims of the study were to determine the actual rate of VUR in neonates with UTI and to define the clinical clues to its diagnosis. The study sample included term infants with a diagnosis of UTI during their first month of life who were seen in this hospital between January 1997 and May 1999. All infants underwent complete diagnostic work-up (renal ultrasound and voiding cystourethrography [VCUG]). The medical files were reviewed for patient sex, age at UTI diagnosis, laboratory findings (including causative pathogen), and ultrasonographic findings. These parameters were correlated with the finding of VUR on VCUG. Sixty-four neonates (55 males, 9 females) with UTI were included in this study. UTI was 6 times more common in males than females, although the incidence of VUR was equal between the sexes (about 20%). The presence of VUR was associated with a significantly younger age at presentation of UTI (11.4+/-4 vs 16.9+/-6.6 days, p<0.01). VUR was diagnosed at a fourfold higher rate in neonates with Klebsiella-induced UTI compared to those with E. Coli-UTI. In 80% of those with significantly abnormal ultrasonographic findings VUR was found on VCUG. Jaundice was noted at UTI diagnosis 3 times more often in infants with VUR, and elevated creatinine level, 2.5 times more often.Predisposing factors for renal scarring in children with urinary tract infection.This study was undertaken to determine the predisposing factors for renal scarring in children with urinary tract infection. In this prospective cohort study, 176 children with documented urinary tract infection were categorized into four groups: ≤1 year old, 1-2 years old, 2-7 years and 7-14 years old. Ultrasonography and Technetium-99 m-DMSA scan were used to detect the possible abnormalities. Infants under 12 months old presented as the most common group for renal scarring (27 cases, 52.9%), and vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was diagnosed in 29 cases (56.8%). Fifteen (41.67%) children between the ages of one and two years had renal scar, and VUR was detected in half of the patients. In the third group, 36.3%, and in fourth group, 41.6% of the patients had renal scar. Also, 38.6% in group three and 50% in the final group had VUR. A co-incidental finding that was observed in this study was the high incidence of pseudohypoaldesteronism (PHA) in our patients: in 39.2% of the children in group one, 22.2% in group two and 4% in group three. In group four however, none of the patients had PHA. Risk of scar formation with urinary tract infection (UTI) was higher in the younger age group and in those with recurrent UTIs.The value of ultrasonography as a screening procedure in a first-documented urinary tract infection in children.To evaluate the role of ultrasonography in the investigation of childhood urinary tract infections (UTI), 240 patients aged 2 days to 15 years with a first-documented UTI were examined first by sonography, then by intravenous urography (IVU), and when indicated by voiding cysto-urethrogram (VCU). According to the results of these examinations, the patients were divided into three groups. In Group 1 (71 patients), abnormal sonographic findings were confirmed by the radiographic studies. Patients in Group 2 (51 patients) had discrepancies between sonographic and radiographic findings, the most important of which concerned the assessment of vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). In Group 3 (118 patients), sonographic and subsequent radiographic investigations were normal. Although ultrasonography can sometimes detect VUR, major reflux can be missed by sonography alone. In young children at risk for reflux nephropathy, ultrasound examination of the urinary tract must be accompanied by a VCU or isotope cysto-urethrogram.Technetium-99m-DMSA studies in pediatric urinary infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common condition in children and may lead to renal scarring with a risk of later hypertension and renal insufficiency. We made a cross-sectional study of the 99mTc-DMSA findings in 496 children referred for following symptomatic UTI to a Department of Nuclear Medicine and we categorized the results, to provide a framework for further study.A standard 99mTc-DMSA protocol was used to study 496 children (157 males, 339 females) aged from birth to 14 yr. Findings were classified according to the image appearance and relative function of each kidney. These were related to age, sex, history and timing of UTI and the results on micturating cysto-urethrography (MCU).Images were normal, with function within limits (45%-50% in one kidney), in approximately half the boys and girls studied. The other images were classified as equivocal in 68 children, abnormal unilaterally in 105 and bilaterally in 76, and they were subdivided according to the image appearance. No image changes could be identified that were specifically associated with acute UTI. Diffuse change alone was uncommon. A high proportion of abnormal images was found in infant boys, older girls with recurrent UTI and those children with vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR). Of the bilateral abnormal images, 98% were seen in children with VUR.Our findings suggest that infective renal change may be superimposed on underlying congenital lesions (perhaps detectable antenatally) or may be acquired following UTI in the presence of reflux and are thus potentially preventable. This study also suggests that VUR is almost certain to have occurred in a child who has bilateral abnormal 99mTc-DMSA images following UTI and is also commonly present in those with definite unilateral defects.Vesicoureteral reflux in older children: concordance of US and voiding cystourethrographic findings.To determine if a negative renal sonogram is reliably predictive of the absence of vesicoureteral reflux at voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in children aged 5 years or older.Imaging studies in 70 children aged 5 years or older who underwent renal ultrasound (US) and VCUG on the same day were reviewed. These children had initially undergone evaluation because of a urinary tract infection.Five of 70 children had abnormal sonograms; two (40%) of the five had reflux at VCUG. One had mild pelvicalyceal dilatation, and one had a small kidney. The other three (without reflux) had a pelvic kidney, a calyceal diverticulum, or a renal stone. Of 65 children with a negative sonogram, 19 (29%) had reflux at VCUG; 46 (71%) did not. Altogether, of the 70 children, 21 had reflux, 19 (90%) of whom had no sonographic abnormality.Children with abnormal screening renal sonograms often have vesicoureteral reflux, but a normal sonogram does not reliably exclude the condition even in children aged 5 years or older. Therefore, VCUG must be performed even in older children, regardless of US findings, if clinical decisions are influenced by documentation of the presence of VUR.The efficacy of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scan in predicting vesicoureteral reflux in children below the age of 2 years with their first febrile urinary tract infection.We evaluated the efficacy of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) in comparison with voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in predicting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children below the age of 2 years. Medical records and radiologic studies of children (<2 years) suffering their first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) between January 2001 and May 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of US and DMSA scans in diagnosing VUR. Among 220 children with their first febrile UTI, VUR was detected in 67 (30.4%). The detection rate of VUR by US was 41.7% and 86% in the low (I, II) and high grade (III~IV) groups, respectively. Detection rate of VUR by DMSA scan was 37.5% and 88.4% in the low and high grade groups, respectively. Combining US and DMSA scan, we found that the detection rate of high grade VUR was 95.3% and that of low grade was 62.5%. During follow up, most of the low grade VURs with normal DMSA and US scans resolved or were downgraded. Most high grade VURs could be detected by US and DMSA scan, but the prediction rate was not as high in low grade VURs. However, we can anticipate spontaneous improvement without complications in patients with either low or high grade reflux and negative findings on US and DMSA scan.Imaging studies after a first febrile urinary tract infection in young children.Guidelines from the American Academy of Pediatrics recommend obtaining a voiding cystourethrogram and a renal ultrasonogram for young children after a first urinary tract infection; renal scanning with technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid has also been endorsed by other authorities. We investigated whether imaging studies altered management or improved outcomes in young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection.In a prospective trial involving 309 children (1 to 24 months old), an ultrasonogram and an initial renal scan were obtained within 72 hours after diagnosis, contrast voiding cystourethrography was performed one month later, and renal scanning was repeated six months later.The ultrasonographic results were normal in 88 percent of the children (272 of 309); the identified abnormalities did not modify management. Acute pyelonephritis was diagnosed in 61 percent of the children (190 of 309). Thirty-nine percent of the children who underwent cystourethrography (117 of 302) had vesicoureteral reflux; 96 percent of these children (112 of 117) had grade I, II, or III vesicoureteral reflux. Repeated scans were obtained for 89 percent of the children (275 of 309); renal scarring was noted in 9.5 percent of these children (26 of 275).An ultrasonogram performed at the time of acute illness is of limited value. A voiding cystourethrogram for the identification of reflux is useful only if antimicrobial prophylaxis is effective in reducing reinfections and renal scarring. Renal scans obtained at presentation identify children with acute pyelonephritis, and scans obtained six months later identify those with renal scarring. The routine performance of urinalysis, urine culture, or both during subsequent febrile illnesses in all children with a previous febrile urinary tract infection will probably obviate the need to obtain either early or late scans.Comparison of screening of vesicoureteral reflux with renal ultrasound and voiding cystourethrography.To suggest a different method for diagnosing vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in lieu of voiding cystourethrography (VCU), in order to prevent radiation exposure.Fifty-two ureterorenal units of 26 patients were evaluated ultrasonographically for visualizing the renal collecting systems, both before and after filling up the bladder with saline infusion. Every patient also underwent evaluation with VCU.All patients with Grade 2 or higher degrees of VUR on VCU can be identified by ultrasound (USG). Overall sensitivity and specificity of this technique were 66.7% and 93.48%, respectively, in our patient group.After being diagnosed with VCU initially a VUR patient can be effectively followed up by USG in order to prevent radiation exposure. Considering the clinical management of a patient with Grade 1 VUR which could not be detected with USG, it is concluded that failure to detect Grade 1 VUR will not be a handicap.Comprehensive ultrasound versus voiding cysturethrography in the diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux.This study evaluates the accuracy of noninvasive renal ultrasound (US) in the detection of dilative vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) compared to voiding cysturethrography (VCUG), taking both sonographic morphology and kidney length into account. The data and images of 205 paediatric patients who had renal ultrasound and VCUG performed were reviewed. Abnormalities of renal length and kidney morphology were compared with degree of reflux on VCUG for each renal unit. A total of 407 renal units were evaluated. When the sonographic diagnosis of reflux was based solely on morphological criteria and degree of dilatation, correlation with VCUG results was poor. However, the fraction of kidneys of anomalous size increased markedly with grade of reflux, from 10% of non-refluxing renal units to 50% of renal units subjected to grade 4 and 5 VUR. Taking abnormal kidney length into account as well, dilative VUR was diagnosed by ultrasound with a sensitivity of 92% (95% CI 82%-100%) and a sensitivity of 67% (95% CI 63%-72%), P<0.001.the results of this study show that ultrasound cannot accurately diagnose vesicoureteric reflux by morphological changes alone, but requires the consideration of age-adjusted abnormalities in kidney length.Imaging after urinary tract infection in male neonates.To assess the frequency of urinary tract anomalies in male neonates <8 weeks old who presented with urinary tract infection (UTI), and to evaluate a suitable imaging approach after the initial infection.During a period of 4.5 years, from July 1994 through December 1998, 45 male neonates <8 weeks old (range: 5-56 days; mean: 23.77 days) with UTI were hospitalized. All patients had an ultrasound (US) and a voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG), except 1 neonate in whom VCUG was unsuccessful because of technical problems. A dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan was recommended to all patients but was performed only in 30 of 45, most of them with an abnormal VCUG. The renal scan was performed at least 4 months after the UTI.Urinary tract abnormalities were observed in 22 of 45 male neonates. Nineteen had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), 1 had VUR and a double collecting system, 1 had VUR and a posterior urethral valve, and 1 had an ureteropelvic junction stricture. Renal atrophy or scars, as demonstrated by DMSA scan, were detected almost exclusively in neonates with VUR grade 3 and above. Only 1 neonate with VUR grade 1 had a pathologic DMSA, and the US of this male also demonstrated renal atrophy. Escherichia coli was the pathogen in 62% (28 of 45), and 9 boys had bacteremia.We suggest that US and VCUG should be performed routinely after the initial UTI in male neonates. Renal scan should be reserved for those cases in which the US suggests renal parenchymal damage or when VCUG detects VUR grade 3 and above.Combined use of late phase dimercapto-succinic acid renal scintigraphy and ultrasound as first line screening after urinary tract infection in children.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of dimercapto-succinic acid renal scintigraphy and renal ultrasound in identifying high grade vesicoureteral reflux in children after a first episode of urinary tract infection.A total of 533 children following a first urinary tract infection were included in the analysis. Patients were assessed by 3 diagnostic imaging studies, renal ultrasound, dimercapto-succinic acid scan and voiding cystourethrography. The main event of interest was the presence of high grade (III to V) vesicoureteral reflux. The combined and separate diagnostic accuracy of screening methods was assessed by calculation of diagnostic OR, sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and likelihood ratio.A total of 246 patients had reflux, of whom 144 (27%) had high grade (III to V) disease. Sensitivity, negative predictive value and diagnostic OR of ultrasound for high grade reflux were 83.3%, 90.8% and 7.9, respectively. Dimercapto-succinic acid scan had the same sensitivity as ultrasound but a higher negative predictive value (91.7%) and diagnostic OR (10.9). If both tests were analyzed in parallel by using the OR rule, ie a negative diagnosis was established only when both test results were normal, sensitivity increased to 97%, negative predictive value to 97% and diagnostic OR to 25.3. Only 9 children (6.3%) with dilating reflux had an absence of alterations in both tests.Our findings support the idea that ultrasound and dimercapto-succinic acid scan used in combination are reliable predictors of dilating vesicoureteral reflux.DMSA study performed during febrile urinary tract infection: a predictor of patient outcome?Technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) study has been advocated as a method for the assessment of renal sequelae after acute febrile urinary tract infection (UTI). However, it is not known whether DMSA scintigraphy performed during acute UTI has any prognostic value for outcome assessment. The objective of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of DMSA scintigraphy performed during UTI as a predictor of patient outcome, to identify children at risk of events [vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR) or recurrent UTI] that may lead to the development of progressive renal damage. One hundred and fifty-two children (including 78 girls) with a mean age of 20 months (range 1 month to 12 years) with first febrile UTI were evaluated by DMSA scintigraphy during acute UTI. After acute UTI, children were explored by voiding cysto-urethrography. Children who presented an abnormal DMSA study, or a normal DMSA study but VUR or recurrent UTI, underwent a DMSA control study 6 months after UTI. Children with VUR were followed up by direct radionuclide cystography. DMSA scintigraphy performed during acute UTI was normal in 112 children (74%). In 95 of these children, follow-up DMSA scintigraphy was not performed owing to a good clinical outcome. In the remaining 17 children, follow-up scintigraphy was normal. Forty children (26%) presented abnormal DMSA study during acute UTI. Twenty-five of them presented a normal follow-up DMSA, and 15 presented cortical lesions. Children with abnormal DMSA had a higher frequency of VUR than children with normal DMSA (48% vs 12%). It is concluded that children with normal DMSA during acute UTI have a low risk of renal damage. Children with normal follow-up DMSA and low-grade VUR have more frequent spontaneous resolution of VUR.[Retrograde cystography after a first episode of acute pyelonephritis in the child and adolescent].In spite of its invasiveness, voiding cystourethrography remains the gold-standard examination for detecting vesico-ureteric reflux. The aim of this study was to determine if voiding cysto-urethrography is useful at any pediatric age in girls after a first acute pyelonephritis. 152 patients have been retrospectively studied. Both reflux frequency and grade progressively decreased according to age. Sonography was unable to predict reflux. In more than 3-year-old girls, 8/30 children with reflux had voiding dysfunction. We suggest clinical and/or a flow-metric evaluation for voiding dysfunction prior to voiding cystourethrography. After 9 years, reflux was so rare that voiding cystourethrography should be discussed on an individual basis.Detection of significant vesico-ureteric reflux by ultrasound in infants and children.We evaluated real-time ultrasonography in the diagnosis of vesico-ureteric reflux by comparing its findings to those of dynamic micturition cystourethrography. The study material comprised 124 consecutive infants and children referred to uroradiological workup, usually because of a relapsing febrile urinary tract infection. Both examinations were done during the same session. Consistent findings were obtained on 232 ureters, of which 37 displayed II. and 19 III. + reflux. II. reflux was found in 12 ureters by cystography only; thus one-fourth of low-grade refluxes escaped the diagnosis by ultrasound. The false negative findings of ultrasound examination included also two ureters showing III. reflux in cystography. As calculated for therapy-requiring (grade III or higher) reflux, the sensitivity of ultrasound was 90 per cent and its specificity 100 per cent. We conclude that ultrasound can be used as a primary diagnostic technique for girls, and in the follow-up of both boys and girls.Use of ultrasonography in the detection of ureteric reflux in children suspected of having urinary infection.The present study investigated whether ultrasonography was effective in detecting ureteric reflux in children suspected of having urinary infection. Seventeen children with febrile episodes and pyuria were enrolled. The ultrasound examination revealed ballooning of the renal pelvis during bladder contraction in 4 children, dilatation of the distal ureters in 6, and small kidney in 2. Cystography was performed on the 6 children with these ultrasound abnormalities and 1 child with two episodes of suspected urinary infection. Four children showed reflux. All of the 4 children had been found to have renal pelvic ballooning on ultrasound. None of the 10 children who did not undergo cystography had recurrence of urinary infection or significant bacteriuria during a median follow-up period of 12 months. Thus, scanning during bladder contraction was effective in detecting significant ureteric reflux.Prophylaxis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children? A multicenter, randomized, controlled, noninferiority trial.Febrile urinary tract infections are common in children and associated with the risk for renal scarring and long-term complications. Antimicrobial prophylaxis has been used to reduce the risk for recurrence. We performed a study to determine whether no prophylaxis is similar to antimicrobial prophylaxis for 12 months in reducing the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections in children after a first febrile urinary tract infection.The study was a controlled, randomized, open-label, 2-armed, noninferiority trial comparing no prophylaxis with prophylaxis (co-trimoxazole 15 mg/kg per day or co-amoxiclav 15 mg/kg per day) for 12 months. A total of 338 children who were aged 2 months to <7 years and had a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled: 309 with a confirmed pyelonephritis on a technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan with or without reflux and 27 with a clinical pyelonephritis and reflux. The primary end point was recurrence rate of febrile urinary tract infections during 12 months. Secondary end point was the rate of renal scarring produced by recurrent urinary tract infections on technetium 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid scan after 12 months.Intention-to-treat analysis showed no significant differences in the primary outcome between no prophylaxis and prophylaxis: 12 (9.45%) of 127 vs 15 (7.11%) of 211. In the subgroup of children with reflux, the recurrence of febrile urinary tract infections was 9 (19.6%) of 46 on no prophylaxis and 10 (12.1%) of 82 on prophylaxis. No significant difference was found in the secondary outcome: 2 (1.9%) of 108 on no prophylaxis versus 2 (1.1%) of 187 on prophylaxis. Bivariate analysis and Cox proportional hazard model showed that grade III reflux was a risk factor for recurrent febrile urinary tract infections. Whereas increasing age was protective, use of no prophylaxis was not a risk factor.For children with or without primary nonsevere reflux, prophylaxis does not reduce the rate of recurrent febrile urinary tract infections after the first episode.Is VCUG still indicated following the first episode of urinary tract infection in boys?To determine if voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) following first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) offers any incremental diagnostic advantage in boys if a comprehensive renal and bladder ultrasonogram (RBUS) revealed no abnormalities.All boys less than 10 years of age whose first evaluation for UTI included RBUS and VCUG were retrospectively studied over a 10-year period. Those with a disorder of the urinary tract known before imaging were excluded. RBUS and VCUG results were analyzed.Of the 77 who met the inclusion criteria, 58 (77%) were <1 year old. 45 (58%) boys had normal RBUS and VCUG. In 16 (21%) both studies were abnormal: 15 had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and one had posterior urethral valves. The remaining 16 (21%) had one abnormal study: 10 had pelvicaliectasis on RBUS without VUR; 6 had normal RBUS with VUR. No urethral abnormality was diagnosed on VCUG when RBUS was normal. Of the six who had VUR and normal RBUS, the one who required surgical intervention had recurrent febrile UTI.If a well-performed RBUS is normal in a boy with first UTI, the likelihood of a significant finding in VCUG is low. A VCUG is likewise of no apparent screening benefit for obstructive uropathy. With the uncertainties surrounding the benefit of chemoprophylaxis, omitting a VCUG when a RBUS is normal in boys with a first UTI avoids the morbidity without missing important pathologies or altering evolving management protocols.Age-related renal parenchymal lesions in children with first febrile urinary tract infections.The aim of this study was to define the association between age and the occurrence of acute pyelonephritis and renal scars.Between 1999 and 2002, all children 0 to 14 years of age consecutively seen with a first febrile urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study. (99m)Tc-Dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy was performed within 5 days after admission for the detection of renal parenchymal involvement. The presence of vesicoureteral reflux was assessed by using cystography performed 1 month after the infection. If the acute scan results were abnormal, then follow-up (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning was performed after 6 months, to assess the frequency of scars.A total of 316 children were enrolled in the study (190 children <1 year, 99 children 1-4 years, and 27 children 5-14 years of age). (99m)Tc-Dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy revealed that 59% of the children had renal involvement in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of kidney involvement in infants <1 year of age (49%) was significantly lower than that in children 1 to 4 years of age (73%) and >5 years of age (81%). Of the 187 children with positive acute (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan results, 123 underwent repeat scintigraphy after 6 months. Renal scars were found for 28% of children <1 year, 37% of children 1 to 4 years, and 53% of children 5 to 14 years of age. No significant differences in the frequency of scars and the presence or absence of vesicoureteral reflux were noted.Our findings confirm that acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring occur only in some children with first febrile urinary tract infections. Children <1 year of age with febrile urinary tract infections have a lower risk of parenchymal localization of infection and renal scarring.Comparison of ultrasound and dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy changes in acute pyelonephritis.The strategy for morphological investigations in children with acute pyelonephritis (APN) remains debatable. We studied 70 children (median age 2.0 years) admitted with a first episode of pyelonephritis using a high-resolution ultrasound technique (RUS) and compared the results with 99m technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy. The DMSA scan was abnormal in 62 children (89%). However, using a high-frequency transducer we found abnormal sonogram changes in 61 children (87%), consisting of an increased kidney volume in 42, and/or a thickening of the wall of the renal pelvis in 42, and/or a focal hyper- or hypoechogenicity in 36, and/or a diffuse hyperechogenicity in 31 children. Micturating cystourethrography was performed in all children, revealing vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in 22 (31%). Among those children with VUR, 4 had a normal DMSA scan, 2 an abnormal RUS, and 2 a normal DMSA scan and RUS. Our data suggest that B-mode RUS performed with a high-frequency transducer by a trained radiologist is nearly as sensitive as the DMSA scan in diagnosing renal involvement in children with unobstructed APN and in predicting VUR.Prognostic value of the acute DMSA scan in children with first urinary tract infection.We attempted to verify in a group of 101 children with first urinary tract infection whether it was possible to identify groups of patients with different risks of developing renal scarring by taking into account both the extent of kidney involvement documented in the acute phase of infection using a dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, and the presence or absence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR). The frequency of persistent lesions in kidneys with mild-moderate lesions (less than 50% of kidney involvement) in the presence of VUR or in non-refluxing kidneys was similar (P=0.1447), while the frequency of persistent lesions in kidneys with severe lesions in the presence of VUR was significantly higher than the frequency of persistent lesions in non-refluxing kidneys (P=0.0089). The extent of kidney involvement and the presence of VUR make possible the identification of different categories of risk of scarring: in the "low risk group" (normal kidney with/without VUR) the risk of scarring is 0%; in the "intermediate risk group" (mild lesions with/without VUR; extensive lesions without VUR) the risk of scarring is between 14% and 38%, while in the "high risk group" (extensive lesions with VUR) the risk of scarring is 88%. Quantifying the risk of scarring could help in planning the treatment or in modifying the later strategy.The role of DMSA renal scintigraphy in the first episode of urinary tract infection in childhood.The role of dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scintigraphy in the first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) has been the subject of debate for many years. The aim of this study was to evaluate the relationship of voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), renal ultrasonography and DMSA renal scintigraphy and to detect renal parenchymal changes by performing DMSA renal scintigraphy at 6 months after the first episode of UTI.A prospective study was conducted in 67 hospitalized children (46 boys, 21 girls). Mean age of the patients was 0.97 ± 1.57 years (0.02-7.26 years). All children received VCUG, renal ultrasonography and DMSA renal scintigraphy. DMSA renal scintigraphy was performed at 1 and 6 months after UTI.Of 67 children, 17 (25.4%), 23 (34.3%) and 20 (29.9%) had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), abnormal renal ultrasonography and abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy, respectively. Unilateral hydronephrosis had a significant correlation with VUR at p value 0.024. In renal units, abnormal renal ultrasonography and hydronephrosis had significant correlations with VUR at p values 0.039 and 0.021, respectively. In patients and renal units, hydronephrosis had no significant correlation with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at 1 month after UTI. However, abnormal renal ultrasonography and VUR had significant correlations with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at p values 0.022 and < 0.001 in patients and at p values 0.024 and < 0.001 in renal units, respectively. Both in patients and renal units, VUR (Grade I-III) had no significant correlation with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy. However, severe VUR (Grade IV-V) had significant correlations with abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at p values < 0.001 and < 0.001, respectively. Seventeen patients underwent DMSA renal scintigraphy at 6 months after UTI. In addition, 15 (88.2%) developed persistent renal scarring.Abnormal renal ultrasonography and severe VUR identify renal parenchymal changes. DMSA renal scintigraphy in the first episode of UTI should be carried out in those patients. Abnormal DMSA renal scintigraphy at 1 month after UTI has a tendency to persist.Renal ultrasound findings and vesicoureteral reflux in children hospitalised with urinary tract infection.To determine the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of renal ultrasound findings for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).Retrospective review of the ultrasound and voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) results of 162 children under 5 years of age admitted with their first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) over a two year period. Ultrasound findings were considered suggestive of VUR if "dilatation of the pelvi-calyces", "dilatation of the ureters", or "dilatation of the collecting system" of one or both kidneys was reported.A total of 162 patients were eligible for inclusion (median age 85 days; 71 (44%) were female). The prevalence of VUR was 22%. Ultrasound findings were positive for VUR in 14 of 35 patients with confirmed VUR on VCUG, and positive in 30 of 127 patients without VUR on VCUG. Of 21 patients who had a normal ultrasound but showed VUR on VCUG, 14 had grade II reflux, five grade III reflux, and two grade IV reflux. The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasound in suggesting VUR were 40% and 76%, respectively. The positive predictive value of ultrasound in suggesting VUR was 32%; the negative predictive value was 82%.Renal ultrasound findings are neither sensitive nor specific for VUR in children with a first UTI.Practice guidelines for imaging studies in children after the first urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection is common in children and may be associated with significant urinary tract pathology. Many children are investigated for vesicoureteral reflux after the first urinary tract infection but less than a quarter have reflux. Imaging with voiding cystourethrogram is not without risk. An approach was proposed to predict reflux in children with a urinary tract infection. We sought to validate a preestablished clinical decision rule to target voiding cystourethrogram more efficiently in children after the first urinary tract infection.We tested the usefulness of a clinical decision rule to predict vesicoureteral reflux in 406 consecutive children younger than 5 years who were treated or referred for consultation due to an acute urinary tract infection. Symptoms and signs of urinary tract infection and imaging findings were analyzed.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 120 children (35%), including 69 (20%) with grade III-V reflux. An abnormal ultrasound finding was seen in 71 cases (18%) but was not associated with reflux. The clinical decision rule appeared to have poor sensitivity of only 24% to identify grade III-V reflux. We found it impractical to predict vesicoureteral reflux in children with a urinary tract infection.Results show that it is not possible to predict grade III-V vesicoureteral reflux reliably using the clinical decision rule. The recent guidelines recommending a search for reflux after a urinary tract infection in children cannot be revised using this decision rule.Childhood urinary tract infection: a clinical analysis of 597 cases.To gain new insights into the epidemiology, genitourinary (GU) tract anomalies, etiologies, susceptibility of urinary pathogens to antibiotics in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) during the past decade in Taiwan.By reviewing medical charts for patients admitted to Kaohsiung Veterans General Hospital between January 1995 and December 2003, we identified and enrolled patients 14 years of age or less admitted due to UTI that was confirmed by positive urine culture.A total of 597 patients made up our sample. Sixty-eight percent of patients were 1 year old or younger. Boys predominated infant cohort (68.1%). Twenty-seven point one percent of the patients were found in urinalysis to have 5 white blood cells or fewer per high power field and 17.6% had positive nitrite reaction. The pathogens were Escherichia coli, the most common (74.7%), followed by Proteus spp. (6.7%), and Klebsiella spp. (6.4%). E. coli was resistant to ampicillin in 82.0% of the cases, followed by sulfamethoxazole/trimethoprim (55.2%), gentamicin (24.9%), and cefazolin (24%). Resistance to ampicillin and sulfamethoxazole/trimethoprim tended to increase year by year. Forty point seven percent (164/408) of patients had GU tract anomalies, the most common being vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) (87/164, 53.0%). Thirty-three point two percent of the patients with acute pyelonephritis, confirmed by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan, had VUR.Our cohort was predominated by boys, especially in those less than a year old. E. coli, the most common pathogen, had a higher rate of resistance to ampicillin and sulfamethoxazole/ trimethoprim. The pathogens that cause UTI were found to be becoming increasingly resistant to the common antimicrobial agents used in this study. The most common GU tract anomaly was VUR, yet the incidence was lower than that of other reports. A positive DMSA renal scan finding was a good indicator for prediction the possibility of VUR in UTI patients.Investigating febrile UTI in infants: is a cystogram necessary?Current imaging recommendations for investigating any infantile febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) are ultrasound scan (US), micturating cystourethrogram (MCUG) and dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. The aim of this retrospective cohort study was to determine the need and indications for MCUG in the investigation of a first febrile infantile UTI, as doubts have been raised over its benefit.Information on 427 infants who had undergone US, MCUG and DMSA following a first febrile UTI was prospectively recorded. The infants were divided into two groups: A (354) with normal renal US and B (73) with abnormal US. DMSA findings were correlated with findings on MCUG. Main outcome measures were incidence of recurrent UTIs, change in management or intervention as a result of MCUG, and outcome at discharge.Only 21/354 (6%) infants in Group A had both scarring on DMSA and vesicoureteric reflux (VUR), predominantly low-grade on MCUG. In Group B (abnormal US), 23/73 (32%) had scarring on DMSA and vesicoureteric reflux, predominantly high grade on MCUG. Of the infants with non-scarred kidneys, 73% had dilating reflux. Successful conservative treatment was performed in 423 infants, and 4 infants in Group B required surgery.We recommend US and DMSA in all infantile febrile UTI cases. Where US is normal, MCUG should be reserved for those cases with abnormal DMSA. Where US is abnormal, MCUG should be performed irrespective of findings on DMSA scan. A randomized prospective study is necessary to evaluate this further.Incidence of abnormal imaging and recurrent pyelonephritis after first febrile urinary tract infection in children 2 to 24 months old.The AAP (American Academy of Pediatrics) no longer recommends voiding cystourethrogram in children 2 to 24 months old who present with a first urinary tract infection if renal-bladder ultrasound is normal. We identified factors associated with abnormal imaging and recurrent pyelonephritis in this population.We retrospectively evaluated children diagnosed with a first episode of pyelonephritis at age 2 to 24 months using de-identified electronic medical record data from an institutional database. Data included age at first urinary tract infection, gender, race/ethnicity, need for hospitalization, intravenous antibiotic use, history of abnormal prenatal ultrasound, renal-bladder ultrasound and voiding cystourethrogram results, urinary tract infection recurrence and surgical intervention. Risk factors for abnormal imaging and urinary tract infection recurrence were analyzed by univariate logistic regression, the chi-square test and survival analysis.We identified 174 patients. Of the 154 renal-bladder ultrasounds performed 59 (38%) were abnormal. Abnormal prenatal ultrasound (p = 0.01) and the need for hospitalization (p = 0.02) predicted abnormal renal-bladder ultrasound. Of the 95 patients with normal renal-bladder ultrasound 84 underwent voiding cystourethrogram. Vesicoureteral reflux was more likely in patients who were white (p = 0.003), female (p = 0.02) and older (p = 0.04). Despite normal renal-bladder ultrasound, 23 of 84 patients (24%) had dilating vesicoureteral reflux. Of the 95 patients with normal renal-bladder ultrasound 14 (15%) had recurrent pyelonephritis and 7 (7%) went on to surgical intervention.Despite normal renal-bladder ultrasound after a first pyelonephritis episode, a child may still have vesicoureteral reflux, recurrent pyelonephritis and the need for surgical intervention. If voiding cystourethrogram is deferred, parents should be counseled on these risks.A prospective study of children with first acute symptomatic E. coli urinary tract infection. Early 99mtechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid scan appearances.Between 1985 and 1987 102 children, age 0-14 years, presented with a first acute symptomatic E. coli urinary tract infection. Investigations included early 99mtechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan (which was performed at a median of 27 days), ultrasonography, micturating cysto-urethrography and indirect voiding radionuclide cystography using 99mTc DTPA. Follow-up DMSA scan was carried out after 6 months. Twenty-one of 102 of initial DMSA studies showed diminished uptake of radionuclide and 12 showed cortical scarring. Twenty-nine patients had significant vesicoureteral reflux (VUR). The finding of diminished uptake on the initial scan was significantly associated with fever, systemic upset, length of symptoms and a peripheral blood leucocytosis, (p less than 0.05). In addition the finding was associated with fever and loin pain in the older child. Both diminished uptake and scarring were more common in refluxing kidney units. We propose that, in children with UTI, diminished uptake on early DMSA scan localises infection in the renal parenchyma.Should renal ultrasonography be done routinely in children with first urinary tract infection?To reassess the impact of renal ultrasonography on the care of children with first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) we conducted a computer search and review of medical records of (1) all children who were admitted to our hospital with first febrile urinary tract infection and underwent renal ultrasonography during a 25-month period beginning February 1, 1995, (2) all children diagnosed by ultrasound to have hydronephrosis during the same time period. Of a total of 124 patients with UTI, renal ultrasound appeared normal or showed evidence of acute pyelonephritis in 105 (84.7%), and in another nine (7.2%) it showed only minor findings. In 10 children (8.1%) ultrasound showed hydronephrosis and/or hydroureter. In eight of the latter 10, voiding cystourethrography showed vesicoureteral reflux; in one, posterior urethral valves; and in one, who had a unilateral nonobstructed dilatated system, cystography appeared normal. Except for the last patient, who was given prophylactic antibiotics and continued to have urinary tract infections, in no other case did ultrasound alone have any impact on the patient's management. Four children with both abnormal-appearing renal ultrasound and voiding cystourethrography required surgical intervention. One hundred of the 124 children had a voiding cystourethrogram. In 38 children it detected vesicoureteral reflux and, in another two, bladder abnormalities. Thirty-five of those with abnormal-appearing cystogram but without an indication for surgery were given prophylactic antibiotics. During the same 25-month period, 63 children without urinary tract infection were diagnosed by ultrasound with hydronephrosis. In 45 of them (71.4%) the urologic abnormality had already been detected by prenatal ultrasound. Fourteen of these 45 children (31.1%) required surgery, all for congenital anomalies related to obstructive uropathy. We conclude that routine renal ultrasonography in children with first urinary tract infection has negligible influence on their clinical management. This seems to be due to the recent widespread use, in industrialized countries, of maternal-fetal ultrasonography, which already detects a significant number of children with congenital obstructive uropathy prenatally. On the other hand imaging of the lower urinary tract is of high yield and contributes significantly to patient care. Therefore, whereas imaging of the lower urinary tract should continue to be done routinely in children with first urinary tract infection, renal ultrasound may be reserved for more select cases.Paediatric urinary tract infection and the necessity of complete urological imaging.To evaluate voiding cysto-urethrography (VCUG) in assessing children with urinary tract infection (UTI) when renal/bladder ultrasonography and renal scintigraphy show no abnormality.A total of 468 renal scintigrams taken in children for an indication of UTI between January 1996 and December 1998 were reviewed. The renal and bladder ultrasonograms of those children with a normal renal scan were then reviewed. Children with both normal renal scans and normal ultrasonography were then evaluated for the frequency and grade of vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR) on VCUG.Of the 468 patients, 453 (97%) had complete imaging studies; 152 of the children evaluated had normal renal scans, of whom 101 had a normal renal ultrasonogram. Twenty-three (23%) children with both a normal renal scan and renal/bladder ultrasonogram showed VUR on VCUG, of whom 14 had bilateral VUR and 13 grade III or higher VUR.This study indicates that about 23% of patients may have significant VUR despite both a normal renal scan and ultrasonogram. Therefore, VCUG remains important in evaluating and managing children with UTI.Vesicoureteric reflux in Kuwaiti children with first febrile urinary tract infection.The prevalence of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI) varies among different racial groups. The purpose of this study was to determine the frequency of VUR and associated renal changes in a group of Arab Kuwaiti children with their first documented febrile UTI and to compare our findings with those reported from other racial groups. One hundred and seventy-four children (38 males and 136 females) fulfilled the study criteria and were divided into three age groups (<1 year, 1-5 years, and >5 years). Patients in each group had both micturating cystourethrography (MCUG) and 99m-Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan after diagnosis. VUR was detected in 39 children (22%). Two-thirds of cases had mild reflux (grade I and II). Females ( n=32) had more reflux than males ( n=7) (24% vs. 18%). Sixty-three patients (36%) had abnormal (DMSA) renal scans (acute pyelonephritis [AP] or renal scars). Of these, 79% were children below 5 years. Abnormal DMSA scans were found in 4 of 38 males (11%) versus 59 of 136 females (43%). Abnormal scans in children with VUR were seen in 1 of 7 males (14%) versus 19 of 32 females (59%). In total, the combination of abnormal scan with VUR occurred in 1 of 38 males (3%) and in 19 of 136 females (14%), whereas abnormal scan without demonstrable VUR was seen in 3 of 38 males (8%) versus 40 of 136 females (29%). Our data showed that the frequency of VUR in Arab Kuwaiti children with febrile UTI is midway between Caucasian and other racial groups. In this study, males had a lower-risk profile than females, the latter having a higher rate of reflux as well as a higher rate of abnormal DMSA scans, irrespective of demonstrable VUR.Does urinary tract ultrasonography at hospitalization for acute pyelonephritis predict vesicoureteral reflux?We evaluate the correlation between urinary tract ultrasound during hospitalization for acute pyelonephritis with subsequent voiding cystourethrography in children.Medical records were reviewed of 184 children up to 18 years old who were evaluated with ultrasound during hospitalization for acute pyelonephritis between January 1988 and January 1996. Followup voiding cystourethrography results were compared to the initial ultrasound findings.Ultrasound was performed at mean hospital day 2.1 and voiding cystourethrography was done 39 days later. Of the ultrasound studies 77 (42%) were abnormal, and two-thirds of these abnormalities were upper tract dilatation. Subsequent voiding cystourethrography was performed in 76% of the study population, including 67% of those with normal and 87% of those with abnormal ultrasound. Voiding cystourethrography revealed reflux in 39% of children with upper tract dilatation compared to 35% of those with normal and 36% with abnormal ultrasound for any reason. In addition, the severity of reflux on voiding cystourethrography could not be predicted by ultrasound findings.Ultrasound findings during acute pyelonephritis do not correlate with and are not predictive of the presence or grade of vesicoureteral reflux on subsequent voiding cystourethrography.Alternative approaches to the prognostic stratification of mild to moderate primary vesicoureteral reflux in children.We compared the prognostic stratification of primary vesicoureteral reflux by performing staging voiding cystourethrography in all children with a urinary tract infection or only in those with renal scarring on 99mtechnetium-dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Staging voiding cystourethrography and DMSA scintigraphy were performed in 105 children with a urinary tract infection and reflux persistence was assessed by radionuclide cystography after a 2-year followup.Staging voiding cystourethrography revealed no reflux in 51 children (DMSA positive in 3), grades I to II reflux in 21 (DMSA positive in 6) and grade III reflux in 33 (DMSA positive in 19). On followup radionuclide cystography no new reflux was detected, and it was no longer demonstrated in 23 children (8 with grade III and 15 with grades I to II reflux). The finding of grade III reflux on staging voiding cystourethrography had a 76% positive and a 92% negative value for predicting persistent reflux with an 87% predictive accuracy. Limiting the evaluation of voiding cystourethrography data to the 28 children with a positive DMSA scan the combination of renal scarring and grade III reflux had an 84% positive and an 83% negative predictive value with 83% accuracy. This approach would have prevented 77 children from having to undergo voiding cystourethrography.Performance of staging voiding cystourethrography exclusively in children with renal scarring on a DMSA scan resulted in predictive accuracy that was close to what was achieved by performing voiding cystourethrography in all children with a urinary tract infection. To be able to limit cystourethrography to a select population could prove to be cost-effective.Accuracy of early DMSA scan for VUR in young children with febrile UTI.To evaluate the accuracy of an acute (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan in predicting dilating vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) among young children with a febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).The medical records of children (≤ 2 years of age), presenting with febrile UTI between January 2000 and December 2011, were retrospectively reviewed.A total of 523 children were included in this study, of whom 397 children (75.9%) had abnormal DMSA results and 178 children (34.0%) were identified as VUR on micturating cystourethrography (MCU). Among all the patients, the number of children with dilating VUR was 151 (28.9%). The rate of abnormal results on DMSA for the dilating VUR group was significantly higher than the rates for the non-VUR and low-grade VUR groups (P < .01). In the <6 months age group and ≥ 6 months age group, the sensitivities of DMSA in predicting dilating VUR were 96.15% and 100.0%, respectively, the negative predictive values were 97.26% and 100.0%, respectively, and the negative likelihood ratios were 0.0911 and 0.0000, respectively.For children ≤ 2 years of age with a febrile UTI, an acute DMSA scan is valuable in the exclusion of dilating VUR. The likelihood of the presence of dilating VUR on MCU is rather low when the result of DMSA is negative. DMSA should be conducted to assess the need for an MCU.Abnormal dimercapto-succinic acid scans predict an increased risk of breakthrough infection in children with vesicoureteral reflux.The management of high grade vesicoureteral reflux remains controversial, with breakthrough infections being an indication for surgical repair. We sought to determine if technetium dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scan could help predict which children are at risk for breakthrough urinary tract infection.A retrospective review was performed on children presenting with a febrile urinary tract infection and prenatal hydronephrosis who were found to have vesicoureteral reflux and underwent a DMSA scan. Reflux was tabulated according to the highest grade. DMSA results were graded as 0-normal, no parenchymal or size defects, grade 1-focal parenchymal defects or less than a quarter of a renal unit involved, or grade 2-severe defects to include at least half of a renal unit, bilateral defects or unilateral atrophy.A total of 120 consecutive patients were evaluated. An abnormal DMSA scan was documented in 57 (33 females and 24 males), and 35 with grade 1 and 22 with grade 2 defects. Of the patients 53 females and 10 males had a normal scan. Of the 57 children with an abnormal DMSA scan 6% presented with grades 1 and 2 vesicoureteral reflux, 24% with grade 3, 38% with grade 4 and 26% with grade 5. Of the children with grades 3 to 5 reflux 60% had a subsequent breakthrough infection. Of the 63 children with a normal DMSA scan 11% presented with grade 1 reflux, 28% with grade 2, 48% with grade 3, 11% with grade 4 and 2% with grade 5. Of these children 5 had a subsequent breakthrough infection.An abnormality on DMSA scan in the presence of grade 3 to 5 reflux correlates with a greater chance of having a breakthrough infection (60%). We conclude that children with grade 3 to 5 vesicoureteral reflux and an abnormal DMSA scan are at increased risk for breakthrough urinary tract infection.Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy instead of voiding cystourethrography for infants with urinary tract infection.We study the ability of dimercapto-succinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy to predict the presence of dilating vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in infants with urinary tract infection (UTI) to simplify the evaluation protocol.A retrospective analysis of the records of 303 children younger than 2 years with initial UTI investigated with DMSA scintigraphy and voiding cystourethrography (VCU) within 3 months after UTI was performed.In 156 of the 303 children (51%) DMSA scintigraphy showed renal lesions. VUR was found in 80 patients (26%) and VUR grade significantly correlated with the presence of renal lesions. A normal DMSA scintigraphy and dilating VUR (grade III) occurred in 7 infants. At followup after 1 to 2 years, 6 of these 7 patients had normal DMSA scans and 1 had a scarred duplex kidney. VUR resolved spontaneously in 5 and improved spontaneously to grade 1 in 2 patients. None of the 7 children had recurrent UTI.DMSA scintigraphy in infants with UTI may replace VCU as a first line investigation. A strategy to perform VCU in only patients with renal lesions is proposed. In this study 147 of 303 VCUs would have been unnecessary as only 1 child with a damaged kidney was missed.[Usefulness of renal scintigraphy in the assessment of the first febrile urinary infection in children].The objective of this study was to compare the findings of renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection to determine which method is better in detecting patients at risk of renal injury or reflux.Thirty-three children between 0.2 and 12.3 years of age with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection were studied by means of clinical and laboratory assessment, renal ultrasonography and 99mTc-DMSA renal scintigraphy. In 24 patients (72.7%) a voiding cystourethrography was made. The patients were divided into two groups, those under 2 years of age (n = 14) and those over 2 years old (n = 19).Cortical scintigraphy showed renal changes in 23 patients (69.7%) and ultrasonography showed renal changes in 2 (6.1%; p < 0.05). Children over 2 years of age had a higher incidence of renal lesions than did younger children (84.2% vs 50%; p < 0.05). There were no differences between girls and boys. Reflux was demonstrated in 13 patients (54.2%). Among those kidneys which presented abnormal cortical scintigraphy, vesicoureteral reflux was present in 76.5% of the studies. Furthermore, of those with abnormal ultrasonography vesicoureteral reflux was present in 17.6%.We found a high incidence of renal involvement in children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection. The cortical scintigraphy is more sensitive than ultrasonography in detecting renal changes. The incidence of vesicoureteral reflux in febrile urinary tract infection is high. When there is a renal cortical defect the risk of reflux is higher. This suggests that cortical scintigraphy should be added to the initial examination of children with their first acute febrile urinary tract infection and this could be supplemented by voiding cystourethrography alone, with ultrasonography having a secondary role.The initial renal ultrasound examination in children with urinary tract infection: the prevalence of dilated uropathy has decreased.Pelvocalyceal dilatation (PCD) is often detected by sonography during the prenatal period. Prenatal detection of PCD should affect the prevalence of PCD in children with urinary tract infection (UTI).To determine the prevalence of abnormal sonographic findings in a population of children undergoing first imaging evaluations after UTI and to determine if the prevalence has changed from an earlier study at the same institution.The findings on consecutive first renal and bladder sonographic examinations in 844 children (745 girls, 99 boys) with UTI were retrospectively reviewed. Cystograms were performed in 743/844 (494 nuclear, 249 fluoroscopic). Only children with known congenital malformations or other significant disease were excluded.Sonography was abnormal in 141/844 (16.7%). PCD was noted in 27/844 (3.2%), with mild PCD in 18/844 (2.1%) and moderate or severe PCD in 9/844 (1.1%). Hydroureter without PCD was noted in 6/844 (0.7%). Parenchymal abnormalities were present in 42/844 (5.0%) and bladder wall thickening in 43/844 (5.1%). Vesicoureteral reflux was present in 186/743 (25.0%). When compared to historical controls, PCD and hydroureter were significantly less prevalent than 1 decade earlier (P < 0.0001).The prevalence of PCD in children under first imaging evaluation for UTI declined significantly during the last decade. These data may be useful in the design of imaging strategies for children with UTI.Imaging methods in the study of urinary tract infections in children.When studying a child with urinary tract infection it is important to detect and localize any renal (scar) or urologic anomaly. Here we study the information obtained using: renal and vesical ultrasound (US), DMSA scan and radiologic or isotopic cystogram.We studied 148 children with more than one urinary infection and/or pyelonephritis; their mean age was 35.9 months (1-148 months); 55% were girls. The three diagnostic examinations--US, DMSA scan and cystogram were made in this order; the DMSA scan or cystogram was never made sooner than one month after the UTI.In 42% of the children the three exams were normal; 4 of these children had another UTI and the urodynamic study revealed vesical disfunction. 11% had renal scars (DMSA scan) with normal US and cystogram; 30% had VUR, 50% of which had an altered US and 57% had renal scars on the DMSA scan. 12% of the children had an altered US with a cystogram showing no VUR; 66% of these had renal scars. 4% had vesical anomalies in the US and cystogram.The three exams chosen were able to direct the diagnostic approach of UTI, being sufficient in most of the cases. We would like to emphasize the importance of the DMSA scan in diagnosing unsuspected renal scars.Ureteric jet Doppler waveform: is it a reliable predictor of vesicoureteric reflux in children?The purpose of our prospective study was to find out whether ureteric jet Doppler waveform (UJDW) could be a reliable predictor of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children, compared with echo-enhanced voiding ultrasonography (VUS). Echo-enhanced VUS was performed in 75 children, 57 girls and 18 boys, aged 3 years to 12 years, following the accepted indications for this procedure. During the same procedure the measurement of UJDW was also performed and was considered to be successful (in 70 children) when at least ten UJDWs were recorded per ureteric unit. Depending on the shape of the UJDWs, the sequences were classified into three groups: monophasic, suggestive of VUR; complex, not suggestive of VUR; and mixed sequence, suggestive of VUR when a certain ratio between monophasic and complex UJDWs was achieved. When all three sequences were taken into account, the overall sensitivity and specificity of this method in detecting VUR were 88.5% and 82.3%, respectively. These values seem high enough for this method to be considered as a good alternative to invasive micturating cystographies in screening children for VUR.Evaluation of imaging studies for vesicoureteral reflux in infants with first urinary tract infection.Routine imaging studies following first urinary tract infection(UTI) in infancy are clinically used to identify who has vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and acute pyelonephritis or renal scars. The potential value of these images in avoiding children acquiring renal complication and whether the children benefited from these examinations were not well justified.Analysis was undertaken of 114 infants (228 renal units) at the time of first documented UTI. All underwent renal ultrasound, voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) and dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan on admission and repeated follow-up VCUG, DMSA or both after 4-6 months if initial examinations showed abnormal at first time. The VUR on VCUG when UTI and its statistical correlations with both acute and follow-up DMSA renal scan revealing renal scar were calculated.Seventeen children (14.9%) had VUR detected by VCUG. Forty-six patients (40.4%) had abnormal findings on acute DMSA renal scans (acute pyelonephritis or renal scars). The sensitivity, specificity, positive prediction rate and negative prediction rates of DMSA for VUR were 63%, 82.6%, 32.7% and 94.3%, respectively. The initial identified VUR versus renal scarring on follow-up DMSA showed little correlation.There is limited effectiveness of routine investigation by VCUG in infants with first confirmed UTI. VCUG may be withheld in a child who presents with first UTI before the age of one year if there has been no demonstrable abnormal DMSA scan.Ultrasonography in the radiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection.A prospective blind study comparing the findings of ultrasonography, intravenous pyelography, and voiding cystourethrography was conducted on 81 patients to examine the place of ultrasonography in the initial radiologic evaluation of children with urinary tract infection. The patients' mean age was 4.8 years; 15 were male. Forty-eight were inpatients (mean age, 3.2 years) and 33 were outpatients (mean age 7.2 years). In 29 patients (35.8%) abnormality of the urinary system was detected by one or more of the three imaging procedures; 21 were inpatients and eight were outpatients. The most frequent finding was vesicoureteral reflux, occurring in 62.1% of the pathologic cases. The findings at ultrasonography correlated well with those of intravenous pyelography in 73 of the 81 studies (90.1%), but they failed to demonstrate double collecting systems and several of the minor changes. However, ultrasonography in combination with cystourethrography identified all patients who had abnormal urinary systems, except for two children with negligible findings. Moreover, ultrasonography and cystourethrography together identified all 11 patients, nine of them inpatients, in whom surgical treatment was indicated. It is concluded that ultrasonography can successfully replace intravenous pyelography as a screening imaging procedure for the urinary system, but because of the superiority of intravenous pyelography in the detection of some types of lesions, intravenous pyelography will be required whenever ultrasonography or cystourethrography results are abnormal.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Transient pyelonephritic changes on 99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid scan for at least five months after infection.A prospective study was performed on 185 children with symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI), 130F and 55M, having a median age of 0.9 y (range 0.1-9.8) at the time of UTI. The aim of the study was to find out how the 99mTechnetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan should be used to investigate UTI, and to follow the development of renal changes during pyelonephritis into subsequent permanent renal damage. All children were investigated with a DMSA scan within 5 days after admission and after 3.9-53.3 (median 9.2) weeks, and 159 were studied again after approximately 2 y (range 1.5-3.9 y). They all underwent micturition cystourethrography at the time of the second study. At the time of infection, the DMSA scan was abnormal in 85% of the children, in 58% at the first follow-up and in 36% at the second follow-up. An abnormal DMSA scan performed within 20 weeks from infection became normal in 38% of cases on the third study, while only 1/10 abnormal DMSA scans performed more than 20 weeks after infection became normal after 1.5-3.9 y. Persistent renal changes were more common in children > 4 y of age than in children < or = 1 y of age. Two months after the presenting infection, it was unusual to see a normal DMSA scan in a child with a VUR gr. > or = 3. The study suggests that DMSA changes after an index UTI may be transient for a longer period of time than has been previously considered. Therefore, in order to detect persistent changes, a DMSA scan should be performed more than 5 months after UTI.Urinary tract infection in the newborn: clinical and radio imaging studies.The objective of this study was to assess clinical characteristics and results of radio imaging studies and compare community-acquired urinary tract infection (UTI) with nosocomial UTI in 301 neonates with UTI consecutively admitted to 28 neonatal units in Spain over 3 years (community-acquired UTI, n = 250; nosocomial UTI, n = 51). UTI was diagnosed in the presence of symptoms of infection together with any colony growth for a single pathogen from urine obtained by suprapubic aspiration, or >or=10(4) CFU/ml for a single pathogen from urine obtained by urethral catheterization. Abnormal renal ultrasound was present in 37.1% of cases (34% in community-acquired UTI and 54.5% in nosocomial UTI, P < 0.01). The voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) showed vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in 27% of cases (23.8% in community-acquired UTI and 48.6% in nosocomial UTI, P < 0.01). In patients with abnormal renal ultrasound and VUR, renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) performed early after UTI revealed cortical defects in 69.5% of cases. However, in patients with abnormal renal ultrasound and normal VCUG, DMSA also revealed cortical defects in 39% of cases. The absence of VUR in neonates with UTI and abnormal renal ultrasound does not exclude the presence of cortical defects suggestive of pyelonephritis.[Urinary tract infections and vesicoureteral reflux as a cause of renal parenchymal damage].Infection of the urinary tract is a risk for the damage of parenchyma and kidney function. Dimercaptosuccinil acid (DMSA) scan was used based on the relation between vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), infection of the urinary tract (UTI) and parenchymal kidney damage.The number of observed children was 79, 58 (73.41%) girls and 21 (26.58%) boys: following the first UTIs, recidiv infect and with positive VUR contrast voiding cistourethrography (VCUG) and ultrasound tests were compelted following the treatment of infect within 6 weeks and DMSA within 4 months. The classification of VUR was done of I to V degrees. The damage to the renal parenchyma after DMSA was defined as inhomogen distribution, reduced bonding with radio-farmake as well as portion of the kidney in the overall renal function smaller than 45%.Among 45.56% (36/79) patients VUR was registered. Reflux over III/V was registered among 27.84 (22/79) among whom 24.05% (19/79) were younger than 5 years of age. DMSA scan showed reduced kidney function bellow 45%, in one direction 33.33% (12/36) and 25.00% (9/36) in both directions. The correlation between clinically proved acute pielonephrities and damage to the parenchyma was not proven. It was proven in 30.37% (24/79) reoccurring urinal infection.DMSA is a sensitive method that should not be routinely used on every child with urinary infection. It should be left to assess the renal damage in cases of high degree reflux and reoccurring urinary infection.Vesicoureteral reflux in children with suspected and proven urinary tract infection.The aim of this study was to estimate the prevalence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and clinically significant ultrasonography (US) abnormalities in a large group of children with proven and suspected urinary tract infection (UTI). The medical reports on renal US and voiding cystouretrographies (VCUG) of 2,036 children were reviewed. Renal US was performed on all children and VCUG on 1,185 children (58%). Based on the urine culture data, the UTI diagnoses were classified into five reliability classes (proven, likely, unlikely, false and no microbial data). The UTI diagnose was considered proven in 583/2036 (28.6%) and false in 145 (7.1%) cases. The prevalence of VUR was similar among those with proven and false UTI [37.4 vs. 34.8%; relative risk (RR) 1.08, 95% confidence intervals (95% CI) 0.7-1.7, P = 0.75] and decreased with increasing age (P = 0.001). Clinically significant US abnormalities occurred in 87/583 (14.9%) cases with proven UTI and significantly less often (11/145, 7.6%) in the false UTI class (RR 1.96, 95% CI 1.1-3.6, P = 0.02). Our finding supports the claim that VUR is not significantly associated to UTI and that its occurrence among children even without UTI is significantly higher than traditional estimates. This challenges the recommendations of routine VCUG after UTI.Acute 99mTc DMSA scan predicts dilating vesicoureteral reflux in young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection: a population-based cohort study.This study aimed to examine the ability of acute (99m)Tc DMSA scan for predicting dilating (grades III-V) vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) after a first febrile urinary tract infection in children aged 2 years or younger.All children underwent ultrasonography (US), (99m)Tc DMSA scan, and voiding cystourethrography. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic curves were performed to assess the diagnostic accuracy for predicting dilating VUR. Follow-up scan was performed at least 6 months after the acute infection to evaluate the presence of renal scarring (RS) or new scars.Of the 473 children analyzed (289 boys and 184 girls; median age, 5 months), 282 (59.6%) had abnormal acute (99m)Tc DMSA scan findings. There was VUR in 153 children (32.3%), whereas 95 (20.1%) had dilating VUR. The sensitivity and negative predictive value in predicting dilating VUR were 95.8% and 97.9%, respectively, for (99m)Tc DMSA and 97.9% and 98.6%, respectively, for combined US and (99m)Tc DMSA, whereas the positive and negative likelihood ratios were 1.90 and 0.08, respectively, for (99m)Tc DMSA and 1.57 and 0.06, respectively, for combined studies. On multivariate analysis, dilating VUR was a predictor for developing RS and new scars.Our results reveal the usefulness of acute (99m)Tc DMSA scan for predicting dilating VUR in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection. A voiding cystourethrography is indicated in only children with abnormalities found on a (99m)Tc DMSA and/or a US. The presence of dilating VUR predisposes to developing RS and new scars.Procalcitonin is a marker of severity of renal lesions in pyelonephritis.In an attempt to differentiate acute pyelonephritis from lower urinary tract infection (UTI), we measured serum procalcitonin levels, a recently described marker of infection. We compared it with other commonly used inflammatory markers and evaluated its ability to predict renal involvement as assessed by dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy.Serum C-reactive protein, leukocyte counts, and procalcitonin levels were measured in 80 children, 1 month to 16 years of age, admitted for suspected pyelonephritis. Renal involvement was assessed by 99mTe-DMSA scintigraphy in the first 5 days after admission. The examination was repeated at least 3 months later if the first result was abnormal.In lower UTI, the mean procalcitonin (PCT) was 0.38 micrograms/L +/- 0.19 compared with 5.37 micrograms/L +/- 1.9 in pyelonephritis. In these two groups, respectively, leukocyte counts were 10939/mm3 +/- 834 and 17429/mm3 +/- 994, and C-reactive protein (CRP) levels were 30.3 mg/L +/- 7.6 and 120.8 mg/L +/- 8.9. When inflammatory markers were correlated to the severity of the renal lesion as ranked by DMSA scintigraphy, we found a highly significant correlation with plasma levels of PCT, but borderline significance with CRP and none with leukocyte counts. Patients without vesicoureteral reflux had a mean PCT of 5.16 micrograms/L +/- 2.33, which was not significantly different from that in patients with reflux who had a mean PCT of 5.76 micrograms/L +/- 3.49. For the prediction of renal lesions at admission, CRP had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 26.1%. The sensitivity and specificity of PCT were 70.3% and 82.6%, respectively.We conclude that serum PCT levels were increased significantly in children with febrile UTI when renal parenchymal involvement (assessed by DMSA scintigraphy) was present and allowed for prediction of patients at risk of severe renal lesions.Renal cortical involvement in children with first UTI: does it differ in the presence of primary VUR?The aim of this study was to investigate the influence of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphic patterns in children with first symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI).A total of 45 children with the diagnosis of first symptomatic UTI (28 girls, 17 boys, mean age 18 months, range 1 month-11 years) were reviewed. All DMSA scans were obtained within 2 months of bacteriologically proven UTI (median 21 days, mean 26 +/- 21, 14). After the exclusion of the patients with bilateral cortical lesions, 82 renal units were analyzed. The scintigraphic patterns included regional and global description of renal cortical abnormality (normal or decreased differential renal function, regional renal function (RRF), and the number and severity of cortical lesions).Vesicoureteral reflux was detected in 26 (32%) renal units (15 with grade 1-2, 11 with grade 3-4). Renal cortical abnormality was observed in 10 renal units without VUR (10/56, 17%) and 13 renal units with VUR (13/26: 50%). Of the 15 renal units, 5 with grade 1-2 VUR (5/15) and 8 of the 11 renal units with grade 3-4 VUR (8/11) had renal cortical involvement. The most common scintigraphic pattern in the patients without VUR was the preserved RRF (>or=45%) and two or fewer photon-deficient areas. On the other hand, a decreased RRF (<45) associated with cortical lesions was the most frequent finding in patients with refluxing kidneys (8/26, 30%), especially in those with grade 3-4 disease.This investigation showed that the presence of VUR affects DMSA patterns in children with first symptomatic UTI.DMSA scan for revealing vesicoureteral reflux in young children with urinary tract infection.The objective of this study was to assess the ability of acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy for revealing vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in young children after a first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI).Children aged<or=24 months and were admitted with a first febrile UTI during a 5-year period were evaluated. The ability of acute DMSA scintigraphy to reveal dilating (grades 3-5) or severe (grades 4-5) VUR was assessed by comparing DMSA scan findings with those of voiding cystourethrography.Of the 296 children included, 46 had dilating and 25 severe VUR. Abnormal DMSA scan results were associated with an odds ratio of 4.36 for dilating and 5.50 for severe VUR. For detecting dilating VUR, the area under the curve (AUC) was 0.68, the positive likelihood ratio (LR) was 2.00, and the negative LR was 0.46; for severe VUR, those values were 0.69, 2.10, and 0.38, respectively. Children with abnormal DMSA scan results combined with abnormal ultrasonography had an odds ratio of 3.60 for dilating and 6.32 for severe VUR. Despite normal findings on both investigations, 12 children had dilating and 4 severe VUR. For dilating VUR, the area under the (AUC) was 0.65, the positive LR was 1.70, and the negative LR was 0.47; for severe VUR, the values were 0.69, 1.90, and 0.29, respectively.Our data suggest that acute DMSA scintigraphy has limited overall ability in identifying VUR and should not be endorsed as replacement for voiding cystourethrography in the evaluation of young children with a first febrile UTI.Different guidelines for imaging after first UTI in febrile infants: yield, cost, and radiation.To evaluate the yield, economic, and radiation costs of 5 diagnostic algorithms compared with a protocol where all tests are performed (ultrasonography scan, cystography, and late technetium(99)dimercaptosuccinic acid scan) in children after the first febrile urinary tract infections.A total of 304 children, 2 to 36 months of age, who completed the diagnostic follow-up (ultrasonography, cystourethrography, and acute and late technetium(99)dimercaptosuccinic acid scans) of a randomized controlled trial (Italian Renal Infection Study 1) were eligible. The guidelines applied to this cohort in a retrospective simulation were: Melbourne Royal Children's Hospital, National Institute of Clinical Excellence (NICE), top down approach, American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), and Italian Society of Pediatric Nephrology. Primary outcomes were the yield of abnormal tests for each diagnostic protocol; secondary outcomes were the economic and radiation costs.Vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) was identified in 66 (22%) children and a parenchymal scarring was identified in 45 (15%). For detection of VUR (47/66) and scarring (45/45), the top down approach showed the highest sensitivity (76% and 100%, respectively) but also the highest economic and radiation costs (€52 268. 624 mSv). NICE (19/66) and AAP (18/66) had the highest specificities for VUR (90%) and the Italian Society of Pediatric Nephrology had the highest specificity (20/45) for scars (86%). NICE would have been the least costly (€26 838) and AAP would have resulted in the least radiation exposure (42 mSv).There is no ideal diagnostic protocol following a first febrile urinary tract infection. An aggressive protocol has a high sensitivity for detecting VUR and scarring but carries high financial and radiation costs with questionable benefit.Urinary tract infection: a comparison of four methods of investigation.The optimal regimen for investigating children with urinary tract infection (UTI) remains uncertain. Ultrasonography, contrast micturating cystourethrography (MCU), intravenous urography (IVU), and technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) studies were performed in 58 children with UTI under 14 years of age attending two teaching hospitals and the results compared. All four investigations were normal in 12 children. In 36 with vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) on MCU, dilatation was reported on ultrasonography in eight children. Radiological renal scarring was seen in 20 children; it was suspected on ultrasonography in nine, with dilatation alone in four, and a normal report in seven. Duplex kidneys identified on IVU were unrecognised on ultrasonography or DMSA studies; ultrasonography showed no change corresponding to presumed acute defects on DMSA studies that later resolved. Disparities were observed at all ages. This study suggests that ultrasonography is unreliable in detecting VUR, renal scarring, or inflammatory change and, alone, is inadequate for investigating UTI in children.Comparison of DMSA scintigraphy with intravenous urography for the detection of renal scarring and its correlation with vesicoureteric reflux.A series of 208 patients was prospectively assessed for reflux nephropathy by intravenous urography (IVU) and 99mTc-dimercaptosuccinate (DMSA) scintigraphy. All patients were studied at least 3 months after their most recent urinary tract infection and micturating cystourethrography (MCU) was performed prior to the scintigraphic studies. DMSA scintigraphy detected significantly more cortical abnormalities than did IVU. There was also a correlation between cortical abnormalities in the DMSA studies and the degree of reflux on MCU. The validity of DMSA as a cortical imaging agent is evaluated and the histological evidence for its efficacy derived from the animal model is reviewed, lending weight to its establishment as the "gold standard" for renal cortical scarring.Accuracy of cystosonography in the diagnosis of vesicourethral reflux in children.Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) is found in 1% of all children and in 30%-50% of those with urinary tract infection. Furthermore, VUR in childhood is the main reason for pyelonephritis, hypertension and chronic kidney disease. Recently, a variety of procedures with low radiation have been recommended for diagnosis of VUR. Therefore, in this study, voiding urosonography (VUS) or cystosonography was performed for evaluation of VUR and for comparing it with radio nucleotide cystography (RNC). We studied 25 children admitted with initial diagnosis of VUR in our center in the year 2007. Simultaneously, RNC and VUS were performed for all the patients. VUR was detected in eight patients with the VUS procedure and in nine children with RNC. Another patient was diagnosed only by RNC, and two other patients by only VUS. The two methods were concordant in detection and exclusion of urinary reflux in 87% (P: 0.000, r: 0.728). Furthermore, the diagnosis of various grades of reflux by these two schemes were comparable (P: 0.0000, r: 0.724). Sensitivity and specifity of VUS was determined as 87% and 88%, respectively, with a 94% positive predictive value and a 77% negative predictive value. We conclude that VUS is a highly accurate, safe and inexpensive tool for the screening, diagnosis and follow-up of VUR.Identification of children requiring radiologic evaluation for urinary infection.Sixty-nine children younger than 13 years of age with urinary tract infection were evaluated to identify risk factors for treatable urologic problems; i.e. those requiring surgery or prolonged antibiotic prophylaxis. All children had a renal ultrasound, intravenous pyelogram and voiding cystogram performed 4 to 6 weeks after the infection. Eleven children with treatable problems were identified, 10 with vesicoureteral reflux and 1 with a ureterocele. For identification of treatable problems the predictive value of a positive test was: (1) fever, 10 of 24 (41.7%); (2) abnormal D-deaminoarginine vasopressin renal concentrating ability, 8 of 24 (33.3%); (3) serum C-reactive protein greater than or equal to 1.0, 8 of 25 (32.0%); (4) Elevated urine N-acetylglucosaminidase, 5 of 16 (31.2%); (5) erythrocyte sedimentation rate greater than or equal to 25, 6 of 21 (28.6%); and (6) age less than 5 years, 10 of 43 (23.3%). Absence of fever denotes a low risk (less than 3%) of finding a treatable problem. Afebrile girls older than 5 years of age can have radiologic evaluation deferred until infection recurs. The presence of fever indicates a high risk of treatable urologic problems (41.7%) and warrants complete radiologic evaluation with the first urinary infection.Predictive value of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux in children.We aimed to determine the predictability of clinical and laboratory variables for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in children with urinary tract infection (UTI). Data of children with febrile UTI who underwent voiding cystoureterography between 2002 and 2005 were evaluated retrospectively for clinical (age, gender, fever > or = 38.5 degrees C, recurrent UTI), laboratory [leukocytosis, erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), C-reactive protein (CRP), pyuria, serum creatinine (S(Cr))] and imaging (renal ultrasonography) variables. Children with VUR (group 1) vs. no VUR (group 2) and children with high-grade (III-V) VUR (group 3) vs. no or low-grade (I-II) VUR (group 4) were compared. Among 88 patients (24 male), 38 had VUR and 21 high-grade VUR. Fever > or = 38.5 degrees C was associated with VUR [odds ratio (OR): 7.5]. CRP level of 50 mg/l was the best cut-off level for predicting high-grade VUR (OR 15.5; discriminative ability 0.89 +/- 0.05). Performing voiding cystourethrography based on this CRP level would result in failure to notice 9% of patients with high-grade VUR, whereas 69% of children with no/low-grade VUR would be spared from this invasive test. In conclusion, fever > or = 38 degrees C and CRP > 50 mg/l seem to be potentially useful clinical predictors of VUR and high-grade VUR, respectively, in pediatric patients with UTI. Further validation of these findings could limit unnecessary voiding cystourethrography.[Urethrocystography in children. Practical considerations of irradiation doses].Rational use of voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) is imperative, as it is an invasive procedure exposing the child to ionizing radiation and other well documented risks. The objective of this study was to contribute to the achievement of a reduction in the irradiation dose in VCUG.We reviewed the medical records of a consecutive sample of 125 children that underwent VCUG in our hospital between January 1995 and June 1996.Of the 125 VCUGs, 100 were normal, 13 showed vesicoureteric reflux grade II or higher, and 12 of them presented with other anomalies. The indication for VCUG was febrile UTI in 54 children, hydronephrosis detected prenatally in 12 and other causes in 60 children. It is important to note that children with vesicoureteric reflux presented as febrile UTI or fetal hydronephrosis. The age was significantly lower in the reflux group (p < 0.01). Eleven of the 13 children with vesicoureteric reflux were less than one year of age. Ultrasound anomalies and renal scarring in Tc99 DMSA were seen in a larger proportion in the reflux group. Preliminary X-rays showed anomalies in only 3 of 125 cases.1) Vesicoureteric reflux is related to febrile UTI and fetal hydronephrosis. The other indications are questionable. 2) VCGU is not recommended following the first UTI in the evaluation of children 6 years of age or older who have a normal ultrasound and Tc99 DMSA. 3) VCUG could be substituted by a nuclear cystogram in girls who do not have a history of voiding dysfunction. 4) A preliminary X-ray is not justified.Ultrasonography for the detection of ureteric reflux in infants with urinary infection.Several less harmful methods than voiding cysto-urethrography for detecting significant ureteric reflux have been proposed. The present prospective study investigated whether ultrasonography was effective in identifying ureteric reflux in infants with their first febrile urinary infection. The subjects were 27 infants (24 boys and 3 girls) aged from 0 to 8 months. The urinary tract was scanned when the bladder was full, and before and during induced voiding. Infants with abnormal ultrasound findings underwent voiding cysto-urethrography. The other infants were followed and those who had a recurrence of urinary infection underwent voiding cystography. Ten children underwent cysto-urethrography, with eight refluxing ureters identified in six boys. Ultrasound revealed transient dilatation of the renal pelvis on voiding in five kidneys, transient dilatation of distal ureters in 12 and hydro-ureteronephrosis in two. Each of the five kidneys with pelvic dilatation on voiding was associated with ureteric reflux grades III or IV. Of the 17 children who did not undergo cysto-urethrography, only one had recurrence of urinary infection and was diagnosed with ureteric reflux. This girl was one of the three babies who were not scanned during voiding. More than half of the infants with febrile urinary infection were excluded from invasive examination without having recurrence of urinary infection. Thus, ultrasound scanning during voiding was effective for screening infants with their first urinary infection to detect significant ureteric reflux.Early 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy in symptomatic first-time urinary tract infection.During a 2 year period, 175 children below 6 years of age (median 0.4 year) with non-obstructive symptomatic urinary tract infection were studied by 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy. DMSA scintigraphy was performed at a median of 10 days after the start of treatment and was abnormal in 73 children (42%), equivocal in 29 (16%) and normal in 73 (42%). Reflux was seen in 27% of all children and in 38% of the renal units that were abnormal at DMSA scintigraphy. A decreasing frequency of abnormalities at DMSA scintigraphy was seen within the first 14 days after the start of treatment. C-reactive protein and grade of reflux correlated significantly with abnormal DMSA studies. To demonstrate renal involvement in acute urinary tract infection, DMSA scintigraphy should be performed within days after the start of treatment. It is noteworthy that reflux was seen in less than half of renal units with abnormal DMSA scintigraphy.[Tc 99M DMSA scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis: correlation with laboratory tests, echography and the presence of vesico-ureteral reflux].Tc99m DMSA (dimercaptosuccinic acid) scintigraphy has a high sensitivity for the detection of cortical kidney damage.To evaluate the Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis and its association with laboratory parameters, kidney ultrasound and vesicoureteral reflux.We studied 143 children (age range 8 days, 12 years, 66% female) hospitalized with the clinical diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (first episode) with a positive urine culture and a renal scintigraphy performed within seven days of diagnosis. DMSA was considered the gold standard for the detection of cortical lesions. Its results were related to the presence of fever, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (VHS), white blood count (WBC), ultrasound examination and vesicoureteral reflux.Seventy nine percent of the population had an abnormal DMSA scan. There were no differences between sex, age and laboratory parameters in children with normal or abnormal DMSA scans, except for CRP (p <0.005). Ultrasound was coincident with the scan in 32% of patients. Eighteen percent had vesicoureteral reflux.There is a high proportion of abnormal DMSA scans in children with a first episode of acute pyelonephritis.Age-related radiological imaging in children with acute pyelonephritis.Accurate diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis (APN) using clinical and laboratory parameters is often difficult in children. The aims of this retrospective study were twofold. Firstly, to correlate the clinical and laboratory manifestations of APN with the results of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan in different age groups. Secondly, to compare the DMSA renal scan, renal ultrasonography (RUS), and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in patients with clinical APN. The DMSA renal scan was utilized as the gold standard for renal involvement. We determined the sensitivity of these tests in febrile urinary tract infections (UTI) in three age groups: group I less than 2 years; group II 2-8 years; group III older than 8 years. During the period January 1992 through December 1998, 222 children presented with a febrile UTI. All patients had a DMSA renal scan, 208 had contrast VCUG, and 163 had RUS. The clinical and laboratory manifestation of pyelonephritis correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan in the older children than in the younger children; 85% of the DMSA renal scans were positive in group III; 69% in group II; 48% in group I (P<0.001). Vesicoureteral reflux detected by contrast VCUG was more prevalent in the younger age groups. Although high grades of reflux (grade IV-V) correlated better with a positive DMSA renal scan, it did not reach a level of statistical significance (P>0.05). RUS did not correlate with a positive DMSA renal scan in any age group.Technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy in children with acute pyelonephritis: correlation with other imaging tests.INTRODUCTION. Urinary tract infection is the most common serious bacterial infection in children. The aim of this study was to compare the value of different laboratory and imaging techniques in detecting renal involvement in acute pyelonephritis. MATERIALS AND METHODS. In a cross-sectional study of patients 1 month to 14 years of age diagnosed with urinary tract infection were examined with systemic inflammatory markers, renal ultrasonography, voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), and technetium Tc 99m dimercaptosuccinic acid ((99m)Tc-DMSA) renal scintigraphy. A total of 1467 pediatric patients were eligible for treatment of pyelonephritis. Evaluations included a complete blood count, C-reactive protein (CRP), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), urinalysis, urine culture, and measurement of serum blood urea nitrogen and creatinine levels. RESULTS. The results of (99m)Tc-DMSA scans were normal in 20.2%, mild decreased cortical uptake in 45.0%, moderate decreased cortical uptake in 12.3%, severe decreased cortical uptake in 12.0%, and decreased cortical function plus irregularity or scar formation in 10.5%. Voiding cystourethrography showed vesicoureteral reflux in 25.9%. The sensitivity of (99m)Tc-DMSA for prediction of vesicoureteral reflux was 84.1% with a negative predictive value of 80.6%. Significant differences were found in the level of blood leukocyte count (P = .03), urine leukocyte count (P = .003), ESR (P = .008), and age (P = .04) between patients with normal and abnormal (99m)Tc-DMSA scan results. CONCLUSIONS. We found that in patient with clinical signs of pyelonephritis, (99m)Tc-DMSA renal scintigraphy can detect pyelonephritis more accurately than the other inflammatory and imaging tests.Role of renal ultrasonography (RUS) and micturating cystourethrogram (MCU) in the assessment of vesico-ureteric reflux (VUR) in children and infants with urinary tract infection (UTI).Evaluating different imaging strategies in children after first febrile urinary tract infection.We conducted a retrospective multicenter review to estimate the prevalence of urological abnormalities in Chinese children with first febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) and to evaluate the selective imaging strategy recommended by the NICE guideline for detecting underlying abnormalities. Atypical UTI was defined as in the NICE UTI guideline. Overall, 576 boys and 244 girls aged below 24 months were reviewed. All underwent ultrasound (US) and micturating cystourethrogram (MCUG) and 612 underwent DMSA scans. US was abnormal in 73 (8.9%) and vesicoureteral reflux was shown in 195 patients (23.8%). A total of 126 patients were considered to have remediable urological abnormalities requiring additional surgical or medical interventions. The NICE guideline yielded excellent negative predictive values (NPV) of 100-94.4% in girls but 91% in boys. If all boys underwent US and DMSA and only those with atypical UTI or abnormal US or DMSA proceeded to MCUG, then the NPV increased to 95.2% and 97.4% for boys aged below and above 6 months, respectively. These revised strategies would substantially save invasive studies-DMSA and MCUG in 27 and 74% of girls aged below and above 6 months, respectively, or MCUG in 23 and 59% of boys aged below and above 6 months, respectively.Ultrasonography as predictor of permanent renal damage in infants with urinary tract infection.To evaluate the ability of ultrasound (US) in infants (<1 year) with acute urinary tract infection (UTI), to identify those with permanent renal damage (PRD) at scintigraphy 1 year later.US, dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy and voiding cystourethrography were performed in 191 infants.US was abnormal in 46 infants (24%). PRD was found in 46 infants (24%); 19 of these had abnormal US (sensitivity 41%). In 145 infants without PRD, 27 had abnormal US (specificity 81%). Dilating reflux or verified obstruction occurred in 21 (11%) infants, of whom 18 (86%) had PRD while 28 of 170 (16%) without such diagnoses had PRD. Of 16 infants with dilating reflux, 9 (sensitivity 56%) had abnormal US and 14 (88%) PRD. Dilatation at US was seen in 27 children; 7 of these had dilating reflux and 5 verified obstruction.US performed in association with acute UTI had limited ability to identify children with PRD at (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) 1 year later, although abnormal renal size was a strong indicator of renal damage. The ability of US to identify children with dilating reflux was also limited. However, once detected at US, dilatation of the urinary tract was associated with dilating reflux or obstruction in half of the cases. Our study confirms that dilating reflux and obstruction are strong indicators of PRD but only half of those who developed PRD had such diagnoses.Acute pyelonephritis and sequelae of renal scar in pediatric first febrile urinary tract infection.To investigate the incidence of acute pyelonephritis (APN) and renal scarring in children with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI), 191 of 216 (88%) children with their first episode of UTI received (99m)Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid renal single-photon emission computed tomography. They were investigated within 7 days of admission and were followed for 6 months. One hundred and six patients (49.1%) underwent a voiding cystourethrogram. The incidence of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) in group I (</=1 year old) was 22%, group II (1-5 years old) 69%, and group III (5-17 years old) 44%. The overall incidence of APN in febrile UTI was 70% (male 66%, female 76%, P=0.110). Children had a higher incidence of APN than infants ( P<0.05 in group I vs. II and group I vs. III). Of patients with APN, 57% (35/61) showed renal scar formation. VUR was found in 31%(24/78) of children with APN and 58% (14/24) of children with renal scar. In addition, children with high-grade VUR were more susceptible to APN and scar formation than those with low-grade VUR ( P<0.05). Older children with a first febrile UTI had a higher incidence of APN than infants (</=1 year), and half of the children with APN developed a renal scar.Urinary tract infection in infants: a single-center clinical analysis in southern Taiwan.This study summarized the epidemiology, etiology, and susceptibility of pathogens to antibiotics, and specific characteristics in infants aged less than 4 months diagnosed with urinary tract infection in the past decade in Taiwan.The medical charts of patients aged less than 4 months admitted for urinary tract infection to Kaohsiung Veterans General Hospital between January 2001 and December 2009 were retrospectively reviewed.A total of 132 patients, with male predominance (68.9%), were enrolled. The top three pathogens were similar to those identified in previous studies in Taiwan. The most common pathogen, Escherichia coli (85.3%), was resistant to ampicillin (75.9%), followed by sulfamethoxazole/trimethoprim (31.7%), and cefazolin (28.5%). Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan revealed 34.5% positive findings, while the vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) rate was 37.8% by direct radionuclide voiding cystography and/or voiding cysto-urethrography. Positive DMSA findings significantly correlated with VUR (p<0.001) and higher C-reactive protein level (p<0.05).E coli was the most common pathogen in the present cohort, and the top three pathogens were similar to those found in general pediatric population in Taiwan. VUR was the most common genitourinary tract anomaly in this age group. Positive DMSA was well correlated with VUR and higher C-reactive protein level.The efficacy of Tc99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (Tc-DMSA) scintigraphy and ultrasonography in detecting renal scars in children with primary vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).Pyelonephritis-induced renal scarring in children is a major predisposing factor for proteinuria, hypertension, and ultimate renal failure. The aim of this study was to investigate and compare the efficacy of Tc99m dimercaptosuccinic acid (Tc-DMSA) renal scintigraphy and renal ultrasonography (USG) in detecting renal scars in children with primary vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).Tc-DMSA scan and USG studies were done in 62 children who were admitted to our clinic between 1997 and 2003 because of documented urinary tract infection (UTI) and diagnosed with primary VUR. Renal scarring detection rates of Tc-DMSA scan and USG were compared according to reflux grades.In the whole group, renal scars were detected by Tc-DMSA scan and USG in 55% and 38% of refluxing units, respectively. Detection rates of Tc-DMSA and USG according to reflux grades were as follows: 47% and 29 % in low-grade VUR (grades 1 and 2), 46 % and 25% in mid-grade VUR (grade 3), 76% and 65% in high-grade VUR (grades 4 and 5), respectively.USG was found to be an inappropriate study in the detection of renal parenchymal scars, irrespective of the reflux grade. In this study, Tc-DMSA scan detected scars in 35% of kidneys reported to be normal on USG.The role of DMSA scans in evaluation of the correlation between urinary tract infection, vesicoureteric reflux, and renal scarring.The correlation between urinary tract infection (UTI), vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) and renal scarring was studied in 89 patients (177 renal units; 1 solitary kidney) during the period 1997-2000. There were 63 males and 26 females; ages ranged from neonates to 14 years. UTI was diagnosed on the basis of a positive urine culture, VUR was diagnosed and graded by micturating cystourethrogram (MCU), and renal scarring was assessed by technetium 99 m Tc-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan. Ultrasonography (US) was done to evaluate renal tract dilatation and other structural abnormalities. A follow up DMSA scan was performed approximately 6 months after the initial scan. VUR was present in 106 of the 171 renal units in which it was studied and absent in 65 units. The majority of the VUR was grade V. Renal scars were seen in 90 of 177 renal units at presentation and in 72 of the 163 renal units studied at follow-up. Some information was lacking in 31 patients; hence, the correlation between UTI, VUR, and renal scarring was done in 58 patients. The majority of the suspected scars at presentation were not seen at follow-up, but most of the established scars persisted. Only 2 renal units showed scars for the first time on follow-up. On US, approximately 50% of normal kidneys showed either suspicious or established scars on DMSA scan, and patients with bilateral abnormality on US showed renal scars. Renal scars were seen in 15 of 23 children without VUR, 17 of 18 with unilateral VUR, and 16 of 17 with bilateral VUR. Thus, there is a cause-and-effect relationship between UTI and renal scarring that is made worse by VUR. DMSA scans have been shown to be the most reliable method of assessing renal scarring, and an abnormal US scan showing upper-tract dilatation or a structural abnormality may have a predictive value in the detection of renal scarring.Contrast enhanced reflux sonography in children: a comparison to standard radiological imaging.The diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux is routinely performed by voiding cystourethrography. Especially in the course of conservative treatment, the radiation dose might increase during the years. With the development of ultrasound echo enhancing agents we assessed their diagnostic efficacy for evaluation of vesicoureteral reflux to replace voiding cystourethrography with radiation-free ultrasound.A total of 104 children with a mean age of 5.4 years were examined using echo enhancing ultrasound after informed consent was obtained. For control purposes, all children underwent standard voiding cystourethrography as well. The diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux was positive when microbubbles appeared in the ureter or renal pelvis. The sonographic findings were correlated with those obtained by standard voiding cystourethrography.Of the 208 ureter and renal units investigated vesicoureteral reflux was detected in 76 (37%) by both technologies. Diagnosis was made sonographically in 5 units and by voiding cystourethrography in 3. All reflux grades (I to V) could be identified. The specificity and sensitivity of the contrast reflux ultrasound were significantly high. The long contrast time of up to 30 minutes combined with the high contrast effect resulted in convincing images with high levels of diagnostic confidence.Our results clearly demonstrate that the diagnostic accuracy of vesicoureteral reflux by contrast enhanced ultrasound is statistically significant compared to standard radiological voiding cystourethrography. Therefore, this methodology represents an exceptional approach to reduce the number of children being exposed to ionizing radiation especially during conservative followup.Does a normal DMSA obviate the performance of voiding cystourethrography in evaluation of young children after their first urinary tract infection?To determine whether a normal technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scan obviates the need for voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in evaluating young children after their first urinary tract infection (UTI).This was a 10-year retrospective review of 142 children (age < or = 2 years, 77 boys and 65 girls) who had their first UTI and were admitted to a tertiary care general hospital. The association between DMSA renal scan results and VCUG results performed 48 hours and 1 month after diagnosis was evaluated.DMSA renal scans and VCUG were performed in 142 patients. Of these, 99 patients (69.7%) had evidence of pyelonephritis, although only 2 (1.4%) had evidence of renal scarring; 42 (29.6%) had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) on VCUG. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and likelihood ratio negative for abnormalities on DMSA renal scans for detecting the the presence of VUR on VCUG were 88% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 73% to 100%), 36% (95% CI = 26% to 46%), 37% (95% CI = 27% to 46%), 88 % (95% CI = 73% to 100%), and 0.33 (95% CI = 0 to 0.88), respectively.Children with a negative DMSA renal scan during their first UTI episode rarely have VUR and may never have high-grade VUR. Avoiding VCUGs in children with negative DMSA renal scans could significantly reduce the use of this potentially traumatic test.[The value of Tc99m-DMSA renal scintigraphy in evaluation of severity of parenchymal lesions in children with acute urinary tract infection].Most authors would agree that renal parenchymal defects (scars, hypoplasia, dysplasia) in children are a major risk factor for chronic renal failure, and for development of systemic hypertension in later years. The pathophysiologic changes in acute pyelonephritis include tubulointerstitial inflammation/pus with impairment of the renal microcirculation due to compression of the glomeruli, small peritubular capillaries and vasa recta by interstitial edema. The resulting ischemia has been postulated as one of the mechanisms for the decreased accumulation of DMSA in the areas of pyelonephritis. DMSA scanning has a sensitivity of up to 99%, and specificity of up to 91% for the detection of acute pyelonephritis.The aim of the study was to investigate the value of Tc99m-DMSA scan in children with acute urinary tract infection, to estimate the degree of parenchymal changes, and to assess the relationship with vesicoureteral reflux.We reviewed 116 infants aged 0-15 years, 100 (86.2%) female and 16 (13.8%) male, who were hospitalized for urinary tract infection during a 5-year period (1996-2000). The mean age at diagnosis was 3.7 years.Escherichia colli was isolated in 52 (44.8%) urine cultures. All patients underwent ultrasonography, which was normal in 57 (49.1%) infants. Tc99m-DMSA was performed after two weeks of therapy. The renal parenchymal pathology was defined as a focal or multifocal defect of low degree in 33 (28.4%), and of high degree in 35 (30%) children. Multifocal defects were mostly found in patients aged < 3 years, and focal lesions in those aged > 3 years. Renal scars were detected in 41 (35.3%) infants with first urinary tract infection.We recommend that ultrasound, DMSA and radionuclide cystouretherogram be routinely performed in case of first urinary tract infection in infants aged < 1 year, and voiding cystourethrogram with US and DMSA in those aged > 1 year.Vesicoureteral reflux: an accurate predictor of acute pyelonephritis in childhood urinary tract infection?To determine the association between vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) and the presence of acute pyelonephritis in children with urinary tract infections.The authors studied 150 consecutive patients less than 5 years of age with their first proved urinary tract infection. All patients underwent renal cortical scintigraphy (with technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid or Tc-99m gluconate) and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) to identify the presence of cortical defects and VUR, respectively.Of 300 kidneys, 88 (29.3%) had a cortical defect at scintigraphy. Fifty-four of the 88 patients (61%) did not have VUR demonstrated at VCUG. Conversely, 72 of the 300 kidneys (24%) had VUR; of these, 38 (53%) had no cortical defect. The sensitivity of VCUG in helping predict a defect was 38.6%, and the specificity was 82.1%.VUR (as shown by VCUG) and renal cortical scintigraphic defects frequently occur independently of each other. Renal cortical scintigraphy may be a more accurate predictor of patients at risk for scarring.Febrile urinary tract infections in 0- to 3-month-old infants: a prospective follow-up study.To track the clinical evolution of febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) diagnosed in 0- to 3-month-old infants and characterize uropathogen frequencies, antimicrobial resistance rates, renal abnormalities, and differences in the sexes in this age group.We observed prospectively 46 infants identified in a cohort of 209 children with first UTI diagnosed between July 2006 and July 2008 at the age of 0 to 3 months. Renal ultrasound scanning and voiding cystourethrography examinations were performed in all infants.Infants < 3 months old represented 21% of all children with first UTI. Of these children, 26% were female and 74% were male. Escherichia coli was isolated in 88% of cases and had a high rate of resistance to ampicillin (71%) and to trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole (47%); 21% of children had vesicoureteral reflux, which was of low-grade in 67% of cases, with spontaneous resolution before 2 years in all cases. In infants with normal ultrasound scanning results, a low-grade vesicoureteral reflux was subsequently found in 10% of cases.Infants aged 0 to 3 months represent 21% of children treated for febrile UTI. Boys represent 74% of these cases. E coli is responsible for 88% of UTIs, with a high rate of resistance to antibiotics. When ultrasound scanning examination results are normal, the risk of missing a significant renal abnormality is expected to be extremely low.The value of renal ultrasound in children with a first episode of urinary tract infection.Urinary tract infection (UTI) is a common pediatric problem. Guidelines recommend obtaining a renal ultrasonogram (RUS) for young children after a first UTI. Our aim was to assess the value of routine RUS in the management of children hospitalized with a first episode of UTI.We conducted a retrospective review of the medical records of 130 children 12 years of age or younger admitted with a first UTI. Children were excluded if they had a urinary tract abnormality before admission and/or had been treated with an antibacterial agent within 7 days before admission. The yield of RUS was measured by ability to detect renal abnormalities, by the sensitivity and specificity for detecting vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) using voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG) as a gold standard, and by its influence on UTI management.RUS was conducted in 130 children, but only 118 returned for a VCUG and were included in the study. The findings were positive for VUR in 20 of 40 patients (50%) with a confirmed VUR on VCUG and positive in 18 of 78 patients (23.1%) without VUR on VCUG. Of the 20 patients with a normal RUS who showed VUR, 2 had grade I reflux, 8 had grade II reflux, 7 had grade III reflux and 3 had grade IV reflux. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of ultrasound in suggesting VUR was 50% and 76.9%, 52.6% and 75%, respectively. Except for one, the result of an abnormal RUS did not alter the management of our patients.The results of our study show that the RUS has a little value in the management of children with a first UTI.[Role of ultrasound in studying the first urinary infection in children].A retrospective study comparing the findings of ultrasonography (5 MHz transducer) versus intravenous pyelography and voiding cystourethrography was conducted in 92 patients during the course of an initial urinary tract infection (greater than or equal to 10(5) bacteriae/ml, WBC greater than 25/mm3) gathered over a period of 5 years. The average interval of time between ultrasonography and intravenous pyelography was 8 days (range 1-70). False positive results for ultrasonography were noted in 11% (5 of 45 cases), while false negatives were observed in 36% (17 of 47). Of the 47 cases of obstructive uropathy diagnosed by conventional means, ultrasonography missed the diagnosis in 1 case of ureteral duplication as well as in 16 children with vesicoureteral reflux. In comparison, intravenous pyelography missed 8 of these 21 cases of vesicoureteral reflux. Overall sensitivity of ultrasonography was mediocre at 64% but excellent at 96% after excluding cases with vesicoureteral reflux. Specificity was poor for the group of patients with vesicoureteral reflux (33%) and did not improve when they were excluded (40%). Sensitivity and specificity were comparable whatever the age group. In conclusion, we would recommend that when both ultrasonography and voiding cystourethrography are normal in children with a urinary tract infection, intravenous pyelography could safely be deferred.Retrospective study of children with acute pyelonephritis. Evaluation of bacterial etiology, antimicrobial susceptibility, drug management and imaging studies.The purpose of the study was to investigate the management of pyelonephritis in a large Italian pediatric population. A total of 1,333 patients (36% male) were considered. Escherichia coli was the most frequently isolated agent (89.9%), followed by Proteus mirabilis (3.6%) and Klebsiella oxytoca (2.1%). 27% of microorganisms were resistant to amoxicillin, 4% to amoxicillin/clavulanic acid, 11% to trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole, 2.4% to gentamicin and less than 2% to ceftazidime. Despite this resistance pattern showing that oral antibiotics, such as amoxicillin/clavulanic acid, are effective in vitro as well as parenteral antimicrobials, a parenteral antibiotic was given initially to 756 (57.2%) children. A prophylactic regimen was started in 922 patients with a rate of reinfection during prophylaxis of 9.5%; a higher rate of reinfection was observed in patients with reflux (25%) compared to children without reflux (3%) (p < 0.0001). Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 30% of patients. The number of renal abnormalities detected by DMSA in patients with and without reflux was significantly different (p < 0.001). CRP was higher in patients with scars (p < 0.02). In conclusion, pyelonephritis represents a common disease with about 2,500 days of hospitalization per year in the Veneto Region where there is a pediatric population of about 800,000 under 15 years of age. The results of antimicrobial in vitro tests indicate that amoxillicin/clavulanic acid could represent the antibiotic of choice. The high frequency of malformations, observed even in children between 6 and 12 years of age, may suggest the need of an imaging study including DMSA scan and VCUG in all age groups.Imaging the urinary tract in children with urinary tract infection.To evaluate whether ultrasonography (US) alone is sufficient in imaging the urinary tract in 1185 children with urinary tract infection (UTI).The reports on US and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) were reviewed.Initial US was normal in 861/1185 patients (73%). VCUG revealed abnormal findings in 285/861 (33%), of which grade III-V vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) comprised 97 cases (11%). During follow-up, VUR had resolved in 88/97 (91%) patients: in 50/57 (88%) patients without active treatment for VUR, in 27/29 (93%) with endoscopic and in 11/11 (100%) with open surgery for VUR. During follow-up, 11/97 patients (11%) had developed new renal scarring detectable in US, but no renal impairment occurred. Except for VUR, VCUG showed nonobstructive urethral valves in two infant boys with normal initial US. Thus, in 861 children with normal initial US, 40 patients with grade III-V VUR and two patients with significant nonreflux pathology may have benefited from surgical treatment, giving the total number of possibly missed pathological finding in 42/861 (4.9%) cases if VCUG had not been performed.We suggest that children with UTI could be examined using US alone and to use VCUG only after additional indications.Evaluation of acute pyelonephritis with DMSA scans in children presenting after the age of 5 years.It is generally believed that infants are more susceptible to development of renal scarring after pyelonephritis than children over 5 years old. This view has led to differences in investigations and treatment according to age. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the occurrence of renal parenchymal lesion in children over 5 years admitted with a first-time symptomatic urinary tract infection (UTI). Between October 2000 and April 2002, 52 children aged over 5 years who were admitted to our department with probable acute pyelonephritis (APN) and a positive urine culture were included in this study. All children received antibiotics for 14 days. During the acute phase of infection, scintigraphy with technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) and ultrasonography (US) were done. Voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) was performed in all children early in the course of the illness, generally within 5-7 days of hospitalization. When scintigraphy showed renal parenchymal changes, repeat scintigraphy was done after at least 3 months to assess the progression of renal abnormalities. Of the 52 children with a first-time documented pyelonephritis, cortical scintigraphy showed renal lesion in 41 children (78.8%). US was normal in all children with normal renal scintigraphy, while it detected renal abnormalities in 16 of the 41 (39 %) with abnormal scintigraphy (p <0.0001). Topographic analysis of the 165 focal lesions showed that 42.4% were localized to the upper poles, 17.5% to the middle third, and 40% to the lower poles of the kidneys. Repeat scintigraphy showed persistent lesions corresponding to those on the initial scan in nine (28.2%) of the 32 children. Renal lesions had partly regressed in 23 (71.8%) of the patients who underwent repeat scintigraphy. Vesicoureteral reflux was observed in 13.4% of kidneys and renal parenchymal abnormalities were identified in 71.4% and 72.2% of renal units, respectively, with and without reflux ( p >0.05). In conclusion, our data did not confirm the conventional opinion that the risk of renal scarring after pyelonephritis is low in children over the age of 5 years. Our findings suggest that renal scintigraphy may be a more appropriate method of investigation than VCUG for evaluation of the children over 5 years with acute pyelonephritis. Additionally, the frequency of scintigraphic changes is high, and a strategy based exclusively on ultrasound findings would miss about 61% of the abnormal renal units. We recommend that all children, irrespective of age, will benefit from further investigations that might prevent or limit the development of scarring process and renal complications.Managing children under 36 months of age with febrile urinary tract infection: a new approach.Recent guidelines on urinary tract infection (UTI) agree on reducing the number of invasive procedures. None of these has been validated by a long-term study. We describe our 11-years experience in the application of a diagnostic protocol that uses a reduced number of invasive procedures.We reviewed retrospectively the records of 406 children aged between 1 and 36 months at their first UTI. All patients underwent renal ultrasound (RUS). Children with abnormal RUS and those with UTI recurrences underwent voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) and dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scans.RUS after the first UTI was pathological in 7.4% children; 4.4 % had a second UTI. We performed 48 VCUG: 14 patients (29%) had vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), 12 of which showed an abnormal RUS while 2 had recurrent UTI. After DMSA renal scan renal damage appeared in only 6 of them (12.5%); all these children showed grade IV VUR.The application of our guidelines leads to a decrease in invasive examinations without missing any useful diagnoses or compromising the child's health.The DMSA scan in paediatric urinary tract infection.The objective of the present paper was to review the use of the dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan in urinary tract infection at British Columbia's Children's Hospital to determine the frequency of cortical defects and the association between vesico-ureteric reflux and the presence of cortical defects in children with urinary tract infection. A total of 129 consecutive children with a urinary tract infection referred for a DMSA scan in a 2-year period (January 1992-January 1994) were retrospectively studied. The results were analysed in terms of kidneys, and the incidence of cortical defects was determined. Eighty-eight patients (68%) had a radiographic micturating cysto-urethrogram within 6 months of the DMSA scan, and in this group the relationship of defects with vesico-ureteric reflux was determined. Overall, 81/258 (31%) of kidneys had a cortical defect on a DMSA scan. Of those who had a micturating cysto-urethrogram, 53/176 (30%) kidneys had vesico-ureteric reflux, and of those that had reflux, 21/53 (40%) had a cortical defect on a DMSA scan. In the group of children without reflux, 38/123 (31%) had a cortical defect. Renal cortical scan defects are common findings in paediatric urinary infection, and frequently occur in the absence of vesico-ureteric reflux. These defects represent either established scars or acute pyelonephritis that can proceed to scarring. The micturating cysto-urethrogram alone is insufficient as a screening modality to identify those kidneys at risk of renal scarring.Ultrasound fails to delineate significant renal pathology in children with urinary tract infections: a case for dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy.Routine radiological evaluation in children with urinary tract infections includes ultrasound. Additional dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy in this setting is a common but not routine practice to determine whether there is parenchymal injury. Because dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy involves further time, expense and radiation, we determined whether ultrasound findings could substitute for dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy. Therefore, in children with urinary tract infections we researched the incidence of discordant findings between dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy and normal ultrasound.A retrospective review of children with a history of urinary tract infections who had normal ultrasound and dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy within 6 weeks of each other was performed through a chart review. Children with pyelonephritis within 4 months of the radiological tests were excluded. Dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy was considered abnormal if there was less than 40% differential function, global atrophy or focal defects.From January 2005 to December 2006, 100 children met inclusion criteria. Median patient age was 4.5 years (range 4 months to 19 years) and 84% were female. Of the 100 children 74 (74%) demonstrated vesicoureteral reflux and 18 (18%) showed abnormal dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy despite normal ultrasound. Children with vesicoureteral reflux showed an increased incidence of abnormal dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy compared to those without vesicoureteral reflux (20.3% vs 11.5%), although this did not attain statistical significance (p = 0.04).Although dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy is not part of routine practice in all children with urinary tract infections and/or vesicoureteral reflux, it is frequently abnormal despite normal ultrasound. Therefore, dimercapto-succinic acid scintigraphy should be considered in these patients to evaluate cortical defects and possibly guide further management.Are younger children at highest risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis?The general belief about the relation between risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis and age is that infants are at highest risk and children older than 5 years at lower risk. This assumption has led to differences in treatment based on age. The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the occurrence of renal lesions in children aged 0-16 years.Between May, 1994, and January, 1996, all children aged 0-16 years who were admitted to our department with a diagnosis of probable pyelonephritis and a positive urine culture were included in this prospective study. All patients received antibiotics for 7-21 days. During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, scintigraphy with technetium-99m-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) and ultrasonography were done. Voiding cystourethrography was undertaken at least 6 weeks after the end of antibiotic treatment. When scintigraphy showed renal parenchymal lesions, repeat scintigraphy was done after at least 2 months to assess the progression of renal lesions. For the analysis, children were grouped by age according to presumed risk of renal sequelae after pyelonephritis: high risk (< 1 year), moderate risk (1-5 years), low risk (> 5 years).201 patients were enrolled in the study (119 < 1 year, 47 aged 1-5 years, 35 > 5 years). During the acute phase of urinary-tract infection, renal lesions were found in 66 (55%) infants under 1 year, in 37 (79%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 24 (69%) children older than 5 years. Of these 127 children, 108 underwent repeat scintigraphy after an average of 3 months (50 < 1 year, 36 aged 1-5 years, 22 > 5 years). Overall, renal scars were found on repeat scintigraphy in 20 (40%) infants under 1 year, in 31 (86%) children aged 1-5 years, and in 14 (64%) children older than 5 years. 38 (36%) of these 65 patients had vesicoureteric reflux. Among 88 children who had a first documented urinary-tract infection and underwent repeat scintigraphy, renal scars were found in 20 (43%) under 1 year, in 26 (84%) aged 1-5 years, and in eight (80%) older than 5 years.This study did not confirm the conventional view that the risk of renal scars after pyelonephritis diminishes with age. We believe that all children, irrespective of age, will benefit from any measure that prevents the development of renal sequelae.99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan as first investigation of urinary tract infection.A total of 115 children under 5 years who presented with a first symptomatic urinary tract infection and who had a 99mTc dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan were studied to assess its value and compare the findings with those of other imaging techniques. Renal cortical defects were detected in 65 kidneys by DMSA scan, intravenous urogram, and ultrasound scan combined; 62 (95%) being seen on DMSA scan. The finding of reflux on micturating cystourethrography showed a highly significant correlation with renal defects seen on DMSA scanning, a less close but still significant correlation with abnormalities on intravenous urography, but none with ultrasound scan findings. The sensitivity of the DMSA scan in screening for all grades of reflux is estimated as 0.66, which is higher than that previously reported for the intravenous urogram or ultrasound scan. DMSA scans were less likely to miss grade 3 reflux than the other two methods. DMSA scans are more useful than other upper renal tract imaging techniques in detecting renal defects. Consideration should be given to their use as a first investigation in place of routine intravenous urograms. Ultrasound scans alone will overlook potentially serious urinary tract abnormalities.Relationship between vesicoureteral reflux and renal cortical scar development in Thai children: the significance of renal cortical scintigraphy and direct radionuclide cystography.Relationship of vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), urinary tract infection (UTI) and subsequent renal scarring nowadays is still in question. This study aimed to determine 1) the incidence of cortical scarring in Thai children presenting with upper urinary tract infection, 2) the association between VUR with acute pyelonephritis and subsequent renal scarring, 3) the use of DMSA and direct radionuclide cystography (DRNC) scintigraphy in children with UTI. Sixty newly diagnosed UTI children underwent DRNC and Tc-99m DMSA renal cortical scintigraphy at the time of first UTI diagnosis and 6 months later. There were no significant differences of age, sex, type of antiobiotics and pathogens (E. coli vs non-E. coli) between those who did and did not develop scars (p>0.05). 58/98 of 1st DMSA abnormal kidneys (59.18%) developed scars. 60.20 per cent of 98 positive 1st DMSA had VUR while 80.33 per cent of 61 with VUR had positive 1st DMSA. 59.02 per cent of these 61 kidneys developed scars. Scar occurrence were 18.7 times in high grade VUR compared to low grades. In conclusion, there was a high incidence of acute pyelonephritis in the presence of VUR but acute pyelonephritis does not necessarily need VUR for its development. High grade reflux with upper UTI, is a strong indicator for renal scarring. Children presenting with UTI, irrespective of age, sex, or pathogen, should have both DMSA and DRNC scintigraphy performed to identify upper UTI and high risk patients who will develop subsequent renal scarring.[Renal scintigraphy in children with urinary tract infections].To determine the incidence of abnormal Technetium Tc 99m Dimercaptosuccinic Acid (Tc99m DMSA) renal scintigraphy findings in the children with urinary tract infection (UTI), and to evaluate the difference between the children with UTI and vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR), and the children with UTI without VUR.Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy was performed in 170 children with UTI, mean age 7.07 years (1 month to 14 years, 137 were girls and 33 were boys). In 88 of the children, VUR was proved by micturating cystouretherography (MCU), while in 82 VUR could not be detected by MCU. VUR was graded in accordance with MCU recommended by the intemational study of VUR. In 13 of the children the grade of VUR was grade I, in 30 was grade II, in 23 grade III, in 17 grade IV, while the grade V was in 5 of the children. Findings of Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy were classified as: 1--normal, 2--probably normal, 3--equivocal, 4--probably abnormal, and 5--abnormal. The degree of the significance of the difference of the findings was estimated using chi2, taking p < 0.01 as the limit of statistical significance.Of the total number of 170 studied children, the abnormal findings were detected in 30% (51/170), normal findings in 62% (106/170), and equivocal in 8% (13/170). In the children with UTI and VUR, the incidence of abnormal findings was 49% (43/88), of normal 43% (38/88), and of equivocal findings 8% (7/88). All the children with VUR grade V had the abnormal findings (the incidence of the abnormal findings was 100%). In the children with VUR grade IV, the abnormal findings were 71%. In the children with VUR grade I, 77% of the findings were normal, in the children with VUR grade II 53% of the findings were normal and in the children with VUR grade III, 30% otfthe findings of renal scintigraphy were normal. In the children with UTI without VUR, the incidence of abnormal findings was 10% (8/82), of normal findings 83% (68/82), and of equivocal findings 7% (6/82). The incidence of abnormal findings was significantly higher in the children with UTI and VUR than in those with UTI without VUR (p < 0.01). Also, the incidence of the abnormal findings was higher in the children with VUR grades IV and V than in the children with VUR grade I (p < 0.01).DMSA renal scintigraphy in the children with ITU revealed the abnormal findings in 30% of the cases. The incidence of the abnormallfindings was signficantly higher when VUR was present, as well as if the grade of VUR was higher. Our results confirmed that Tc99m DMSA renal scintigraphy was a very important technique in the evaluation of the children with ITU.Dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scan in children with urinary tract infection.The hospital records of 247 children less than 16 years old, who had had UTI and received dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scans during the period October 1991 to October 1993, were reviewed. Abnormal DMSA renal scans were found in 207 kidneys (207/494, 41.9%) and in 163 cases (163/247, 66%). The appearance of an abnormal DMSA renal scan is correlated with fever and vesicoureteral reflux, but not with age or sex. Because the prevalence of upper UTI in children is high, DMSA renal scan is undoubtedly a valuable tool for pediatricians as a guide in giving appropriate antibiotic therapy and to prevent further renal damage.Urinary tract infection in infants and children evaluated by ultrasound.Fifty-nine pediatric patients with urinary tract infection (UTI) underwent renal ultrasonography, excretory urography, and voiding cystourethrography. The imaging procedures were analyzed retrospectively to determine their relative effectiveness in detecting abnormalities that might predispose the patient to UTI. Voiding cystourethrography provided valuable information, particularly the presence or absence of vesicoureteral reflux, that could not be obtained from the other procedures. Excretory urography was less specific than ultrasonography in the majority of patients, with the exception of those who had renal scarring. The authors recommended ultrasonography as the initial imaging procedure in the evaluation of children with UTI. When the sonogram is normal, excretory urography is not considered necessary, but voiding cystourethrography is thought to be essential. If sonography is abnormal, excretory urography and/or other follow-up studies are indicated.Imaging studies for first urinary tract infection in infants less than 6 months old: can they be more selective?This retrospective study aimed to evaluate the applicability of the selective approach of imaging infants < 6 months old with urinary tract infection (UTI) according to the UTI guidelines of the National Institute for Health and Clinical Excellence (NICE) 2007. Infants < 6 months old with their first UTI from January 2001 to December 2006 having undergone an ultrasound examination of the urinary tract, a micturating cystourethrogram, and a late di-mercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan, were included. Their condition was evaluated against a set of risk features according to the UTI guidelines. Those having any one of these were classified as atypical and those having none as typical. There were 134 infants reviewed, with a typical (98 infants) to atypical (36 infants) ratio of 2.7 to 1. Girls were found to be relatively more represented in the atypical group [male (M):female (F) = 1.3:1] than in the typical group (M:F = 4.4:1) (P < 0.004). There were significantly more infants with abnormal micturating voiding cystourethrograms (MCUGs) (P = 0.007), more refluxing ureters (P < 0.001) and more significant vesico-ureteral reflux (VUR) (>/= grade III) (P = 0.013) in the atypical group than in the typical group; while there was no significant difference in ultrasound (US) and DMSA scan findings between the two groups. In the atypical group there was no difference in imaging studies (and, thus, the results) between the conventional practice and the NICE UTI recommendation. In the typical group, if the recommendations of the guidelines had been followed (i.e. only those with abnormal US would have been further investigated), 25 refluxing ureters and 22 scarred kidneys would have been left undiagnosed. In conclusion, application of the suggested selective imaging approach would leave a significant number of VUR and renal scars undiagnosed, and it may not be an optimal practice for infants less than 6 months old with their first UTI. The best approach remains to be clarified.Acute pyelonephritis and renal scarring in Kuwaiti children: a follow-up study using 99mTc DMSA renal scintigraphy.The aim of this study was to determine the prevalence of renal scarring in a group of Kuwaiti Arab children with their first documented acute pyelonephritis (APN). Eighty-two Kuwaiti Arab children (10 males and 72 females) who had abnormal (99m)Tc DMSA renal scan findings of acute pyelonephritis were prospectively studied with the same imaging modality 6 months after treatment to identify those who developed renal scarring. A micturition cystourethrogram (MCUG) was performed for all of the children 1 month after diagnosis. Children were divided into 3 age groups (<2 years, 2-5 years and above 5 years). The follow-up DMSA renal scans 6 months after diagnosis revealed normalization of renal changes in 56% (46 patients), much improvement with residual renal abnormality in 6% (5 patients), and persistent parenchymal defects in 38% (31 patients). Vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) was found in 32% of children (26/82) and the majority were between grade I and III. Thirteen of those with VUR (50%) developed renal scars on follow-up. Fifty-three percent of the scarred kidneys (19/36) were drained by non-refluxing ureters. In this study, children older than 2 years had less VUR yet were more susceptible to APN and to the development of renal scars. Girls were more prone to developing APN and renal scarring than boys. This work shows that APN is a serious cause for renal scarring in our patients, particularly if associated with other risk factors such as recurrent infections and the female sex.Neonatal urinary tract infections: analysis of the patients and recurrences.Early diagnosis and proper treatment, including long-term follow up, are very important for neonatal urinary tract infections (UTI).The present study reports the analysis and long-term follow-up results of 71 newborns treated for UTI.Forty-one per cent of patients were preterm babies. Suspected sepsis and hyperbilirubinemia were the main presenting features. Community-acquired and nasocomial UTI accounted for 63% and 37% of cases, respectively. The leading causative agents were Escherichia coli for community-acquired UTI and Klebsiella pneumoniae for nasocomial UTI. The urosepsis rate was 5%. Abnormal ultrasonography findings were present in 23% and vesicoureteral reflux was present in 15% of babies. A total of 23% of patients showed renal photopenic areas on dimercaptosuccinic acid scan. The recurrence rate was 28% occurring between 1.5 and 12 months, in particular in the first 6 months. Most of the recurrences developed in patients with no predisposing abnormalities.Pediatric nephrologic follow-up of babies experiencing UTI in the neonatal period is very important to identify the predisposing congenital abnormalities and scarred kidneys, to diagnose and to treat the recurrences earlier.Utility of SPECT DMSA renal scanning in the evaluation of children with primary vesicoureteral reflux.DMSA renal scanning is more sensitive than ultrasound in detecting renal parenchymal scars. We proposed to determine the utility of single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) renal scanning in children with primary vesicoureteral reflux (VUR).During a 24-month period, we evaluated the charts of 368 patients who had undergone SPECT DMSA renal scanning for primary VUR. Patients were divided into three age groups: (a) less than 1 year, (b) between 1 and 5 years, and (c) older than 6 years. Renal scars were deemed severe or focal. The data were analyzed to evaluate the utility of SPECT DMSA scanning in children with primary VUR and to determine the indications for performing SPECT DMSA. We also evaluated the sensitivity of recent renal ultrasound technology in detecting focal and diffuse scars.One hundred twenty-eight patients were younger than 1 year at presentation. These included 24 cases that were detected prenatally. One hundred eighty-five were between the ages of 1 and 5 years, and 55 were 6 years or older. Reflux nephropathy at presentation was found in 99 (26.9%) of 368 patients. DMSA scanning changed the treatment in only 13 patients (3.5%). When scarring was diffuse, ultrasound examination correlated 100% with DMSA scanning; when focal scarring was present, the correlation was poor.Our results suggest that DMSA scans should be tailored to children who have ultrasound abnormalities, high-grade reflux, or recurrent breakthrough urinary tract infections. These guidelines will result in a substantial cost savings and a significant decrease in radiation exposure.Imaging of children with urinary tract infection: a tailored approach.We reviewed the initial imaging studies of 283 children with urinary tract infection in order to decide on the most effective approach. A voiding cystogram was performed in all, complemented by either urography (147 patients), ultrasonography (65), or both (71 patients). In the latter group there was good correlation between sonographic and urographic findings, except for a more accurate delineation of renal scars and anomalies on urography, all in children with vesicoureteral reflux and/or abnormal sonograms. From these data we derived two imaging sequences tailored to the clinical circumstances: cystography as the initial study in ambulatory patients after infection has subsided, and sonography followed by cystography in children hospitalised with severe infection. The upper tracts are studied by ultrasonography and/or urography in patients with significant vesicoureteral reflex or an abnormal sonogram. Both these sequences reduce radiation by omitting the urogram in roughly half of the patients.The detection of reflux nephropathy in infants by 99mtechnetium dimercaptosuccinic acid studies.Dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) studies were performed in 113 infants less than 1 year old at risk of renal scarring. Of these patients 86 presented with urinary tract infection and 27 were asymptomatic. A voiding cystourethrogram was performed in all cases and excretory urography (IVP) was done in 99. More abnormalities were detected by DMSA study when compared to scars on IVP. When both studies were abnormal there was an excellent correlation on a site by site basis. Fever or systemic disorder was not a reliable sign to determine whether there was upper tract involvement with infection. The incidence of DMSA abnormalities in infants increased with high grade vesicoureteral reflux and decreased with low grade reflux. There was no significant difference in the incidence of abnormal kidneys between the infected and noninfected groups, suggesting that renal scarring may occur with sterile reflux.[Comparative sensitivity of intravenous urography, ultrasonography and DMSA scan in the diagnosis of vesicoureteral reflux nephropathy].We compared the efficiency of the IVP, the ultrasound and the DMSA scan in the detection of pyelonephritic lesions during the evaluation of 165 kidneys in 83 children, aged up to 14 years, with vesicoureteric reflux. Our study showed an efficiency of 60.20% for the IVP, 29.60% for the ultrasound and 96.90% for the DMSA scan. These results clearly show that the best imaging method for detecting renal scars is the DMSA scan, followed by IVP and ultrasound.Does early treatment of urinary tract infection prevent renal damage?Therapeutic delay has been suggested as the most important factor that is likely to have an effect on the development of scarring after acute pyelonephritis. However, this opinion has not been supported by prospective studies, so we tested it.In a prospective clinical study, we evaluated whether the time interval between the onset of the renal infection and the start of therapy correlates with the development of acute inflammatory changes and the subsequent development of renal scars, documented by dimercaptosuccinic acid scintigraphy. A total of 278 infants (153 male and 125 female) aged 0.5 to 12.0 months with their first urinary tract infection were enrolled in the study.The median time between the onset of infection and the institution of therapy was 2 days (range: 1-8 days). Renal inflammatory changes were documented in 57% of the infants. Renal defects were recorded in 41% of the patients treated within the first 24 hours since the onset of fever versus 75% of those treated on day 4 and onward. Renal scarring was developed in 51% of the infants with an abnormal scan in the acute phase of infection. The frequency of scarring in infants treated early and in those whose treatment was delayed did not differ, suggesting that once acute pyelonephritis has occurred, ultimate renal scarring is independent of the timing of therapy. Acute inflammatory changes and subsequent scarring were more frequent in the presence of vesicoureteral reflux, especially that which is high grade. However, the difference was not significant, which suggests that renal damage may be independent of the presence of reflux.Early and appropriate treatment of urinary tract infection, especially during the first 24 hours after the onset of symptoms, diminishes the likelihood of renal involvement during the acute phase of the infection but does not prevent scar formation.Screening young children with a first febrile urinary tract infection for high-grade vesicoureteral reflux with renal ultrasound scanning and technetium-99m-labeled dimercaptosuccinic acid scanning.To evaluate the predictive value of renal ultrasound scanning and 99m-Technetium-dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy for high-grade vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) in young children with a first urinary tract infection (UTI).The medical records of children who had been examined with renal ultrasound scanning, DMSA scanning, and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) were reviewed. The findings of renal ultrasound scanning, DMSA scanning, and their predictive values were evaluated.Of 699 children, high-grade VUR (grades III-V) was diagnosed in 119 (17.0%). Signs of renal hypodysplasia (OR, 16.15), cyclic dilatation of pelvicaliceal system (OR, 11.73), hydroureter (OR, 4.00) with renal ultrasound scanning, and renal hypodysplasia (OR, 8.78), acute pyelonephritis (OR, 2.76) with DMSA scanning were associated with high-grade VUR. The sensitivities for high-grade VUR of ultrasound scanning alone (67.2%) or DMSA scanning alone (65.5%) were not as good as that of a both-test strategy, which had a sensitivity rate of 83.2%. The negative predictive value of the both-test strategy was 91.5%.Renal ultrasound scanning and DMSA scanning both should be routinely performed in children with a first febrile UTI. VCUG is only indicated when abnormalities are apparent on either ultrasound scanning or DMSA scanning or both.Screening high-grade vesicoureteral reflux in young infants with a febrile urinary tract infection.The lack of good evidence for improved outcomes in children and young infants with febrile urinary tract infection (UTI) after aggressive treatment for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) has raised doubts regarding the need for routine voiding cystourethrography (VCUG), and the appropriate imaging evaluation in these children remains controversial.This prospective study aimed to determine whether abnormalities found on acute dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scan and ultrasound (US) can help indicate the necessity of voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) in young infants.For 3.5 years, all infants younger than 3 months presenting with first febrile UTI were prospectively studied. All infants were hospitalized and investigated using US (<3 days after admission), DMSA scan (<5 days after admission), and VCUG (7-10 days after antibiotic treatment) after diagnosis. The association among findings of US, DMSA scan, and VCUG were evaluated.From 220 infants, there were abnormal results in 136 (61.8%) US and in 111 (50.5%) DMSA scans. By US, ten infants (4.5%) with abscess or structural abnormalities other than VUR were diagnosed. High-grade (III-V) VUR was present in 39 patients (17.7%). The sensitivities for high-grade VUR of renal US alone (76.9%) or DMSA scan alone (82.1%) were not as good as that of the "OR rule" strategy, which had 92.3% sensitivity and 94.3% negative predictive value.To screen high-grade VUR in young infants with febrile UTI, US and acute DMSA scan could be performed first. VCUG is only indicated when abnormalities are apparent on either US or DMSA scan or both.Vesicoureteral reflux in children with urinary tract infection: comparison of diagnostic accuracy of renal US criteria.To directly compare various renal ultrasonography (US) criteria for vesicoureteral reflux (VUR) with voiding cystography, the reference method, for diagnostic accuracy in helping to determine an intermediate strategy of screening children who require cystography.Institutional review board approval and parental consent were obtained for this prospective hospital-based cohort study involving children with urinary tract infections (UTIs). Renal length, ureteral dilatation, pelvic dilatation, and corticomedullary differentiation were analyzed and compared. One hundred seventeen patients (median age, 0.8 year; age range, 0.0-13.9 years) were included: 46 (39%) boys (median age, 0.3 year; age range, 0.5-13.9 years) and 71 girls (median age, 1.2 years; age range, 0.0-11.5 years). A two-level logistic regression model was used to analyze data, and diagnostic accuracy calculations were performed.Thirty-two (27%) children had all-grade VUR, and eight (7%) had VUR of grade 3 or higher. Only ureteral dilatation was significantly related to all-grade VUR (odds ratio [OR], 7.5; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 1.0, 58.2; P = .05), with 25% sensitivity (95% CI: 15%, 39%) and 88% specificity (95% CI: 83%, 92%). Ureteral, pelvic, and urinary tract dilatations were significantly associated with VUR of grade 3 or higher, with ORs of 20.2 (95% CI: 3.5, 118.2; P = .001), 13.7 (95% CI: 4.1, 46.0; P < .001), and 20.0 (95% CI: 4.4, 90.1; P < .001), respectively. The best compromise between sensitivity and specificity was achieved by using the ureteral dilatation criterion, which had 73% sensitivity (95% CI: 43%, 90%) and 88% specificity (95% CI: 84%, 92%) for high-grade VUR.Ureteral dilatation may yield the best accuracy for the US-based diagnosis of both all-grade and high-grade VUR. This US criterion, perhaps in combination with other predictors, might find a place in an evidence-based selective strategy for limiting cystography in children with UTIs.Risk factors in the development of early technetium-99m dimercaptosuccinic acid renal scintigraphy lesions during first urinary tract infection in children.To establish the variables that correlate with uptake defects in dimercaptosuccinic acid (DMSA) scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI).A prospective observational study was conducted in a cohort of 158 consecutive children with a first episode of symptomatic UTI. The therapeutic delay time (TDT) was recorded. DMSA scintigraphy was performed in all children and voiding cystourethrography in 150 of them.85% of the patients were younger than 2 y. Mean TDT was 33.5 h. The aetiological agent was Escherichia coli in 140 children. DMSA scintigraphy was normal in 81. Vesicoureteric reflux was detected in 33. After a multivariate logistic regression analysis the following variables were retained in the final model: TDT > or = 48 h, growth of bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and C-reactive protein > or = 30 mg l(-1).TDT > or = 48 h, bacteria other than E. coli, percentage of polymorphonuclear cells > or = 60% and CRP > or = 30 mg l(-1) influence the findings detected in the DMSA scintigraphy performed in the acute phase of a first episode of UTI.[Importance of echography in the study of urinary tract infections in childhood].One hundred and twenty-one children with a clinical diagnosis of urinary tract infection (UTI) were examined with sonography (US), ivp and voiding cystourethrography (VCUG). In 84 patients neither US nor radiographic findings were found of pathological significance; in 16 out of 37 patients with pathological findings both US and ivp were negative, whereas VCUG was decisive for a correct diagnosis. VCUG demonstrated vesicoureteric reflux in 10 patients, posterior urethral valves in 1 patient, and small diverticula of the urinary bladder in 5 patients. In 17 of the remaining 21 cases, there was agreement between US and urographic findings, whereas in 4 cases US provided us with false positives, with images of apparent renal scarring. The mistake was caused by an incorrect US detection of unilateral duplication of the collecting systems. The authors conclude by stressing the importance of ivp in the evaluation of urinary tract infections in children, even in case of negative VCUG and US results, and suggest comparing US measurements of renal length to the distance between three contiguous lumbar vertebrae in order to obtain measurements comparable to body growth.Relationship among vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infection.Ninety-four children with febrile urinary tract infection were studied prospectively to determine the relationship between vesicoureteral reflux, P-fimbriated Escherichia coli, and acute pyelonephritis, and to evaluate the diagnostic reliability of commonly used clinical and laboratory observations. By using renal scan with dimercaptosuccinic acid labeled with technetium 99m as the standard of reference, we documented acute pyelonephritis in 62 (66%) of 94 patients. Vesicoureteral reflux was demonstrated in 29 (31%) of the total group and in only 23 (37%) of 62 patients with pyelonephritis. Of the 70 E. coli urinary isolates, 48 (69%) were P-fimbriated, including 30 (64%) of 47 isolates from patients with pyelonephritis and 18 (78%) of 23 isolates from patients with normal renal scans. The prevalence of P-fimbriated E. coli in patients with pyelonephritis and vesicoureteral reflux was 46%, compared with 71% in those with pyelonephritis who had no concurrent vesicoureteral reflux (p = 0.222). Multiple clinical and laboratory variables commonly used in the diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis did not adequately predict the presence or absence of parenchymal involvement. These data show the following: (1) Acute pyelonephritis in the absence of demonstrable vesicoureteral reflux is common. (2) Febrile urinary tract infections in children are commonly associated with P-fimbriated E. coli, both in the presence and absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (3) The presence of P fimbriae alone does not fully explain the pathophysiology of renal parenchymal invasion by bacteria in the absence of vesicoureteral reflux. (4) The diagnosis of acute pyelonephritis in children with febrile urinary tract infections on the basis of clinical and laboratory observations is unreliable.Evaluation of the use of DMSA in culture positive UTI and culture negative acute pyelonephritis.This prospective study was done to assess the frequency of acute pyelonephritis (APN) in febrile children with positive urine culture as documented by Tc99m DMSA scintigraphy (DMSA) and the frequency of vesicoureteric reflux (VUR) in these children. Secondly, to determine the frequency of APN, in febrile children with supportive evidence for UTI but with negative urine culture, as documented by DMSA and frequency of VUR in them. Thirdly to stress the utility of DMSA to diagnose APN in urine culture negative febrile children and to suggest DMSA as a clinical tool in evaluation of fever of unknown origin (FUO). This study included 42 children with positive urine culture and 26 children with negative urine culture who had supportive evidence of UTI as determined by the predetermined criteria and diagnosed to have APN by DMSA. All of them had ultrasonogram (USG), DMSA and voiding cystourethrogram (VCU). They were followed up for a minimum period of 6 months. Out of the 42 children with positive urine culture 92.9% had features of APN in the DMSA of whom 82.1% had vesicoureteric relux (VUR). The DMSA was abnormal in 26 children with negative urine culture, of whom 65.4% had VUR. Ultrasound suggestive of parenchymal change was observed in 47.6% in the culture positive group and 65.4% in the culture negative group. In conclusion, it is suggested, that DMSA is a useful investigation for the diagnosis of APN in febrile UTI. DMSA is indicated in febrile children with negative urine culture but with supportive evidence of UTI and in FUO. An abnormal DMSA is a strong indication for work up for VUR.[A retrospective study to evaluate a protocol aimed at reducing the number of unnecessary voiding cystourethrographies performed after a first episode of febrile urinary tract infection].Whether or not voiding cystourethrography (VCUG) should be performed after a first episode of urinary tract infection (UTI) remains a matter of debate. The role of VCUG is primarily to diagnose high-grade vesicoureteral reflux (≥grade III) (VUR) and hence prevent the development of renal scars and poor long-term outcome. We designed a protocol designed to reduce the indications for performing unnecessary VCUGs after a first episode of febrile UTI. In order to evaluate the efficacy of our protocol, we designed a retrospective study to verify whether high-grade VUR was subsequently being underdiagnosed.This study compared the number of cases of VUR diagnosed over 2 1-year periods in children aged 1 month to 18 years. Data were collected from records held in the pediatric emergency department of the University Hospital of Reims. All cases included had presented to the department with a first episode of febrile UTI. During the first 1-year collection period, all patients underwent a VCUG. During the second collection period, the protocol was in place and VCUG was only performed in children with a serum procalcitonin level greater than 1 ng/L and/or an abnormal renal ultrasound scan.During the first year, 100 patients underwent routine VCUG and 7 cases of high-grade VUR were diagnosed. During the following year, VCUG was limited according to the new protocol: 102 patients were enrolled, 52 VCUGs were performed and 8 cases of high-grade VUR were diagnosed. Cases of low-grade VUR (I and II) were less frequently detected, without significant consequences for the patients.The protocol led to a 40% decrease in the number of VCUGs performed. No cases of high-grade VUR were missed; however, the number of VCUGs performed with a normal outcome remained significant.Renal ultrasonography should be done routinely in children with first urinary tract infections.To assess the consequences of renal ultrasonography (RUS) in the treatment of children younger than 5 years of age with a first febrile urinary tract infection.We retrospectively reviewed the results of imaging studies, including RUS, computed tomography, and voiding cystourethrography in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection during a 2-year period. Children with known urologic anomalies, other underlying diseases, or simultaneous combined illnesses were excluded. Children with nephromegaly were diagnosed with acute lobar nephronia by computed tomography.A total of 390 children were included in this study. Of the 390 children, 112 (28.7%) had abnormal RUS findings. The children with abnormal RUS findings of nephromegaly, small kidney, intermittent hydronephrosis, or a double collecting system had a significantly greater incidence of vesicoureteral reflux than children with normal RUS findings. Additionally, the occurrence of high-grade vesicoureteral reflux in children with abnormal RUS findings was more frequent than in children with normal RUS findings.The results of our study indicate that it is worth performing RUS in children with a first febrile urinary tract infection because abnormal kidney size or other specific structural ultrasound findings should be investigated, in addition to isolated hydronephrosis.Impact of micturating cystourethrography and DMSA renal scintigraphy on the investigation scheme in children with urinary tract infection.The relationships among urinary tract infection (UTI), vesicoureteral reflux (VUR), and permanent renal damage in children are not fully understood. The aim of this study was to evaluate the incidence of renal scarring in children with a history of UTI and to determine the change in the probability of permanent renal damage owing to the presence of VUR documented on micturating cystourethrography (MCU).We analyzed 201 children (400 renal units, two children with solitary kidney). Seventy-four boys and 127 girls (aged 7 months to 7 years, median 2.5 years) with culture verified UTI were referred for technetium-labeled dimercaptosuccinic (DMSA) renal scintigraphy 4-6 months after acute UTI. MCU was also performed mostly 1 month prior to DMSA. Statistical analysis was performed using chi2 test or Fisher's exact test. Likelihood ratio (LR) positive and negative, diagnostic odds ratio (DOR), and post-test probability of (no) disease were calculated for VUR on MCU versus scarring on DMSA.Vesicoureteral reflux was found in 158 (39.5%) kidneys, and evaluated as grades I, II, III, IV, and V in 3, 70, 43, 25, and 17 refluxing renal units (RRU), respectively. Permanent renal damage according to DMSA was seen in 15.2% (61/400) kidneys. Scarring was shown in 29.7% (47/158) of kidneys with VUR and in 5.8% (14/242) kidneys without VUR (P<0.0001). LR positive was 2.353 (95% CI 1.889, 2.865), LR negative 0.341 (95% CI 0.209, 0.523), and DOR 6.895 (95% CI 3.533, 14.093). Rate of scarring significantly increased with VUR of grades III, IV, and V. There was no significant difference in the incidence of scarring in kidneys without VUR and RRU with low-grade (I and II) VUR (P=0.306). The presence of VUR on MCU increased the chance of renal damage on DMSA by about 15%, whereas negative MCU increased the chance of no-renal involvement by 9%.Micturating cystourethrography should not be used as a first-line test to rule out the permanent renal damage owing to UTI. The priority of imaging strategy should be focused on early identification of renal lesions to prevent further deterioration.